
Methods of Handling Citrus Groves


J. A. Stevens, DeLand


Mr. President, Ladies and Gentlemen :

When our President notified me a few days ago that I had been placed on the committee to report on “Methods of
Handling Citrus Groves,” I began to won¬
der what I could say that would be of in¬
terest to members of the society; and as
I pondered the matter, I was struck by the similarity between “Methods of Handling
Citrus Groves” and the “Negro Prob¬
lem,” as expressed by a northern lady who had come to live in the South. After she had spent several years trying to train colored servants to work according to her ideas, a friend came to visit her who had been a classmate in a northern college where they had often exchanged views on the weighty problems that are consid¬
ered at such times. After this friend had been in the South for a few days, she ask¬
ed her hostess: “What do you think now of the negro problem?” To which the hostess replied: “Which problem? There are as many problems as there are ne¬
groes.” There seems to be as many meth¬
ods of handling citrus groves as there are growers.

At each meeting of the society, some phase of the subject has been discussed,
and I do not know that I can present any new ideas, but will try briefly to make some comparisons between groves on low hammock lands in the northern part of


the citrus belt, and those grown on higher soils.

Citrus fruits are grown in Florida on various types of soils. By far the greater percentage of groves are on pine land, of which there are several kinds, as shown by the soil maps. A much smaller per¬
centage of groves are on hammock lands,
where the palmetto and hardwoods grow.

The type of grove which I wish to dis¬
cuss is the kind that is planted on low, or cabbage hammock, so-called because of the abundance of cabbage palmetto trees.
In this latter type, apparently successful methods differ—in certain respects, quite materially from methods practiced in oth¬
er types of soil.

In the first place, when preparing ground to plant citrus trees, instead of clearing off all the timber, it seems best to leave quite a little standing timber, espe¬
cially palmettos, but also some live-oaks,
hickories, red bays and occasionally mag¬
nolias and sweetgums, but these two last named are not considered as favorably as the others, since their roots are thought in some cases to rob the citrus trees more than the others. The object in leaving standing timber is to afford frost protec¬
tion and to give partial shade. This pro¬
tection is of little or no benefit in the case of a freeze with high wind, but on still nights with falling frost, the standing


20




FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


21


timber is a great protection and the shade of these trees on the morning after a cold night is very advantageous, because it enables the citrus trees to thaw out before the sun strikes them.

The sour orange is frequently found growing wild in these hammocks, sur¬
rounded by more or less dense jungle growth, and the fruit on such sour trees is usually of deep color, smooth and very bright and pretty. This condition seems to be the natural home of the orange, and for that reason, also, it is thought unwise to remove all the timber, but on the con¬
trary that enough should be left to make conditions as nearly like Nature provided for the wild trees as practicable.

In low hammocks, citrus trees are usu¬
ally planted much closer together than is the custom on pine lands generally and one hundred trees to the acre is about the standard. The native wild sour stock is almost universally used.

Very little, if any, cultivation is prac¬
ticed, especially if marl happens to be found outcropping or near the surface.
Because of the standing timber, it is diffi¬
cult to use implements for cultivating, and hoeing is generally resorted to for what¬
ever cultivation is deemed advisable.

Under these conditions, the root-sys¬
tem is not as extensive and trees do not grow as large, nor bear as much fruit per tree, as trees of the same age on higher and more open soils; but the fruit, espe¬
cially the orange, is of better quality, fla¬
vor and texture and usually sells for enough more to make up the difference in yield, and it is quite probable that an acre of low hammock grove nets the grower quite as much on an average, or


perhaps more, than an acre of grove on higher land, when comparison is made between trees of the same age.

Rust mites are seldom found in low hammock groves which are shaded and it is usually not necessary to spray for bright fruit; but, on the other hand, white-
flies seem to thrive fully as well, if not better, in low hammock groves than else¬
where. The usually more moist condi¬
tions prevailing in low hammock-shaded groves greatly assist the growth of fungus parasites of whitefly.

The same moist conditions referred to not infrequently assist the development of fungus diseases, such as withertip and stem-end rot, and consequently necessi¬
tate more pruning than would perhaps be necessary in groves which are more open and on higher, better drained soil.

Fertilizing a low hammock grove is a matter which requires careful thought.
Ordinarily, low hammock citrus trees will do best with a little less ammonia than is usually given to groves on other types of soil, but the grower is sometimes tempted to try and force his trees to see if he cannot make them bear more fruit, and in such cases it not infrequently happens that injudicious or over-feeding is apt to re¬
sult disastrously, because trees on this type of soil are apparently quite susceptible to the dieback disease. However, if not over-fed the danger of dieback is not great.

When it comes to packing, the low ham¬
mock fruit is very tender and has to be handled very carefully. This fruit is ea¬
sily bruised and if the greatest care is not exercised may reach market in a rotting condition; but when properly put up, and


22


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


arriving sound, the prices received are usu¬
ally very gratifying and compensate for many of the disadvantages encountered in production.

* * * * * *

Perhaps it would not be out of place right here to mention an experience which was had this spring in what was, to us at least, an unusual method of grafting. We had occasion to move quite a lot of sour orange seedlings that would caliper from an inch to an inch and a half just above the ground. We wished to have these sour seedlings worked over to sweet orange trees as quickly as possible, and so, after receiving permission from the Nursery
Inspector, we took them up, hauled them forty miles, and on February first and second (just before the recent freeze)
cleft-grafted and then planted seven hun¬
dred ninety-seven of them. The process was accomplished by first sawing the sour tree off about an inch above the collar,
then splitting the stump with a cold chisel and inserting one sprig graft having three or four eyes which had been beveled on two sides, care being taken to see that the cambium of the sprig was placed so as to unite with the cambium of the stump. The cold chisel was then removed and the stump gripped the graft quite firmly. The grafted stump was then carried away and planted, using plenty of water to pack the roots firmly. Then a bank of sand was drawn up all around, until only the tip of the graft protruded above the bank—but on receipt of the freeze warning, the grafts were then completely covered with sand. After the cold was over, enough of the soil was removed to allow one or two eyes of the graft to be exposed.


On April 12th, examination showed that of the 797 grafted stumps which were planted just before the freeze, 210
grafts, or 26% had died; 261 grafts,
or 33% were alive but had not started;
326 grafts, or 41% had made growth and several of them had grown more than thirteen inches. Nearly every growing graft had put out anywhere from one to a dozen bloom, and one graft in particular had over a dozen open bloom at one time.
I11 many cases, after bloom petals had dropped, young fruit had set and grown as large as a pea. It is not expected, how¬
ever, that any of these young fruits will last to maturity; but the instance is men¬
tioned here as indicating that grafts cut from bearing trees may be expected to bear reasonably early.


Discussion

Mr. Lamont: In regard to the discus¬
sion of handling citrus groves, I would like to learn the best method of handling a grove that is in solid Bermuda grass to get the full benefit of the fertilizer.
The grass is so dense that you cannot use a disc harrow.

Mr. 'J. A. Stevens: We had some patches of Bermuda grass, but never wor¬
ried much about it. In cases of severe drought the trees seemed to do a little worse, but not much. We put on the fertilizer as usual, perhaps a little more of it. The grass probably took up some of it. I never tried to get rid of it, be¬
cause, as Mr. Painter used to say, the best way to get rid of Bermuda grass is to move away from it.



FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


23


Mr. Brown: That is one of the least of my troubles. I would say that where we have a heavy sod in Bermuda grass in our grove, if we can give it plenty of water and plenty of fertilizer, we have the best fruit in those spots. We put the fertilizer on and let the rains take care of it.

Mr. H. B. Stevens: We have a grove like that and just mow the grass and it stands the drought better than any grove we have. But if we try to plow it, we


find we have the most trouble.

Mr. Mead: I would like to ask if anybody has ever tried checking it by using kudzu vine.

Mr. -: Which is the worse?

(Laughter.)

Mr. Felt: Natal hay will drive it out.

Mr. Hume: I have had kudzu on a ditch bank put in seven or eight years ago and tried to dig it out. It is there yet. (Laughter.)



Treatment of Frosted Groves


Mr. Skinner: I know there are a good many people here who seem to be too timid to speak, who came here with the distinct purpose of learning how to take care of their frosted groves. I am not particularly interested, personally.

(Laughter.)

I think it would be very interesting to discuss this matter, and I would like to have those who have had some experience with it, discuss it. Suppose we start out by asking the president to tell us some¬
thing of what to do.

Mr. Hume: My advice in a case of this kind is summed up by saying, “do nothing.” I have seen more time and energy wasted over too early efforts,
those efforts counting for little or nothing.
As I look at it, the main thing to be done is to wait—now I am talking about when you are really frosted—is to wait until you know the extent of the damage. Many of the growers, particularly among those who have had their first experience, want to go in their groves the morning after the freeze and do something. At that time you don’t know what to do, so at that stage there is nothing to do but wait until growth begins and shoots starts out so that you know just where you are. Then you are ready to begin to clean out the dead wood.

But there is something you can do with the handling of a grove as a whole, and that is, if you are sure there is something


left in the grove is to begin cultivation and fertilization that will start the growth.
That is along the right line. Get the new growth started, then clean up your trees and get them in shape to make up what may have been lost by the freeze.

Mr. Skinner: How much fertilizer,
and what kind would be safe to use?

Mr. Hume: I would advise a fertili¬
zer pretty moderately rich in ammonia.
In many cases it is wise to reduce the amount of ammonia, but the ammonia is what the tree calls for first in making its new growth.

As to the amount, I would say off-hand,
that it should be one-third to one-half of what the trees had originally been receiv¬
ing. I think there is more at that stage in the cultivation, in the loosening up and opening up the soil and allowing it to warm up, than there is in the fertilizer to be applied. If water is available, put it on. That has been one of the serious things in many sections of the state, and that is the lack of moisture at the time of year when the frosts occur. But culti¬
vation will help a long way to counteract this disadvantage.

Now I am going to call on Mr. Hart,
because he has had more experience than
I have had.

Mr. Hart: I have been through the two freezes of ’94-95. All the orange growers of the state, pretty nearly, suffer¬
ed at that time. A year or two after then,
24




FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


-5


Mr. C. A. Baker at Ormond before one of the meetings, thought it would be a pretty good idea to make a record of our experiences in handling our groves and have them recorded in the reports, that it might be of use to thousands in later years who might have the same expe¬
rience.

The experience of this last winter was nothing so severe as that we had then.
Through the larger part of the state last
February’s freeze was such that in a couple of years you will hardly know any¬
thing of the kind ever happened.

The question that has come to me—in fact, I was asked the morning after the freeze, “How shall I cut my trees back;
how much shall I cut them back?”

I agree with Mr. Hume and say, “Don’t hurry.” You do not know how badly you are hurt until after the June growth starts.
That is a strong, vigorous growth and will open up the scars that have not shown before and you may find that some trees may be dead at the bud and still have a fine growth at the top.

I remember in DeLand one time, Judge
Stewart took me out to a grove and said
“Look at those. Aren’t they fine trees?”
I said, “I don’t know yet; let me look at them.” I examined the trees and found every one girdled at the bottom and they had to cut the whole bunch back to the ground. The cold gets into old wounds just as it gets into the wounds of a soldier, and while it may appear alive and vigorous outside, it may be dead inside.
Insects may appear to be burrowing into the live wood, while they are in reality working into the dead wood.

I reiterate the advice not to cut too soon.


I also agree with Mr. Hume in regard to the fertilization of the grove. He has said exactly what I would say in regard to it.

I would recommend you go back to that annual report that gives the result of the experiments tried at that trying time—
possibly it was 1897, or it may have been even later than that.

Where the limbs are cut back to the trunk, I think it would be well, where the sprouts put out two or three or four feet long, and tender, to fasten them together in some way for a time, because they will bear fruit and they will all be on the out¬
side so that the strain will be on the trunk and it is a heavy strain. But if you guard against that, the sprouts will event¬
ually strengthen and make you a good,
symmetrical tree.

In budding, if you cut away the bud,
do not cut away the sound wood; cut it partly off and lop it down. It will be in the way for a year or two but it pays to keep it. Let the root system have the benefit of those leaves, which are the lungs of the tree; then later, after the sweet bud is well started, cut away the other growth.
The sap naturally flows to the highest bud, and if you keep your sour wood down and keep the sweet buds at the top,
the growth will go there.

I think more groves were killed by pruning and wrong handling after that big freeze than by any other cause. Hard¬
ly an old grove was killed by the cold,
that is, the root system, but by pruning they ruined many groves throughout the state. Those who followed the policy of keeping everything they could keep, were those who got into the market first and got almost any price they wanted. It was




26


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


surprising, the profits of orange growing after that freeze. That means that nc one should be discouraged because they are cut back. Get your growth just as soon as you can so as to get your share in the high prices and market conditions that will follow for those who were for¬
tunate enough to escape serious injury.

Mr. Dade: Nitrate of soda will stim¬
ulate a tree just as a drink of whiskey will stimulate a man. It makes a tree cheerful and makes it feel good. I think it should be applied first. That should be followed by some organic fertilizer; bone is one of the best things you can use. That should be applied when there is considerable moisture in the soil.

Mr. Dade: I agree with Mr. Hart in his idea of waiting for the June growth,
but I don’t think he mentioned how far to cut back. That should be watched close¬
ly. You should cut back to green wood,
and then cut back at least two good eyes in the green wood, and be sure you get all the dead wood cut out.

But I think a general stimulation should be urged, and then something to keep the tree moving.

Mr. Skinner: I would like to hear from Mr. Sampson.

Mr. Sampson: I can say nothing, ex¬
cept that I agree with Mr. Hart. Don’t touch your trees now. You don’t know where to prune.

Mr. Poole: My experience has been with small trees. What the gentlemen have been talking about is in regard to large,
bearing trees. I agree that it is not wise to cut out anything until you are sure where the life line is going to settle. But on small trees the damage has shown up


quite plainly in a short time. I have found trees cut down to the banks are the trees coming back with the best and most healthy tops.

Mr. Stevens: I have listened with a good deal of interest to these experiences.
At the meeting after the ’95 freeze, I re¬
member Mr. Adams was in the chair. He showed us a picture of the buds he put in as soon as he could get them. He put them in and had pictures to show us at our meeting.

I thought I would copy after him, but was unable to get the buds.

So many people want to know what to do with the sprouts that come out of the top of the tree. I say, let them alone. They will take care of themselves after awhile.
If you take off any, you are going to find out later that you took off the one you should have let remain there.

I am like Mr. Dade; I believe in cutting back into the living wood. Do not leave a piece of dead wood to breed wither-tip.
I cut back into live wood and then paint it with Bordeaux paste. It seems to be a tonic and stays on as well as coal tar. I
have tried both and find it better and cheaper to handle.

I had a singular experience with bank¬
ing trees I never had before. After the freeze in ’95 I had some young buds come along; a little cool spell hit us and I had not banked these buds, so I banked them afterwards. The bark all came off and we lost every bud. Last year I did the same thing, and we lost them all.

This year I had some buds I was anx¬
ious to save, and when we learned the cold spell was coming, I sent down and had them banked a day or two before the cold


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


27


wave struck us, and strange to say, all of those that were banked before the freeze are just as bad as those that were not banked. Why that was, I don’t know.
It may have been because the earth had not had time to settle around them.

Mr. Hart: Did you open the bank up after the freeze?

Mr. Stevens: No. They were bank¬
ed a day or two before the freeze and the dirt had not settled around them.

Mr. Hart: I think it is advisable to open up and let them warm up.

Mr. Sheppard: One of the troubles we have on these frosted trees on the young leaves, is the mellanose fungus.


I have already seen it coming and about in May I think it wise to apply ammonia-
ted fertilizer. In '95 there was a visita¬
tion of the mellanose. This was greatly benefited in its after effects by about a five per cent of ammonia in the fertilizer.
It decreased after then and was not seen in the fruit.

Mr. Hume: One of the things we will naturally look for following the freeze is a greater development of die-back than we have seen in the state for some time.
We have been hearing less of it, but un¬
less I miss my prophesy very badly, we will have more of it within the next few months.


CONTROL OF ROOT KNOT BY CALCIUM CYANAMIDE


J. R. Watson


PREFACE

In November, 1914, the attention of the writer was called to the poisonous properties of the commercial compound called “cyanamid.” It occurred to him that the substance might have some value against pests inhabiting the soil, and ne¬
matodes at once came to mind. Some preliminary tests, tried out on radishes in infested soil, were so encouraging that during the spring of 1915 more extensive tests were undertaken, and in July of that year the matter was taken up as a regular project for investigation. We have had variable results as we varied the dosage,
the manner of application, and the soil.
We will not here go into the details of these experiments, but will give only the


essential results and such details as are essential to the trucker and gardener in applying the material.

“cyanamid ”

“Cyanamid” is a trade name for a mix¬
ture consisting chiefly of the chemical compound calcium cyanide (about 45%),
hydrated lime (27%), carbon (13%),
calcium carbonate (4%), calcium sul¬
phide (2%). It is a black powder, the color being due to the carbon. It is a concentrated nitrogenous fertilizer which analyzes from 15 to 24 per cent, of am¬
monia. At present prices it is the cheap¬
est source of ammonia available among commercial fertilizers. It contains no potash or acid phosphate, and is there¬
fore, not a complete fertilizer.





28


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


The valuable ingredient of “cyanamid’’
is the calcium cyanamide (CaCN2). It is this component that kills the nematodes and adds the plant food to the soil. When moderate doses are mixed with soil, cal¬
cium cyanamide quickly disintegrates,
probably changing first to urea and then to ammonia, and then to nitrates. In large doses, however, some of it may go into a polymeric form called “dicyana-
mide." This disintegrates more slowly and has a very harmful effect on any crop that is planted too soon after the applica¬
tion of the cyanamid. This scorching is much more pronounced when the soil is dry. Too large an amount of cyanamide will have the same effect even if no dicy-
anamide is formed. As stated above, our first experiments were with radishes. On
November 30, 1914, six small plots, each containing three square yards, were treat¬
ed with cyanamid in quantities varying from three tons to 200 pounds per acre.
The cyanamid was applied as a top dres¬
sing, and hoed in. Four similar plots were used as checks. These plots were on land known to be heavily infested with nematodes. On December 4, radishes were planted on these plots but a very poor stand was obtained and the plots were replanted on December 13. On
March 18 and April 20 the radishes were gathered.

This experiment seemed to indicate that:

(1) Cyanamid used at the rate of
1600 pounds or more per acre markedly reduced the number of nematodes pres¬
ent.

(2) If used too strong or applied too near the time of planting it inhibits


growth or entirely kills the young seed¬
lings.

In March, T915, we started experi¬
ments with cowpeas on plots containing a hundredth of an acre each. The larger size of the plots were intended to reduce the danger of the results being obscured by the migration of the worms into the plots from the sides. To prevent the nematodes from being washed over the plots from the surrounding land, the plots were ridged so that they were slightly higher in the middle. The cyanamid was applied as a top dressing and worked into the soil with a disk harrow. The dosage varied from 300 pounds to a ton per acre.

Cowpeas were planted three weeeks af¬
ter the application of the cyanamid. They did well until dry weather set in when all of those on plots that had received 600
pounds or more per acre showed signs of scorching. On those plots that had re¬
ceived 1500 pounds or more per acre the cowpeas were not as good as on the check plots that had received nothing. On those plots that had received 1500 pounds or more per acre, there were at first, few knots on the roots that did not extend to a depth of more than six inches, while on the check plots the roots were knotted to the very crown. Three months later the nematodes had worked up so that on the treated plots there began to be knots nearer the surface. Evidently we had failed to get the material down to a sufficient depth. However, the plots that had received but 300 pounds per acre showed fewer knots than the checks.

EXPERIMENTS IN GREENHOUSE

A bench in the Station greenhouse was filled with infested soil and then divided


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


29


into seven compartments of approximate¬
ly a square yard each. The soil in this bench was five inches deep. It was pos¬
sible here to control conditions bettetr than in the field and especially to eliminate the migration of nematodes into the treat¬
ed soil.

Section 1 was treated with cyanamid at the rate of 4 tons per acre. It was mixed with the dry soil and then wet down. At this date, March 29, 1915, the importance of a thorough mixing of the material with the soil was not properly appreciated and the mixing was not as thorough as it should have been.

Section 2 was treated at the rate of 2j4
tons per acre. This was dissolved in water but the wet soil was thoroughly stirred.

Section 3 was treated with the same dosage and also in water but the soil was not stirred. The water was depended upon to distribute the cyanamid through¬
out the bed.

Section 4 was not treated with cyana¬
mid but left as a check. It was thorough¬
ly wet down.

Section 5 was treated with cyanamid at the rate of 2 tons per acre, applied as in section 2.

Section 6 was treated at the rate of
1440 pounds per acre, stirred in dry and then wet down.

Section 7 received the same dose but it was added in solution.

On April 8 these plots were planted with tomatoes, cabbages, peppers, and lettuce. On the three plots that had re¬
ceived the heaviest doses, very few seed¬
lings appeared. On the three receiving the weaker doses they appeared but quick¬
ly died. Section 6 was almost sterile on


May 21, there being very few weed seed even. On the check, Section 4, there was a vigorous germination of both weeds and tomato seeds, the latter were heavily infested with nematodes and quickly died.

Owing to unsatisfactory temperature conditions, the bench was abandoned dur¬
ing the summer, not even being watered except by rain water which leaked through the roof.

On September 11, the bench was again planted to lettuce, celery, carrots, cucum¬
bers and tomatoes. To our surprise some of these plants also died on sections 1,
2 and 3. Evidently the fact that the plots were dry during the summer prevented the decomposition of the cyanamid. A
few cabbages in one plot only, Section 1,
lived. Replanting in this section showed scorching of tomatoes as late as January,
1916. These recovered, however, and made good growth. Up to the present time all plants grown in this section have been free of nematodes except those grown in the small portion where the
September planting of cabbages was not killed. Apparently in the insufficient mix¬
ing, this portion failed to receive its share of cyanamid.

Section 2 has remained entirely free of nematodes. Evidently a dose of 2/4 tons per acre on shallow soil will kill all nema¬
todes. Of the seeds planted in Novem¬
ber, celery was not scorched at all; cab¬
bage showed some scorching; lettuce con¬
siderable; cucumbers and tomatoes quite badly.

On Section 3 the effects were about the same as far as scorching was concerned,
but there were a few nematodes on these



30


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


plants. This Coincides with other expe¬
riments which indicate that one does not get as good results when the cyanamid is added in water. The top layer of the soil seems to absorb the material.

Section 5 showed one corner next to the check to be heavily infested, the re¬
mainder free. This distribution led to the suspicion that the partition between may have worked loose; a suspicion which was verified upon examination. We be¬
lieve the nematodes were exterminated in this section by a dosage of 2 tons per acre.

Section 6; by May, 1916, there began to be a few knots noticeable on tomatoes.
Up to this time there had been none no¬
ticed. Probably 1440 pounds per acre is a little too small a dose to do thorough work of eradication, although it greatly reduced the nnmbers of the nematodes.

Section 7 with the same dosage as 6,
but added in solution had some root knot,
but markedly less than the check.

In section 4, check, all plants were so heavily infested with nematodes that they made very little growth.

In November, 1915, another series of thirteen plots, each containing a hun¬
dredth of an acre, was treated with cyana¬
mid. The dosage ranged from 420 to
3600 pounds per acre. On two of these plots the material was added in solution and two were left untreated, for checks.
On the other nine plots about half of each dosage was broadcasted over the sur¬
face of the ground which was then deeply plowed. The remainder of the dosages was then applied as a top dressing to the plowed land and thoroughly disked in.


The soil was rather dry at the time of application and it was not irrigated.

Few nematodes were found on the plots that had received 1500 pounds or more per acre. But by June, 1916, a few plants on each of the plots, even on the one that had reached 3600 pounds per acre, showed knots.

Other plots were started on July 1,
1916, using dosages varying from L* to
3 tons per acre. This was applied as in the previous case. No rain fell for a week after application. Later examination showed that on none of the plots were the nematodes entirely exterminated al¬
though there were very few on the plot that had received 3 tons per acre and those on two spots only. Perhaps those spots had not received their proper proportion of the material. On this plot all plants planted three weeks after treatment ulti¬
mately showed serious scorching although heavy rain had fallen meanwhile. Cow-
peas, corn, okra, and beans were planted.
English peas planted on October 21, near¬
ly four months after treatment, showed some scorching on plots that had received
2 tons or more per acre.

These experiments indicate that the ap¬
plication of the material to dry soil is not very satisfactory. The nematodes are not entirely satisfactory. The nematodes are not entirely eradicated with dosages as heavy as three tons per acre, and the scorching effect on the plant is serious and long continued.

EXPERIMENTS ON SEED BEDS AT SANFORD

Some co-operative experiments were started with Mr. C. M. Berry, Agricul¬
tural Demonstration Agent for Seminole


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


31


County. This is an especially favorable locality for this treatment. The perma¬
nent water table is little if any over two feet from the surface so nematodes can¬
not go very deep into the ground, and the system of sub-irrigation, with which the truck farms are provided, enables the grower to thoroughly saturate the soil at any time he may wish.

The material was used at the rate of a ton per acre. Half of it was plowed under and the other half spread over the land and thoroughly disked in. The material was applied with a fertilizer spreader thus insuring a very uniform distribution. The land was thoroughly irrigated immediate¬
ly after the disking was completed. Cel¬
ery and lettuce were planted on these plots about a month later.

The experiments were highly success¬
ful. On two of the treated seed beds the nematodes were apparently entirely exter¬
minated. The previous year these had been so severely infested that the owners had decided to abandon them. A careful search at the time the celery and lettuce was being transplanted, failed to reveal a single knot and the plants all looked healthy. Untreated seed beds situated only a few rods away were seriously in¬
fested with nematodes.

On a third treated bed, there were a few infested spots. These could readily be detected from the stunted yellow plants they bore. They were all on portions of the bed which were a little higher than the remainder, suggesting that perhaps they were not thoroughly wet after the application of the cyanamid.

A fourth seed bed was treated but not according to directions. Instead of plow¬


ing half of the cyanamid under it was all put on after the ground was plowed and disked in. The results paralleled those mentioned above with cowpeas. The roots near the surface were free of knots but some of these that extended to a depth of five inches or more showed some.

CONCLUSION

The results of these representative ex¬
periments, in connection with others which showed similar results, but into the details of which it is not necessary to go here, justify the following conclusion.
Cyanamid applied at rates of from one to three tons per acre, according to the na¬
ture and the depth to which the soil is infected, and thoroughly mixed with the soil, reduces the number of nematodes present to such an extent as to render it possible to grow with profit susceptible plants on land on which, before treatment,
it was not possible to do so. The reduc¬
tion, in some cases, amounted to apparent extermination.

The thoroughness of the control will depend upon several factors. The dosage is, of course, one of the most important.
This will depend much upon the depth of the soil or the depth to which the nema¬
todes extend. The character of the soil,
apparently, is also important. In one case a dosage of ton per acre on the very light sandy, pineapple soils (old es¬
tablished dunes) about Fort Pierce, seem to have produced as good results as 2 or
3 tons on the Station farm at Gainesville.

The manner of application is a very important factor. Cyanamid does not penetrate the soil to any considerable depth even when it is in solution. It is



32


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


quickly absorbed by certain chemical con¬
stituents of the soil called colloids. The scarcity of these compounds in the sandy soils of the Fort Pierce section probably accounts for the comparative effective¬
ness of the small dose mentioned above.
It is probably this absorption by these colloids which is responsible for the poor results we have obtained when we applied the material in solution. The top layer of the soil absorbs the material and the ne¬
matodes in the deeper layers escape. The same results followed when all of the dosage was applied as a top dressing to the plowed land and then disked in. It is therefore, necessary to mix the material with the soil as thoroughly as is practica¬
ble. Under farm conditions it would seem that this is best accomplished by spreading rather more than half of the amount on the surface, plowing it under as deeply as possible, and then adding the remainder and disking it thoroughly. This is the method we have found most success¬
ful on our plots. A more uniform distri¬
bution can be obtained with a fertilizer spreader, as a uniform distribution is very important. We strongly recommend the use of one. In some cases when we could not get the land plowed as deeply as we wished, we have followed the plow with a bucket of cyanamid and sprinkled it in the bottom of the furrow. On a small garden plot it is practical to have it hoed or spaded in, thus securing a more even distribution. It is best to choose a dry time for the application as the material will mix better with dry earth. In wet ground it tends to form lumps as it ab¬
sorbs water readily. If stored for some months, particularly during the rainy sea¬


son, cyanamid absorbs water from the air and forms hard lumps. These must be broken up before the material can be used.
All cyanamid used for this purpose should be sufficiently fine to pass through an 18-
mesh wire mosquito screen. Chunks of the material, added to the soil, not only are useless for killing nematodes, but they remain in the soil for a long time before they entirely disintegrate, and have a very harmful effect on subsequent plant growth. When fresh, the material is a very fine powder which works well.

When the material has been thoroughly mixed with the soil, the field should be at once irrigated. Enough water should be used to thoroughly wet the soil to the depth ordinarily reached by nematodes,
which is 15 to 18 inches in the usual loose sandy soils of our State, or to ground water. Although the great bulk of the worms are in the first 8 or 9 inches of soil, it is necessary to kill the few below that depth otherwise the latter will in a few weeks, restock the upper layers of soil. This thorough irrigation is very important for at least two reasons. It completes the distribution of the cyanamid commenced by the plow and disk harrow so that more of the nematodes are reach¬
ed and killed and it hastens the decomposi¬
tions of the cyanamid, shortening the time that must elapse before the crop can safe¬
ly be planted. Although a heavy rain im¬
mediately after application is equivalent to an irrigation, we do not advise the use of the cyanamid metheod of dealing with nematodes except on land that can be ir¬
rigated. One cannot safely depend upon the weather, and the material is too costly to lose.


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


33


TIME BETWEEN TREATMENT AND
PLANTING

The length of time which must elapse between the application of the cyanamide and the planting of the crop will, of course,
be directly proportional to the dosage.
The manner of application also influ¬
ences the length of time required. Thor¬
ough mixing with the soil to as great a depth as is practicable also shortens the time. Lumps of cyanamid may injure plants in their immediate vicinity for months. As stated above, a thorough ir¬
rigation immediately after application is a very important factor in lessening the time the land must remain idle. The soil should not be allowed to become dry for weeks after the material is applied.
Scorching is always more severe when the soil becomes dry.

The length of time will also vary mark¬
edly with the plant that is used. Some plants are much more sensitive to the compound than others. Radishes are the most tolerant of any plant we have tried and tomatoes the least so. We expect later to be able to state more definitely for each crop the minimum length of time that must elapse between treatment and planting. It is important, in order to get the maximum returns from the fertilizer value of the cyanamide, to plant as soon as possible after treatment.

In the present state of our knowledge the following periods would seem to be fairly safe when the dosage is not over one ton per acre, thoroughly mixed with the soil which is at once thoroughly irri¬
gated and kept moist after the seeds are planted.

Radishes may be planted within a week


or ten days. Celery, lettuce, rape, pars¬
nips, cabbage, cauliflower, collards, water¬
melons, corn, peppers, and beans in about three weeks. For cowpeas, cucumbers,
cantaloupes, okra, and Irish potatoes one should wait about a month.

For English peas six months should elapse, and for tomatoes at least two months.

In the case of tomatoes one could treat the land some months in advance of plant¬
ing time, perhaps in the fall for land in¬
tended for the spring crop, and in the meantime grow on the land some short season crop, such as radishes, lettuce, or rape.

The scorching often does not appear immediately upon plants grown or set out too soon on treated land. They may prosper for a week or two and have an unusually deep green color and show scorching only after the elapse of a week or more. If the dosage is much too strong for the time intervening, the plants will,
of course, show scorching at once or fail to come up at all. This is especially the case with those having small seeds.

COST.

At the present time cyanamid retails for about $75.00 per ton. To this must be added the cost of application. This should, however, be but little higher than that for any other fertilizer.

In estimating the cost one must take into consideration the value of the ma¬
terial as a fertilizer.

FERTILIZING VALUE.

As stated above, cyanamid is a very rich nitrogenous fertilizer, analyzing as


3


34


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


high as 24% of ammonia. At the pres¬
ent prices it is, among commercial fertili¬
zers, the cheapest source of nitrogen. It is more slowly available than nitrate of soda, but is more lasting in its effects.


Only in exceptional cases, such as unusu-
allly valuable truck crops, should it be necessary to add any additional ammonia to soils treated for nematodes, for several months thereafter.


THE GREEN SOLDIER BUG OR PUMPKIN BUG IN CITRUS

GROVES


J. R. Watson


The control of the larger plant bugs presents somewhat of a prob¬
lem to the grower and the entomolo¬
gist because the adults are very resistant to any safe insecticide. The writer has used solutions as strong as ten pounds of soap and a pint of Black-leaf 40 in fifty gallons of water without killing any large percentage of adults, although the young were mostly killed. He has seen used the regular whitefly oil emulsions to which not only Black-leaf 40 but also one per cent of carbolinium was added, with like unsatisfactory results. The use of a stronger spray would be decidedly unsafe.
The writer has long felt that the mechan¬
ical collection was the best means at hand and has so advised. But we have encoun¬
tered on the part of the growers a marked aversion to mechanical collecting on ac¬
count of the supposed expense. This aver¬
sion has in part been a misunderstanding of the implements employed. When we speak of hand collecting we do not as has often been understood, mean to pick these bugs off of the trees with our fingers one at a time.

Several years ago we had an oppor¬
tunity to try out the method of collecting


these bugs from a crop of potatoes and to ascertain the actual cost of the opera¬
tion. The potatoes were severely in¬
fested, i. e., there was a colony of bugs on about 20% of the hills. These were mostly the Big-footed Plant-bugs and the damage they inflicted was severe. One entering the field in the afternoon found the infested vines badly wilted. Using a pan with a little kerosene in it into which we knocked the bugs, we found that it required about an hour to collect the bugs from an acre of potatoes.

One of the agreeable surprises was the discovery that the bugs did not move about much. We had rather expected that more would continue to come but this was true to only a limited extent.
We found it necessary to go over the potato field but three times.

This experience has been repeated this year on a patch of sunflowers. Once freed the plants do not generally again become severely infested.

Pumpkin bugs were unusually trouble¬
some during the fall of 1916 not only in
Florida but in southern Alabama as well.
In Alabama they occasioned real alarm and a dread that a permanently dangerous




FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


35


enemy was invading their state from
Florida. My opinion is that the outbreak is one of but temporary nature, and that the insects will soon return to normal numbers. Any insect is liable to exhibit these temporary increases in numbers due often to some weather condition which is particularly favorable to the insect or unfavorable to one or more of its ene¬
mies. It is quite possible however that the increased planting of legumes may lead to a permanent increase in the num¬
bers of these insects.

Although they sometimes injure the growth of small trees, their chief damage to citrus is to the fruit in the late fall.
They puncture the fruit which turns yel¬
low and drops from the tree if the bugs are sufficiently abundant. These fruits are dry and tasteless, the juices having to a considerable extent been extracted by the bugs. Tangerines are their first choice;
oranges come next, while grapefruit is sel¬
dom injured. It is to be noticed that the severity of the damage is inversely pro¬
portional to the thickness of the rind.
Probably it is the thick rind on the grape¬
fruit that makes them less attractive.

Early in November we were given an opportunity to test the actual cost of col¬
lecting these bugs on a 200-acre grove and to try out on a large scale several differ¬
ent types of nets. The trees were ten years old set 20x30 ft. and averaged from
30 to 100 bugs per tree. 97% of them were Pumpkin Bugs (Nezarra viridula.)
Most of the remainder were Brown Stink
Bugs, but there were a few Cotton Stain¬
ers and Leaf-footed Plant-bugs among them.

The method used in collecting these


bugs was suggested by that formerly used in collecting the curculio from plum and peach trees. Large nets were made of muslin. These should be at least three feet in diameter and of equal depth. They have a short handle which extends across the diameter of the net to stiffen the rim which is of telephone wire. We first tried smaller nets but found them to be too small for rapid work.

One man can manipulate this net but two work to better advantage. One holds the net under a limb full of fruit and the other gives the limb a vigorous shake which causes the bugs to drop and roll to the bottom of the net. After the men had finished each tree the tip of the net with the contained bugs was dipped into a bucket of kerosene. This keeps the net constantly wet with kerosene.

In the above mentioned grove it cost be¬
tween thirty and seventy-five cents per acre to collect the bugs. A pair of men working together covered an acre in from one hour to 2p> hours according to the amount of fruit and the number of bugs present. The men cost $1.50 per day apiece. This is less than the cost of spray¬
ing would have been even had we a safe and effective insecticide. On larger trees with more bugs and fruit the cost would of course be greater but should in few cases cost more than $2.00 per acre, still much less than the cost of spraying. On large trees that do not have too many lipibs touching the ground and are not too close together to allow manipulation,
these nets should be made larger. We made some 6x12 ft. These were sus¬
pended from a light wooden frame some¬
what like those our grandmothers used


36


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


for making quilts or stretching curtains.
The longitudinal pieces projected out a couple of feet for handles. The nets were made full so that they sagged down two or three feet in the center. The cloth should be close woven canvas so that insecticide oil or kerosene can be placed in the bottom to provide a bath for the bugs. Some cotton waste to absorb the oil and roll around among the bugs is also efficient if remoistened occasionally and will not spill out as readily. It will re¬
quire two men to manipulate the bag and at least one other to shake the branches.
On large trees these will be more econom¬
ical than the smaller nets strung on wire.
The best way to use these large nets will be to work them in pairs, a net on each side of the tree and large enough so that the two together will cover the entire space under a tree. With two men to each net and three or four others to shake the tree the grove should be worked as rapidly as with the smaller nets and smaller trees, i. e., it should not take over two hours to cover an acre of fairly large seedling trees. Allowing 15c per hour for each man and 8 men in the gang, would bring the cost per acre to $2.40. As stated above, however, these large nets can be used only where the limbs are free of the ground. Moreover they are effective only at a temperature below 70 degrees F.
Above that the bugs will take to wing as they drop and before they hit the canvas.
The use of these large nets is therefore restricted to very early morning, to moon¬
light nights and to cold days, while the smaller nets can be used all day although


more effectively when the temperature is low.

But the old adage that an ounce of preventative is worth a pound of cure applies here. The attacks of these bugs are usually brought on either by allowing the cover crop of cowpeas, beggarweed, or velvet beans to remain on the ground too long; by lack of sufficient thoroughness in cutting (as by leaving uncut patches between the trees); or by the wrong method in cutting. The cover crop should be cut by the middle of September and the man with the scythe should precede rather than follow the mowing machine—i. e.,
the spaces about the trees and between the treees in the row should be cut first, leav¬
ing the middles to be cut later. There are but few winged adults at that season but many wingless nymphs which cannot fly nor crawl far. This method of cutting drives these young away from the trees into the middles and when the latter are mown most of the young bugs perish and there will be but few produced before cold weather puts an end to breeding.

Neglect of the cover crop does not by any means always result in an out¬
break of the bugs, other factors including enemies may enter to keep the bugs down,
but it may so result.

As a result of these tests I am satisfied that, once these bugs get into the trees they can be collected at a comparatively low cost per acre and that this is the most satisfactory method of dealing with them as far as our present knowledge goes.


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


37


SOME DISEASE PROBL EMS OF THE SEASON


H. E. Stevens


Mr. President, Ladies and Gentlemen:

Ordinarily the citrus grower has his attention reasonably well occupied in at¬
tempting to combat the various pests he finds in his grove. This season, how¬
ever, his problems will be greater and he will find that his labors have been in¬
creased many-fold. Owing to conditions that have come about within the last few weeks, it will be found necessary to give the citrus groves more than ordinary at¬
tention through the present season; not only in the matter of fertilizing and culti¬
vating the trees, but in keeping down in¬
sects and preventing as far as possible,
some of the more common diseases.

In many parts of the State citrus trees were severely injured by the low temper¬
ature that occurred in early February.
Heavy losses have been reported from some sections of the State and in general citrus trees have been greatly weakened through the effects of the freeze.

Trees in this condition will be more sus¬
ceptible to the attacks of certain fungi and unless they are given more than ordinary attention still greater losses are possible.
A considerable amount of pruning and spraying will be necessary to hold these diseases in check until the trees have re¬
covered their former vigor.

While I can hardly regard the recent freeze as a blessing in disguise, especially as to its ultimate effect on citrus diseases,
yet conditions were afforded in many in¬
stances whereby insect pests and fungus


diseases could have been completely erad¬
icated with but very little effort. Leaves and fruits affected with diseases and in¬
sect pests have been killed by the freezing temperature. Through defoliation and dropping of such fruits a large amount of infectious material has been carried out of the trees. If this has been properly disposed of, either burned or buried, a long step has been taken toward the erad¬
ication of such pests.

Again, the low temperatures have given a decided check to the development and spread of certain fungus diseases. This however, is only of a temporary nature.
As a rule fungus spores are not killed by freezing and they have withstood the low temperatures much better than the citrus tree. They will rapidly recover from their temporary set-back and they will be in an active state to affect the tree while it is still in a critical condition.

On the other hand the weakened condi¬
tion of the citrus tree as a result of the low temperatures will leave it more sus¬
ceptible to fungus attacks. The sudden checking of the growth, the loss of foli¬
age, and the large amount of dead wood and weakened branches, have all tended to make an enormous drain on the vitality of such trees. Unless this vitality is restor¬
ed as soon as possible, diseases will enter to further complicate mattters which may finally result in the destruction of many valuable trees, or in a greatly inferior crop of fruit.



38


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


I do not wish to infer that by building up or improving the vigor of the tree that diseases will be entirely avoided by this method. This is only the first step in the campaign of prevention. The coming citrus crop should be one of value and whether it is mainly a crop of culls or bright fruit will depend largely on how well the trees have been cared for and how well diseases have been kept under con¬
trol.

There are three diseases that should be kept prominently in mind during the present season. They are: Citrus Scab,
Melanose and Withertip. These will un¬
doubtedly give more or less trouble in all citrus groves and in many cases we may expect serious injury unless active means are taken for their prevention.
Scab may be considered more from the viewpoint of eradication and the ma¬
jor part of this work should have been accomplished sometime ago. In regard to Melanose and Withertip, the chief task will be prevention and this work should not be further delayed.

CITRUS SCAB.

(Cladosporium citri Mass.)

Citrus Scab is one of our common and well known fungus diseases. It is wide¬
ly distributed over the State and fre¬
quently causes serious loss to the grape¬
fruit crop. In this connection is has be¬
come a serious problem within the last few years. The disease attacks young succulent tissue, such as leaves, stems,
and fruits, forming characteristic scab¬
like masses or warty projections that are easily distinguished from injuries pro¬
duced by other agencies. In these inju¬


ries produced on leaves and stem, the fun¬
gus survives from one season to the next and in trees affected with Scab, there is always an abundance of the fungus pres¬
ent to cause a spread of the disease when favorable conditions appear. The age of the tissue and weather conditions have an important bearing on the development of
Citrus Scab. Only the young tender growth is affected and then only in the presence of a liberal supply of moisture.
Even in groves badly infected with the dis¬
ease, where new growth develops during periods of dry weather, little or no scab will be observed. Thus the disease is more or less sporadic in its occurrence,
becoming very destructive in some seasons and in others giving little or no trouble.

The period in which young growth is susceptible to attacks of scab is rather limited, probably not exceeding over six weeks. Leaves and twigs may become in¬
fected from the time they appear until the growth begins to harden. Fruits are probably susceptible from the time the bloom drops until six weeks or two months later. By protecting the foliage and fruits through the critical period with some good fungicide, the injury from scab may be largely avoided.

Probably no more favorable time could be found than the present season for the complete control or eradication of Citrus
Scab, especially in those groves where it has been troublesome in seasons past.
Where infected trees have been sufficient¬
ly injured by the cold to cause complete defoliation, much has already been ac¬
complished in the way of eradication. The fungus has been largely removed from such trees in the fallen leaves and fruits


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


39


and if this rubbish has been burned or plowed under a very great source of in¬
fection has been eliminated. However,
some of the fungus has remained in the infected terminal branches, and as spores on the surface of the bark, which may be¬
come a source for infecting the new growth. This will have to be taken care of by pruning out the dead wood and by the use of fungicides.

In many cases where trees were badly affected with the disease, the new growth that has put out since the freeze will be found comparativly free from Scab. This does not indicate a complete absence of the fungus, but rather the effect of the dry conditions under which such growth has developed. In such cases the fungus may remain quiescent or dormant until the rainy season and then attack a later flush of growth or any fruits that may develop from a June bloom. If a sufficient amount of June blossoms develop and it is desired to save the fruit it will be ad¬
visable to protect it through the danger period with some fungicide. This will apply particularly to those groves where scab has been troublesome in the past.
Probably three sprayings will be sufficient,
made at intervals of three weeks apart.
The first should be applied about the mid¬
dle of the blooming period, using the
Bordeaux Mixture of 3-3-50 strength.
The Ammoniacal Solution of Copper Car¬
bonate may be substituted for the Bor¬
deaux Mixture if it is so desired. The probable increase in scale insects must also be kept in mind and when these are observed to become numerous a contact insecticide will be necessary.

In seasons past, Citrus Scab has caused


much injury to the foliage of young grapefruit trees, those that have not yet come into bearing and those of more re¬
cent planting. Where such trees have been completely defoliated and all dead twigs have been removed the disease may be practically eradicated. However, if the new foliage shows evidence of scab it will be well worth the efforts to eradicate the diseases from such groves. This can probably be accomplished by thorough spraying throughout the season. An ap¬
plication of Bordeaux Mixture of 3-3-50
strength, once a month would be advisa¬
ble in order to protect the new growth that puts out. During the winter season all foliage showing infection should be re¬
moved and destroyed. Another thorough application of Bordeaux Mixture would be advisable before the new growth puts out in the spring.

MELANOSE.

(Phomopsis citri Fawcett.)

Melanose is another fungus disease that may cause serious trouble during the sea¬
son. It is probably more widely distri¬
buted than any other citrus disease and it is responsible for most of the unsightly fruit that is grown in the State. The dis¬
ease is found on all varieties of citrus of commercial importance, and it may be eas¬
ily recognized by the characteristic mark¬
ing produced on the surfaces of the parts affected. Melanose is too well known to need further description.

The disease causes the greatest loss through injury to citrus fruits. While this injury is entirely superficial and does not affect the quality of such fruits, it


40


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


makes them unsightly and greatly lessens their market value.

Melanose is similar to Citrus Scab in several respects, but quite different in gen¬
eral appearance. It attacks only the young growth or succulent tisse and such at¬
tacks never occur except when an abun¬
dance of moisture is present. Leaves and twigs are subject to attack during a com¬
paratively short time, from the time such growth appears until it begins to harden,
which may include a period of six weeks or less. Fruits, however, may be affected from the time the bloom drops until they are nearing maturity. In some of our experiments fruits resulting from a Feb¬
ruary bloom were affected with Melanose as late as the first of August. The long period of susceptibility of the fruits ex¬
poses them to severe attacks tlirougn tne rainy season and doubtless a large part of the Melanose injury occurs at this time.

The fungus that causes Melanose is found mainly in the dead parts of the citrus tree. Any dead wood in citrus trees from the smallest twigs to the larger branches may harbor and propagate the fungus from one season to the next. Dead fruit spurs and patches of dead bark on the trunks and larger branches are fre¬
quently filled with fruiting bodies of the fungus, forming infectious sources that are easily overlooked. The fungus does not grow or fruit in the tissue of the leaves and fruits affected by the disease,
and Melanose does not spread from the spots on such material as it is sometimes supposed to do. Melanose injury comes only from the spores of the fungus that are formed in the dead wood in citrus


trees, or indirectly from spores produced on decayed fruits beneath the trees.

In periods of wet weather these spores develop rapidly and very abundantly.
They are exuded in masses and are dis¬
tributed over the foliage by rains and heavy dews. Under such conditions on coming in contact with susceptible tissue,
either fruit or leaves, melanose injury re¬
sults within a period of twenty-four hours. The spots become visible three or four days later.

This production and distribution of spores takes place whenever there are pe¬
riods of rain, hence the fungus is active at frequent intervals throughout the year.
This has an important bearing on the con¬
trol of Melanose, especially in regard to the protection of the fruit. The foliage injury is of minor importance. Owing to the lengthy period during which fruits are suspectible to attack, it is necessary to protect them for several months in order to entirely avoid injury from Melanose.
For this reason it is difficult to outline a system of spraying that would be prac¬
ticable and at the same time effective in controlling the disease.

I rather doubt if Melanose can be com¬
pletely controlled or held sufficiently in check by spraying alone, except in a few special cases. To spray for complete pro¬
tection would require a number of spray¬
ings throughout the season and the cost of such operations would probably make them prohibitive. There are still other factors that would have to be considered.
Unless such sprayings were made in time and with sufficient frequency to protect the fruit very little good would be ac-


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


4i


complshed. Again spraying does not re¬
move the cause of the trouble and so long as the fungus remains in the trees there is a constant source from which the disease may spread at favorable opportunities.

It seems then that the most reasonable way to avoid trouble from Melanose would be to remove the cause as far as possible. By pruning out and destroying the dead wood the fungus may be largely eliminated from citrus trees. If the prun¬
ing is continued each season the trees may be kept reasonably free from dead wood at a cost that should not be very great. In our pruning experiments we have ob¬
tained from two to four times as much bright fruit from trees in which the dead wood has been kept down to a minimum as was obtained from trees that were not pruned. We have not been able to pre¬
vent Melanose entirely even by pruning,
but we have increased the percentage of bright fruit and greatly improved the ap¬
pearance of that which was infected over the fruit obtained from our check trees.
It is possible that spraying made in con¬
nection with pruning would give more satisfactory results. This will apply more particularly to those groves in which
Melanose is abundant. Whether the pruning has been made during the winter or summer season a thorough clean-up spray should be given the trees just be¬
fore the new growth appears in the spring.
Either Bordeaux Mixture 3-3-50 strength,
or the Ammoniacal Solution of Copper
Carbonate may be used. This spraying will take care of the spores that have lodged on the foliage and on the surface of the bark. Such a program may be satisfactory during any normal season,


but at present conditions are quite differ¬
ent.

The Melanose fungus has probably never been more abundant in citrus trees than we find at this season, especially in localities where it was formerly prevalent.
In general all citrus trees contain an unu¬
sual amount of dead wood as a result of the freeze, and there has been an enor¬
mous development of the fungus in this during the past few weeks. Dead twigs and branches and patches of dead bark on the limbs and trunks are filled with fruit¬
ing bodies of the fungus. In fact any dead wood associated with the citrus tree seems to contain a maximum amount of this fungus. Trees that have set fruit will not mature a single bright fruit if allowed to go through the rainy season in this condi¬
tion. Unless this dead wood is removed and extra precautions are taken, Florida has the prospect this season of producing the largest cull crop in its history. This unusual fungus development indicates trouble ahead and the situation is probably more serious than we realize. The ab¬
sence of Melanose injury on foliage that has developed since the freeze is no as¬
surance of safety from further trouDie,
for this is due to weather conditions rath¬
er than absence of cause. When injury does become evident it will be too late for remedial measures as far as the present citrus crop is concerned.

As a means of prevention, I can only suggest that such trees be cleaned up as soon as possible. Pruning should be done immediately for a delay now only further endangers the crop and may result in a more weakened condition of the trees.
A thorough pruning is necessary to re-






42


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


move all dead twigs and branches and any sickly or weakened growth. Large patches of dead bark or inner branches should also be removed as far as it is possible to do so. This rubbish should be removed from the groves and burned as it may prove a source of future infec¬
tion if allowed to remain under the trees.
In many cases a thorough application of
Bordeaux Mixture would be advisable,
following the pruning especially where trees have set fruit. This should be made as a clean-up spray and the inner branches should be well covered with the fungicide as well as the foliage.

In extreme cases further spraying may be necessary. Trees that have been badly injured may contain many small patches of dead bark on the inner branches which are filled with the fungus and these may become active centers in spreading the disease. Such patches may not be easily detected and they will be difficult to handle under the most favorable circumstances.
If the inner branches of such trees can be kept covered with a fungicide during the rainy season the injury from such sources may be largely avoided. This would probably require a thorough application of
Bordeaux Mixture 4-4-50 strength,
once a month during the rainy season,
applied only to the interior of the trees and avoiding the outer twigs and foliage as much as possible. This system of spraying, however, will invite trouble from scale insects and it may be made use of only in extreme cases. There are many groves in which a thorough prun¬
ing may keep the disease sufficiently in


check and there are others in which more drastic measures will be necessary.

In general I would suggest that a thorough pruning be made at once to re¬
move all dead wood from the trees and that an application of Bordeaux Mixture should follow immediately as a means of disinfecting the same.

WITHERTIP

(Colletotrichum gloeosporioides Penz.)

In conjunction with other troubles,
Withertip will also do its share of injury to citrus trees during the present season.
This is a fungus disease that kills the twigs and branches and it often causes serious damage when it becomes fully es¬
tablished in the citrus tree. The fungus is a weak parasite and attacks only trees of low vitality or those that have been severely injured. Owing to their weak¬
ened condition, citrus trees will be very susceptible to attacks of Withertip for several months and trees that have been severely injured by the cold will require extra care during this period.

By improving the vigor of such trees,
much can be done to prevent attacks of
Withertip. Where the disease has es¬
tablished itself in the tree a thorough pruning will be‘necessary to eradicate it following about the same method that has been advised for Melanose. Trees that have been pruned for the disease should be watched through the season and if Withertip becomes active again, further pruning will be necessary.


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


43


Discussion

Mr. -: Does the ammoniated

copper carbonate answer the purpose of
Bordeaux Mixture in the case mentioned ?

Mr. Stevens: The ammoniacal solu¬
tion of copper carbonate is about as good a fungicide as Bordeaux, but it does not stick so well.

Mr. Hume: Perhaps we had better have Dr. Berger’s paper. Knowing about what Dr. Berger’s paper is to be, I
think it very advisable to have it just at this time.

Dr. Berger: The subject I am going to discuss, and the results of the experi¬
ments I have carried on, will perhaps an¬
swer a few questions of Professor Stev¬
ens’ paper.

Prof. Stevens has stated that the in¬
side of a tree, for instance, having mela-
nose, should be kept well covered with a fungicide. To do that with Bordeaux,
you have to re-spray every few weeks.
What I have found out is this: by mixing a small amount of linseed oil with your


Bordeaux, you will find it will stick very much longer than will the Bordeaux by itself. I used the 5-5-20 Bordeaux; it is a little more than double strength, mixing three per cent, of linseed oil with it, and the Bordeaux would stick for four or five months.

You can see the advantage of that right through in the way of protecting the fruit,
also.

Of course, you do not want the Bor¬
deaux to stick forever on the fruit, be¬
cause you are going to want that fruit to present the best appearance possible when the time comes to- sell that fruit.
But if you apply Bordeaux to fruit the size of walnuts, apply it, say, in May, you will have June, July, August, September,
October, November and December to let it stay there and then bring out your fruit bright, even if you do have to put it through a washing machine. Of course,
that is only a suggestion.

The original object of carrying on any experiments was another one. I was looking for something to mix with the
Bordeaux to kill insects.






Linseed Oil Bordeaux


E. W. Berger, Entomologist State Plant Board


THE MIXTURE

Mr. President, Ladies and Gentlemen :

In an attempt to solve the problem of a mixture that would serve effectively as a fungicide and insecticide, three per cent raw linseed oil was mixed with strong bordeaux (double strength and stronger).
Such a mixture is easily made by simply stirring the oil into the bordeaux, or in case of small quantities shaking them to¬
gether in a closed vessel.

Linseed oil was used because it was known that some water will mix with paint, which is a mixture of linseed oil and a pigment; and it was found that, in¬
versely, small quantities of oil would mix with bordeaux, this being practically a cold-water paint. The fact that linseed oil is a drying oil, i. e., hardens and forms a dry film over any surface to which it is ap¬
plied, furthermore suggested the possibil¬
ity that it might serve as a “sticker' to stick the bordeaux more or less firmly to the plants to which it is applied, and keep it from being so readily removed by the rains.

EXPERIMENTS

Two satsuma orange trees, six rose bushes, two persimmon trees, a fig tree,
a grapevine, and the trunks and larger limbs of three peach trees, were sprayed with several strengths of bordeaux, into


which three per cent raw linseed oil had been incorporated as indicated in the pre¬
ceding paragraphs. This was on August
8, ii and 12, 1915.

The object of the experiments was to determine what effect the mixture would have on San Jose scale infesting the peach trees, on purple scale and whitefly
(Aleyrodes citri) infesting the satsumas,
and on the foliage of the several trees and bushes sprayed. Its effect on the sooty mold, which always accompanies white-
fly, and on a leaf fungus commonly found infecting leaves of fig trees, was also to* be determined, as well as the sticking* quali¬
ties of the mixture.

results

The effect of the mixture on the in¬
sects was not conclusive and it may be necessary to increase the amount of oil or add other oils in order to perfect its in¬
secticidal properties.

The effect of the linseed oil as a “stick¬
er," however, stood out pre-eminently,
the bordeaux remaining visible on the leaves and bark for five to six months and longer. That the results with the linseed oil as a sticker were not accidental was shown by several checks (2 rose bushes and a peach tree) that were sprayed at the same time with fresh bordeaux with¬
out the addition of the oil. When almost


44



FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


45


every trace of bordeaux had vanished from these checks, the other trees treated with the linseed oil bordeaux appeared as if they had been freshly sprayed.

The efficiency of the bordeaux appear¬
ed not to have been diminished in the least by the addition of the oil. For in¬
stance, the leaves of fig trees generally be¬
come diseased by a fungus and shed early,
but in this instance the sprayed foliage of the fig tree remained comparatively healthy and on the tree until killed by frost,
about the middle of December, by which time all other trees observed in town had lost their foliage, some much earlier.
This tree was not sprayed during 1916,
when its foliage became diseased and be¬
gan to drop in September. Again, the two satsuma trees sprayed with the lin¬
seed oil bordeaux did not have much whitefly upon them at the time they were sprayed (August, 1915), but became heavily infested during September and October, principally from the swarms of this insect that emanate from the china-
berry trees in town at that time. The leaves of the new growth that had put out after the trees were sprayed became black with the sooty mold, that always accom¬
panies infestation by whitefly, but the older leaves that were covered with the bordeaux never showed more than a trace of it.

Injury to foliage was not noted except on the fig tree, when the drip from leaves above was concentrated on one or sever¬
al spots of leaves lower down.

MISCELLANEOUS RESULTS AND EXPLANA¬
TIONS

The bordeaux used was made fresh each time, except one lot of two gallons


that had been prepared two weeks pre¬
viously. This old bordeaux was mixed with three per cent linseed oil just before using and was applied as readily as fresh bordeaux and appeared to stick as well.
It had a decidedly transparent appear¬
ance, however, after drying, as compared with freshly made bordeaux. I am not aware that this fact is of any significance and a repetition of the experiment may show it up differently. The tempera¬
ture at the time of applying also seemed to influence the appearance of freshly made linseed oil bordeaux on the trees.

Another interesting observation, and probably important, was made with this old bordeaux: about one-half pint of it with three per cent linseed oil was shaken together in a narrow bottle and another one-half pint without oil, was shaken in another bottle of the same kind at the same time.

After allowing five minutes' time for the bordeaux in each bottle to settle, the settled bordeaux in the bottle with oil occupied about 1-3 of the depth of the mixture in the bottle, while in the bottle without oil it occupied only 1-6, indicat¬
ing a decided influence of the oil on the settling properties of bordeaux.

Raw linseed oil was used because a sup¬
ply was at hand, but boiled oil is believed to be just as good, if not better, and should dry quicker, a matter of some im¬
portance when it is necessary to make ap¬
plications of bordeaux between rains.
The writer has simply not found time to make tests with boiled oil. Three per cent oil was taken because that quantity appeared sufficient, but less may serve as







46


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


a sticker and more will probably be nec¬
essary to kill insects.

The bordeaux used was mixed in lots of 2, 3 and 4 gallons at a time.

Several strengths of bordeaux were used but none weaker than about double strength (5-5-20). Other strengths used were 5-5-13.5 (bordeaux 2 weeks old) ; 5-
5-10; 5-5-15. It is intended to conduct ex¬
periments with weaker mixtures as soon as time permits. The stronger mixtures were chosen because it was believed that the oil would more readily mix with them, which is probably the case, and as the mixture of bordeaux is weakened it may be found that a limit will be reached at which little or no oil will mix with it,
unless it should prove to be a fact that even pure water will take up some of the oil.

COST

The cost of bordeaux is of course very
• high now on account of the high cost of copper sulphate. The addition of linseed oil at the rate of three per cent about doubled the cost of 5-5-20 bordeaux when copper sulphate was 10c per lb., and lime ic. per lb. This doubled cost, however,
should be more than offset by the length of time the linseed oil bordeaux will re¬
main on the foliage. With copper sul¬
phate three and four times the cost pre¬
viously indicated, the proportional in¬
crease by the addition of oil is of course less. It is probable, however, that one per cent or per cent oil can be mixed with regular strength bordeaux (5-5-40
or 5-5-50) which would cheapen the pro¬
duct somewhat, and probably be sufficient as a “sticker.”

It should be added here, that in case


sufficient oil should not properly mix with regular strength bordeaux, which would be explained by the lack of sufficient solid material in the mixture necessary to as¬
sist in holding the oil in suspension, that additional quantities of lime, perhaps 2 or
3 times as much as is indicated in the for¬
mulas for bordeaux, may probably be added to make up this deficiency. Again,
less oil may serve quite as well as a stick¬
er, especially on potatoes and other vege¬
tables where it is not necessary to have the bordeaux stick so long, but where it is still necessary to use something to keep it from being washed off by rain.

Finally, in regard to cost, each grower must decide for himself whether the ad¬
ditional cost of the oil is worth while;
and whether using the oil as a sticker will save him an additional spraying or two.

uses

The experiments conducted indicate that linseed oil bordeaux can be applied to all kinds of plants without serious injury,
though there may be exceptions. It is be¬
lieved to be especially useful on citrus trees where a long-sticking bordeaux is needed, and on potatoes and other vege¬
tables where a sticker, to keep the rains from washing it off, is desirable. At this time the writer cannot advise wheth¬
er or not powdered sulphur can also be added to this mixture, but it is his belief that it can. This point can readily be de¬
termined by each grower for himself.
The addition of about two pounds of powdered sulphur to each 50 gallons of the mixture should serve at the same time to assist in the control of mites, such as rust mite, red spider, purple mite, etc.


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


47


The addition of arsenical poisons, where it is necessary to also control leaf-eating insects, is also suggested.

NEED OF A DOUBLE SPRAY

The need of a double spray has long been apparent to the writer, and the pre¬
ceding account is a brief record of his efforts to solve the problem. By a double spray is meant one that would serve both as an insecticide and a fungicide. Citrus growers especially need to spray more and more with fungicides on account of melanose, scab and withertip, and in do¬
ing so frequently have to follow up this spraying with an insecticide in order to control scale insects and whiteffies. If the control of the diseases and insects could be accomplished in one spraying a great saving would result. In this respect the preceding experiments can only be re¬
garded as preliminary, since the results obtained against insects were inconclus¬
ive. But a beginning has been made, and the writer hopes that the mixture experi¬
mented with can be perfected as an insec¬
ticide, especially against scales and white-
fly.

The writer is not the first one to at¬
tempt the perfection of a double spray,
but the products obtained have not come into general use. Thus soap and bor¬


deaux have been mixed and used with some degree of success; lime-sulphur solution also has both fungicidal and in¬
secticidal properties, but is useful only against a few fungi and scale insects of the armored group with a waxy covering.

Bordeaux being the standard fungi¬
cide, and emulsions of oils the standard insecticides, the difficulty encountered is that these two mixtures cannot be com¬
bined because the bordeaux breaks up the soap of the emulsions, resulting in the liberation of free oil. The problem therefore resolved itself into the possibil¬
ity of combining an oil directly with the bordeaux, as explained.

The results with the linseed oil as .a
“sticker” for the bordeaux are believed to- be important and it is hoped will prove useful.


Discussion

Mr. Hume: I have seen the work which Dr. Berger has been carrying on;
in fact, I have been conversant with it for a good many months, and I believe Dr.
Berger has found one of the most impor¬
tant things that have come up on the making of spraying mixtures, for a long time. Of course, he has not worked out all of the details, but he has given us the basis for a very great improvement.







Citrus Canker Condition


Frank Stirling


Mr. Hume: We will now take up the regular program for this evening. I am sorry to say that Professor Wilmon New¬
ell, the Plant Commissioner, will be un¬
able to be here this evening. Owing to the crisis in legislative matters, it was necessary for him to remain in Gaines¬
ville, so that he might be a little closer to
Tallahassee. But he has arranged for another gentleman to fill his place. The man who is to take his place needs no in¬
troduction from me.

We are now going to learn something of the general citrus canker condition in the state from Mr. Frank Stirling. (Ap¬
plause.)

Mr. Stirling: We have been engaged in the work of eradicating this disease from Florida now for almost three years;
in fact three years ago next month the work of eradicating the disease was first taken up by the Florida Growers and
Shippers League under Mr. Lloyd S.
Tenny and Dr. E. W. Berger, at that time the State Inspector of nursery stock.

In May of 1914, it was known that the disease was present in Florida, but not known to what extent. One inspector at that time was employed to make a survey and find out just how far citrus canker had spread. In May, this one inspector found 108 grove trees on eight properties,
infected. The next month he found 160;


the next month 275. The number of properties increased, and the number of grove trees increased in proportion.

The growers at that time took the mat¬
ter up themselves to arrange to employ more men to put on this work, and as a result, in August, 1313 infections were found.

As a result of employing these extra men, the number of infections dropped so that in October only 565 were found.

Now, take each month by itself, and you will find that the cankers found dur¬
ing any one particular year, was about the same in the month of one year that it was in the month of last year, in propor¬
tion. For instance, in August, 1914, the largest number of infections was found for that year. The same was true of

I 9 I 5*

The State Plant Board was created and the Florida Plant Act came into ef¬
fect in the spring of 1915. By that time the work had reached to such a state that we could get at it with some degree of in¬
telligence learned from our experience.
Prior to that time no knowledge of the disease or how to handle it had been reached, but after that time, after the
State Plant Board came into existence and the work was handled by that body,
the work was carried on with more or less knowledge of how to handle it.

48



FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


49


In the winter one year ago, it dropped to a very low mark; 21 in February and
March, and 49 in April. These few in¬
fections which showed up were not be¬
cause the canker was not there, but be¬
cause of the very unfavorable conditions for the disease to develop so that it could be located by the inspectors.

The lowest line reached was February of this year, when only four infections were found in the entire state. (Ap¬
plause).

On new growth coming out in March,
some infections were found. But consid¬
er that twenty-two counties of the state have been infected and there have been almost seven thousand acres of citrus groves in Florida that have been infected,
and nine grove trees is a very shall num¬
ber.

There have been 443 groves, or proper¬
ties having citrus that have been infected one time or another since the work began back in May of 1914.

First, I will state that when a property or a grove in Florida has been infected with citrus canker, that grove is watched continually; it is inspected regularly; in fact, there is hardly a day passes but what one or more inspectors are watching and inspecting that grove. When the disease has been supposedly eradicated in that particular grove to such an extent that the Plant Board of Florida believes the disease is entirely wiped out from that property, the Plant Board removes the quarantine surrounding that property.

I will go back a little further and state that immediately upon the property be¬
coming infected with this disease, a quar¬
antine automatically applies. That quar¬


antine has reference to the movement of any nursery stock, not only to that prop¬
erty but from within one mile of that property. It has also a bearing upon how the owners of that property conduct them¬
selves in going from that property to an¬
other property; in other words, that quar¬
antine*^ meant to prevent the dissemina¬
tion of the disease from that infected property to a healthy grove, just as a doc¬
tor would quarantine a house wherein there is a case of smallpox.

Now, as I told you before, 443 proper¬
ties have been infected in Florida, scat¬
tered throughout twenty-two counties.
The Plant Board has removed the quar¬
antine from 306 of those properties.
Some months the Plant Board removes the quarantine from a dozen properties;
sometimes one or two ; sometimes several months will elapse without removing a single quarantine. It depends, of course,
upon conditions.

Last month there were but nine infec¬
tions, and the month previous but four in¬
fections. But do not lose sight of the fact that even if there is only one infec¬
tion found in the whole state of Florida,
canker is still a menace to the citrus in¬
dustry of the state. That one infection would prove that it has not yet been erad¬
icated.

We believe we have found all of the canker centers in Florida, but when you stop to consider what an enormous pro¬
blem it is to inspect every citrus tree in the state of Florida, we do not know that we have. There are 300,000 acres of citrus plantings in Florida, at least. It would take an army of 500 men several years to inspect every tree and discover


50


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


the canker as it develops. We think we have located all of the canker infections;
that is, the centers. Where we are find¬
ing canker now is in the old sore spots in the old locations where canker has been present, and we have fought it, and fought it, but once in awhile it breaks out anew.
We may think we have it eradicated and inspect it daily or weekly for a year and think it is entirely cleaned out, and then suddenly it will break out.

If we have already eradicated the dis¬
ease from three-fourths of the properties in Florida; if we have already located the last center of infection; if we still con¬
tinue the process of eradication for the next two years, making the same record we have in the past two years, it looks as though eradication would be accomplish¬
ed at the end of another two years. (Ap¬
plause ).


DISCUSSION

Mr. M. E. Gillett; I would like to ask the gentlemen if canker has ever appear¬
ed again in any of the groves from which the quarantine has been removed.

Mr. Stirling. Of the 306 properties from which the quarantine has been re¬
moved, there have been three properties that have shown infection; but we are not sure that the canker was present in that property at the time the quarantine was removed. One of them, for instance,
was very close to another section which was infected and it is very probable that the disease was carried into that property from the diseased grove in proximity. A
grove, of course, can be infected again and again.

The other two re-infections were simi¬
lar.


Report of Citrus Canker Committee


D. Collins Gillett, L. B. Skinner, Dr. J. H. Ross, Lloyd S. Tenny, W. J.

Kroom.


Mr. Hume: A little while ago we had some information as to where we had ar¬
rived in the citrus canker fight. To car¬
ry on this bit of warfare it has been nec¬
essary to have funds, and funds in large amounts, and the man who has had the most to do with getting those funds

wherewith to save the citrus industrv of

*

Florida, is going to speak to us right now.

I am pleased to introduce to you, Mr.
Collins Gillett. (Applause).

Mr. Gillett. Mr. President, members of the Florida State Horticultural Society and citizens of West Palm Beach. Owing to my extreme modesty and the great pride I take in my own committee, and as an evidence of your very good judg¬
ment, I ask, Mr. President, that the members of the Citrus Canker Committee who are present, come up and be shown.

Mr. Hume: My observation of that
Citrus Canker Committee is that the mem¬
bers of it are very backward. (Laugh¬
ter). Now, Dr. Ross, Mr. Skinner, Mr.
Tenney and Mr. Krome, will you please come up? If necessary, we will bring you up. (Laughter and applause).

Mr. Gillett: First, as chairman of the
Citrus Canker Committee, I desire to thank the members of this Society and the growers of the State of Florida at large, not only for their unqualified and


undivided support whenever it has been needed, but also for the very generous manner in which funds with which we might carry on this fight, have been fur¬
nished.

The subject of citrus canker is one which has been freely discussed before meetings in the past, and there is very little I can add to what you already know,
with the exception of what has occurred in the way of appropriations from Con¬
gress and those now pending before the
State Legislature of Florida.

In 1915, we received from the Federal
Government, $550,000 with which to car¬
ry on this fight. In the Agricultural Bill which passed the Senate thirty minutes before it adjourned on March 4th of this year, $430,000 additional was therein included. $180,000 of that sum was pro¬
vided for carrying on the work without
State participation until the first of July next, at which time $250,000 becomes available when the states in which citrus canker is prevalent have appropriated an equal amount. Of the $250,000 the De¬
partment of Agriculture has said that
$150,000 shall be expended in Florida from July 1st next until the following
July. They have further stated that when Florida appropriates $150,000 to meet that sum, they will then in their next


Si





52


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


agricultural bill include a like amount,
provided Florida meets them; in other words, the Federal Government says,
“We will put up $300,000 for the next two years’ fight beginning July 1st, when
Florida has appropriated a like sum."

They could very properly say, the Gov¬
ernment will not put up any more money with which to carry on this fight until
Florida has appropriated what the Gov¬
ernment has expended in the past for which no such funds have been available.
On the first of next July, there will have been expended in Florida from Govern¬
ment funds, $740,000. “Now,” they say,
“We are willing to forget the past; we will simply wipe that off the Board, but from July 1st next, we will travel along horse and horse.”

You cannot deny that this is a most lib¬
eral policy. It is a policy which has never before been established by the govern¬
ment. In all eradication measures in which they have heretofore participated in the eradication of diseases among ani¬
mals, and even in the eradication of dis¬
eases among men, they have required cer¬
tain state participation, and those moneys have had to be appropriated and available for expenditure before the treasury of the
Government was available for use.

We were met with this problem when we went to Washington a year ago last December, and on every occasion since that time; the one question in the minds of the Federal Government has been, “What has Florida done, and what will she do when her next Legislature meets?” Our representation in Con¬
gress have appeared before the Congres¬
sional Committee time and time again,


and on every occasion they have made the strongest representation that our Leg¬
islature met only on alternate years; that when they last met they appropriated
$125,000, which was all we asked for at that time, and that if the Government in this emergency would step in and take up this fight until our Legislature did meet,
then Florida would not be found wanting in doing her full duty.

This is the first time in the history of this country that the eradication of a plant disease has ever been undertaken,
and it will be the first time it has ever been successfully accomplished. (Ap¬
plause).

Just for a moment suppose the same energy and the same amount of money had been expended at the beginning of the infestation of boll weevil in this country,
and see that thousands and hundreds of thousands of dollars the growers in this state would have put in their pockets if we had taken the whitefly or any other of the numerous insects and pests which cost us so much money, not to eradicate but to cure and control.

In approaching this subject, there are three definite conclusions which we must accept as final; first, citrus canker can be eradicated. This has been proven be¬
yond controversy. Second, if citrus can¬
ker is not eradicated, our properties will be confiscated; third, it will take approxi¬
mately two years more to accomplish this work, as best we can obtain from those in authority who have knowledge of the situation.

We are asking the Legislature of the
State of Florida to appropriate $150,000
per annum for two years to meet the ob-


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


53


ligation which the government is placing upon us to put Florida in a position be¬
fore this Government which she should occupy in view of the very strong pledges our senators and congressmen have made for us, and which certainly cannot be ov¬
erlooked.

We have presented this subject to Tal¬
lahassee. The members of this Commit¬
tee were there at the opening of the ses¬
sion. I do not know whether it is for¬
tunate or unfortunate, but we had our bill introduced early and it was the first ap¬
propriation measure that came up in the
Legislature.

When it came up in the Senate, it passed the second reading without amend¬
ment and we rejoiced, as it looked as though the bill would go through with¬
out amendment, or molestation in any way.

Upon the following day, when the bill was up for third reading and final pass¬
age, there was introduced into the Senate what has been termed the “Safety Valve”
resolution, which provides that no bill should be considered or passed providing for appropriation prior to the first day of
May.

Unfortunately, the resolution was in¬
troduced just after the roll call; many of the senators did not understand it, and it carried. Immediately following, Senator
Wells, Chairman of the Appropriation
Committee before whom this Committee had appeared, and which Appropriation
Committee had reported unanimously in favor of the bill, objected seriously to this resolution, stating that it was unfair to a man who introduced a bill that his meas¬
ure should be put off until May when oth¬


er resolutions and bills calling for appro¬
priation would be put in, and he moved a reconsideration. His motion was lost.

Every day in the Senate until yester¬
day, for four or five sessions, this matter has been under discussion. Unfortu¬
nately, the citrus canker appropriation be¬
ing up and ready for the third reading, in almost every discussion it has brought out a debate on the merits of the bill. We are unable to do anything about it; the only thing we can say is that every mem¬
ber of the Senate will certainly know ev¬
erything about it for it is up for debate every day. We have yet to hear one senator raise his voice in opposition to the bill. There are many who voted for a postponement of the consideration of the bill for the purpose of determining the amount of appropriations which would be offered to the Senate and obtain some idea of the revenues, but so far as this
Committee is able to judge, our measure in the Senate of this Legislature is in very safe hands.

We have thought it best not to press the measure in the House until we can get action in the Senate, for the reason that if it goes to the House as a Senate meas¬
ure, having passed that body it would have a certain prestige which we need in the House.

When we presented this subject to the
Congress of the Nation, during a time when great questions were being consid¬
ered, when appropriations of millions of dollars were being asked for prepared¬
ness, we had no divided House.

Every item we have secured from Con¬
gress but one, has been in a bill subject to a point of order, which means it was not


54


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


a majority, but had to be a unanimous vote. If any one member had voted against it, our item would have been lost.
Our first $300,000 was in the De¬
ficiency Bill. It had absolutely no right whatever in that bill. If any member had objected, it would have been thrown out. It passed unanimously. Our item of $430,000 in the Agricultural Bill ; one man could have raised his voice and the item would have been thrown out, and lost.

I wish the members of our Legislature in Tallahassee could have heard such statesmen as Hon. Joseph G. Cannon, or
Congressman Mann or McLaughlin, liv¬
ing in states where the citrus tree cannot be grown and never will be, where there was no possible benefit to come to their constituency by supporting this case, and if anybody had a right to object and raise a voice against the measure, it was those men, but as I say, we had no divided house.

Now, here we come down at home, in
Florida, among our own people, and a few persons in the Legislature in Talla¬
hassee are raising some opposition to this measure. Not because they are opposed to the citrus growers having it, but op¬
posed to the increased taxation being bur¬
dened on their constituency in the non¬
citrus-producing counties.

They raise the argument that boll wee¬
vil has invaded their fields and the cotton crops are gone; that they are a poor coun¬
ty. Well, my friends, if that is not a warning to those people to get busy and protect the biggest industry they have in the State, what more do they need to wake them up? (Applause).


The state of Florida divided into citrus and non-citrus counties, would make a very interesting tabulation for us. It is a fact that of the 6J4 millage assessment two years ago, citrus-producing counties paid 76 per cent of that tax. The non¬
producing counties paid 24 per cent, but still they object to giving us this appro¬
priation from the general treasury of the state.

It would be a unanimous measure if the members of this Committee would agree to an amendment of that Bill providing for a box tax. There is not a member of the House and Senate but would advocate it if we would agree to that. But we have taken this position; the great burden of eradication of citrus canker to date has fallen on the grower. It may sur¬
prise you to learn that nearly 3,000,000
grove trees have been destroyed since the fight began, which are worth easily $1,-
000,000. Before the fight is over, it is estimated that another million dollars worth of trees must be destroyed. I
mean healthy trees; diseased trees have no value.

If we had gone to Tallahassee and asked the Legislature not only to provide the money to carry on this fight, but reim¬
burse us for the value of the property de¬
stroyed, then the subject of a box tax might be one for discussion.

The Government is paying one-half of the cost of this eradication. We are ask¬
ing the state to pay the other half. The grower is taking his medicine and saying nothing.

I submit that as a fair proposition. I
submit that the benefit which will accrue to that part of the state in which citrus


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


55


has not been grown but which may be grown, more than offsets the 24 per cent or 25 per cent of this amount for which we are asking.

I made a tabulation of what certain counties to the northwest would pay, and
I remember one county would pay $420.00
per year for two years to vote for this ap¬
propriation.

The members of this Committee who have been in Tallahassee cannot conceive of the narrowness of some of the mem¬
bers of the Legislature, and with few ex¬
ceptions we believe that when this subject is presented to- them so that when they have an opportunity to consider it from their own view point and from ours, that when the vote is taken, the measure will be passed.

We are not sure, however. We still need help. The growers of this state can do for us what the members of this
Committee cannot do-. Every member of the House and Senate from South Florida and every citrus county in Florida, are solid to a man on this measure. But let¬
ters, telegrams and personal appeals from you, and you, and you, and you, to your delegation there, is what will bring this through. If you will impress upon those members of the House that represent your county, and upon the senators who represent your District, how vital this is,
what it means to the State, and do not take it for granted that they know how you feel about it, you can do your part to put this bill through. If you have al¬
ready told them, tell them again. There is safety in numbers, and the more letters they get, the more telegrams they get, if they are friends of the industry, and you


know they are going to vote for it, it will make them get out and go to work on those who are doubtful, and they are the people we must win.

There is no doubt in my mind but that we are going to have that $300,000; how we are going to- get it no man here can tell, but with that, and what it will bring from the Government and with tfie assist¬
ance of our growers, I feel safe in saying that you will soon be relieved of the nec¬
essity of coming here every year and hearing citrus canker discussed, for I
know it shall be driven from our borders;
we have it on the run now. It is only a matter of 'a little more time and a little more money to complete the work, and then our state will bloom as never before.

Tomorrow morning we are to have with us members of the Farm Loan Board who are coming here for the purpose of trying to determine the valuation they shall place on citrus properties. If citrus canker is driven from our state, I will venture the statement that the day will come when Florida and California will have a monopoly of the citrus industry of the world. The sooner we get it out, the more stable our values and if we do not get it out I do not believe the Farm Loan
Board will be seeking loans in Florida much longer.

Look at the great state of California.
They were wise enough to surround themselves with adequate laws, which
Florida has done, but they took the fur¬
ther precaution to provide the means to enforce those laws, which Florida has not done, and to-day they enjoy an enviable position in this fight. But still the solid
California delegation in the House and



56


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


Senate at Washington, stood by Florida in this fight for federal funds; not be¬
cause they loved us, particularly, although
I believe they feel kindly toward us, but they knew if citrus canker was not eradi¬
cated from Florida and the other Gulf states, that there is no wall they can build high enough around California to keep it out, and it was a precautionary measure looking to the preservation of their own industry.

We have been told there are areas in
China much larger than the citrus area in
Florida, where citrus has not been grown for fifty years on account of the citrus canker. We are also told it is spreading all over the Orient, and unless adequate laws are made it will finally get into the
West Indies, and when that comes to pass if we have accomplished the great task we have undertaken, it will stand out as the first time it has ever been accomplished.
It is a preparedness measure.

Look at the British Government; at a time when it is piling up billions and bil¬
lions of dollars of indebtedness, within the past three months it has found citrus canker in South Africa. It is spending money to eradicate it in South Africa be¬
cause they know it is an economic ques¬
tion; that they must do it to preserve their industry. But here in Florida, with more than $2,000,000 of money and prop¬
erty already poured into this fight, with the end in sight, are we going to be halted because a few of our legislators have de¬
veloped a sectional feeling? Is this feel¬
ing going to cause us at this time to fail in the duty that devolves upon Florida to meet the appropriation as prescribed by the government? If we do fail—well,


speaking for the chairman of the Com¬
mittee, he doubts if he can ever stop in the capitol again, and there are some oth¬
er members who had better not try it,
either.

We feel as though there may be some thought or ideas or suggestions in this body regarding this work, and if so we would like very much to hear from you,
because we are almost through, and we must win this fight at Tallahassee. (Ap¬
plause).

It is my understanding that the Legis¬
lative Committee has a resolution to offer.

Mr. Hume: We will call for the re¬
port of the Legislative Committee at this time.

Mr. M. E. Gillett: The matter of citrus canker has been talked about so much, I think we are all pretty well satu¬
rated with it. I know I am, so much so that whenever I go around a spray wagon,
I dodge for fear some fire will come out of it. (Laughter). I will promise not to talk as long as my son has.

It seemed appropriate to the Committee that with the Legislature in session and the discussion of this measure being had from day to day, that a resolution be of¬
fered to this Society for its endorsement.

As you have been told by the Chair¬
man of the Committee, the fight is on in
Tallahassee. They have had a hearing before both Committees of the House and
Senate and the Bill has been passed on favorably. Had this been done in Wash¬
ington, I am reliably informed that there would be no question about its passage when it came up before the House and
Senate, because they have great faith in their Committees. They realize at these


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


57


hearings the Committee has a much better opportunity to question the men who ap¬
pear before it and determine the merit or demerit of the appropriation asked for.
Then if it is reported favorably and unanimously it is very rare that the bill is not passed; if it is reported unfavorably,
it is very rare that the bill passes.

This has been reported favorably by both these committees, but we have been told, in fact it has been published in the press, that certain people, one man espec¬
ially, propose to fight it. He says he will fight the fight of his life.

We hope he will survive, because I be¬
lieve, as the Committee believes, that this
Legislature of ours cannot fail to pass a measure of this kind.

They claim that West Florida would receive no benefit, and that does seem to me the most absurd claim a man could advance. When I read that, I thought what a good thing it was a man could not grow to be the size of Florida. If he were to cut off his thumb, his right foot might object to carrying his body in the direction of a physician because it had not been damaged or hurt in any way. But if gangrene set in because of lack of prop¬
er attention to the thumb, and the man died, perhaps the right foot might think it was concerned in the injury to the thumb after all.

We feel that a resolution from this
Society is distinctly in order. (Reads resolution).

Whereas : The citrus growers of Flori¬
da have for the past two years, in con¬
junction with the Federal Government,
been waging a desperate fight with citrus canker—the worst pest and the greatest


menace to the industry ever known in its history, and,

Whereas : the citrus growers of Florida have advanced out of their individual pockets more than $200,000—have sus¬
tained a loss of at least a million dollars in healthy trees destroyed that the bal¬
ance of their groves and those of their neighbors might be protected, and, before the fight is ended and citrus canker finally exterminated will be called upon for a still further sacrifice of at least a like amount, and

Whereas: The Federal Government,
realizing that it was beyond the power of the States in which the disease exists to supply the funds necessary for eradica¬
tion, did appropriate the sum of $550,000,
to be divided proportionately among said
States; said money to be expended by and under the supervision of the Plant
Boards, which sum was supplemented by an appropriation by the State of Florida of $125,000, all of which was expended but the enemy was still unsubdued, and

Whereas: Another pilgrimage was made to Washington by the Committee having this work in charge and another appeal for help was introduced with the result that $180,000 was secured for im¬
mediate use, which would probably carry the work as at present organized until
July, and an additional $300,000 contin¬
gent on the Legislature of the State of
Florida appropriating a like amount, and,

Whereas, A Bill has been introduced in the Legislature, now in session, asking for State Aid for $300,000 in order to secure a like amount from the govern¬
ment, which is waiting for us as soon as





58


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


we comply with the very reasonable re¬
quirements imposed, and

Whereas , The Plant Board believes that with the amount of money this would give them the complete eradication of citrus canker could be established, and,
Whereas, The citrus industry is the largest single industry in the State in¬
volving more than $250,000,000, and
Whereas, The counties in which citrus fruits are grown pay 77 per cent of the taxes of the State of Florida and receive less than 50 per cent of the benefits, there¬
fore,

Be it Resolved, That the Florida Horti¬
cultural Society at its annual meeting rep¬
resenting, as it does, the citrus and ag¬
ricultural interests of a large part of the
State, is unanimous in its endorsement of the Bill introduced in both houses of the legislature for the appropriation of $300,-
000, as not only this money will be need¬
ed, but it is only by making this appropri¬
ation that we can secure the like amount from the Federal Government. It is a fact substaniated by the reports of our own men sent there from Washington that a district in China, much larger than the citrus area of Florida, where millions of boxes were formerly grown, is now a desert waste, as far as citrus growing is concerned, and all brought about by the ravages of this terrible disease which we are fighting with the energy of despera¬
tion. We, as a society, therefore appeal to the members of the legislature to en¬
large your horizon and take a broad¬
minded view of this situation. What affects one section unquestionably affects the entire state, and if this bill is defeated,
it will in all probability mean the wiping


out of an industry which pays a large part of your taxes and which has been in the past and will continue to be in the future a potent factor in the upbuilding of our beloved state.

M. E. Gillett,

Loyd S. Tenny,
Ralph Robinson.

Mr. M. E. Gillett: I move the adop¬
tion of the resolution.

Mr. Hume: This being a resolution offered by one of our regular standing committees, I do not think it will come under the head of the resolutions which are to be referred to the Resolution
Committee appointed yesterday. It can be adopted now if it is the will of the So¬
ciety at this time.

(Motion seconded and resolution adopt¬
ed).

Mr. D. C. Gillett: In our delibera¬
tions and our meetings at the capitol at
Washington and at Tallahassee, the mem¬
bers of this Committee have responded with their time, and have made sacrifices which few know or appreciate, to carry on this work.

There is one member of this Commit¬
tee who has been on the firing line, I be¬
lieve, as much as the Chairman. He is a man we all know and love, and I would like very much for him to say something on this subject to this representative body here to-night, representing as he does, the largest interest of the industry. I refer to Dr. Ross. (Applause).

Dr. Ross: Mr. Chairman, ladies and gentlemen: I really think enough has

been said. The truth has been fully stat¬
ed ; I could not add to the force of what


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


59


has been said. I could not add to the impression which you all have now that this disease must be eradicated or we shall suffer immeasurably.

Personally, having spent a good deal of time at Tallahassee, I believe it will pass.
There is not a shadow of doubt, if things pursue a normal course, but that it will pass by a large majority. The man who has been opposing it has not been able to say a hopeful thing about his chance of success. The most hopeful thing he has been able to say is that if he could send ten men home from the House, he could beat it. But he can’t send those ten men home. (Applause).

The political situation at Tallahassee is one of uncertainty. An unusual thing has been done. The appropriation bills are all going to be bunched practically in¬
to one consideration; that may or may not be wise, but it is the will of the Senate and we have no way to interfere with it. But
I am sure this Committee has done a wise thing in preparing this explicit resolution,
and that you have done a wise thing to pass it unanimously, and when that reso¬
lution is read in the two Houses of the
Legislature, I am sure it will make an im¬
pression most favorable to this cause.
(Applause).

Mr. Hume: When your Committee went to Tallahassee two years ago to se¬
cure the passage of the Plant Act with all that it means and will mean to Florida,
when the Committee secured at that time the funds wherewith to put into operation the work of that Plant Board, and secur¬
ed additional appropriations with which


to take up the fight, the one thing which strengthened our hands more than any¬
thing else, was between 700 and 800 tele¬
grams that went into Tallahassee.

I have seen men stand up in the Senate with a wad of telegrams as thick as this book, and shake them at the men on the other side of the Senate who were oppos¬
ing it, and say “That is what I got from home, and I do not need them, for I am going to vote for it. But I am here to tell you that you have got to vote for this bill and every telegram in my hand will tell you so.”

It strengthened the hands of those men in the fight. We won. (Applause).

Mr. Gillett asked you a few minutes ago to do' this very thing over again.
Now, if you have any interest in the wel¬
fare of this state, if you have any interest in the industry which means so much to it, do not forego those telegrams. Let them begin to get into Tallahassee just about the first of May. Give the Wes¬
tern Union the biggest week’s business they ever handled in Tallahassee and do your share in putting this thing over.
Don’t forget it. Don’t think it is not your business; don’t leave it to the other fellow to do. Your Committee has done its part; now do yours. (Applause).

Now, then, enough of that for this ses¬
sion. We all hope it will be the last time it will be necessary either for your presi¬
dent or for the Citrus Canker Committee to have to bring this matter before you.
I believe if we put it over this time, we are through with it.




Spraying for Citrus Diseases


ITS USEFULNESS AND ITS LIMITATIONS


Prof. R. R. Fulton


Spraying has come to have an estab¬
lished place in combating many fungous diseases of various forms, garden and or¬
chard crops. It is used most generally on crops that have a relatively high value per plant, and against diseases that attack the crops at such times and in such ways as to render the use of spray materials feasible.
We are concerned at this time with citrus fruit crops, valuable enough to justify considerable expenditures to insure fruit free from fungous blemishes, to protect it from the more destructive fungous rots,
or to maintain the health of the trees in all their parts. Spraying, it must be re¬
membered, is not a cure-all to give relief from all the ills our trees are heir to. It is only one of a number of means for combating diseases, useful in its particu¬
lar and somewhat limited sphere, and usually most effective when used in con¬
junction with other defense measures.

It is my purpose tonight to review some of the fundamental principles on which the practice of spraying for fun¬
gous diseases is established, and to discuss the relations of these to the citrus crop.
I do not enter upon any discussion of the other broad field for spraying, the control of insect pests. If I speak in rather gen¬
eral terms, you will bear with me, remem¬


bering that spraying for the diseases of citrus fruits is still in the experimental stages. For various reasons its develop¬
ment has lagged behind spraying for cit¬
rus insect pests. You will remember,
too, that your speaker is now in the midst of his second season’s work on the rather complex problems involved, and is not yet ready to make an extended report on the results of the experiments.

The diseases we deal with are caused by fungi, and fungi are themselves mi¬
croscopic plants of a low order. Many are parasites attacking some living plant as a host, and, as a rule, these attack most vigorously particular varieties or species and affect other kinds of hosts less vig¬
orously or not at all. Furthermore, the attack is usually restricted to one or more particular organs of the host, and to some special condition of such susceptible parts,
such as age, vigor of growth, succulence,
etc.

Before the parasite develops in the host plant tissues, the reproductive body of the fungus must come in contact with it, after being transferred from some other place in which it was previously produced by fungus growth of like kind. This law is as absolute and no less mysterious than that every plant of higher order, corn,


60




FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


61


or potato, or what not, comes from a seed or cutting that was produced by one of its kind. The recognition of this outside source for the very beginnings of any fun¬
gus infection is of first importance in dis¬
ease control, whether by spraying, or by other measures. Once established, the greater part of the fungus plant is buried below the surface of its host and feeds and grows there well protected from outside agencies. It is practically impossible to get rid of a fungus thus established with anything short of the ax, the pruning saw or the knife, and such implements may mean loss of valuable plant parts. In the case of the less destructive diseases, we may tolerate a certain amount of unpre¬
vented infection, and wage warfare against their further spread. Spraying,
to be most effective, must begin before the first infections.

Our corn seed, merely in contact with a fertile soil, would not grow into a plant without suitable conditions for growth,
mainly moisture and warmth. Similar favoring conditions are needed for any fungus plant to become established. The crop of fungi in any season is influenced by variations in such conditions.

The seeds of higher plants usually sprout while buried in the soil, and a por¬
tion of the plant in a few days emerges from it. The spores of fungi usually sprout where they happen to lie on the surface of plant parts, in such chance films of moisture as rains or dews may furnish for a sufficient length of time. In¬
stead of a few days, as for seeds, the time for spore germination is a matter of a few hours, or very seldom of more than one or two days. The fungus, during a few


hours more, may penetrate beneath the surface, either by actively dissolving a way through the plant’s protective layer of epidermis, or by entering one of the natural breathing-pore openings, or through some accidental wound. Most of the growth is below the surface. The microscopic parasite must affect a rather extensive area before its presence can be detected with the unaided eye. This takes, as a rule, several days to several weeks, referred to as the incubation period. So when the effects of a fungus are visible in considerable degree, we may feel sure that the start was really made some time before, and there may be as many or more incipient infections already truly established on neighboring parts of the host, certain to become apparent at the end of their incubation period. Once again, the key to success in spraying is protection against the very earliest of these infections. And how? By coating the parts to be protected with a suitable chemical that will either kill fungus spores in contact with it, or prevent them from germinating, or kill the tender growth from the spore before it can pene¬
trate the host tissues. The general ef¬
fect is the same in any case: the poison¬
ous spray material preventing the fung¬
ous growth.

One serious limitation is when the spores are carried safely past a protec¬
tive spray coating and introduced directly into the deeper plant tissues on the mouthparts of some sucking or biting insect. It is a difficult case of undermin¬
ing defences, and unfortunately we are not yet able to cope absolutely with all



62


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


such cases. Proper insect control is the rational procedure.

Another limitation is the difficulty of securing a perfect coating of fungicide.
Any uncovered spot is a break in the de¬
fensive armor and with the enemy spores numerous enough there will be a certain number of infections. These spores are so minute that 10,000 of average size can lie side by side in a single layer on the head of a pin. Carefulness in handling the spray rod is the best corrective. Have an engine and pump that will develop 150
to 200 pounds pressure, and keep it there.
Use a nozzle that throws a good misty spray, and renew the disc frequently to keep it so. Use a disc with a small enough hole to make a fine spray, and thin enough to throw it in a wide cone.
Use angle nozzles, a cluster of two for larger trees. Cover the tree evenly and completely, as though painting a house,
trying to hit every part from two direc¬
tions, which may be done by a slight turn of the angle nozzle. Thrusts and turns in the tree’s interior help complete coating.
Cover the lower sides of leaves and the upper sides will usually be taken care of.
Remember that the uncoated parts will determine the amount of loss, other things being equal.

Still another limitation is the weather¬
ing or washing away of spray solution af¬
ter it is properly applied. The application must be repeated often enough to main¬
tain a good coating at the critical times;
and these are determined largely by moisture conditions during the general period when the hosts are in a condition of susceptibility and when the fungus spores are disseminated. Have a mix¬


ture of good adhesiveness on when the rains come, rather than afterwards. If unfortunately caught without such pro¬
tection, spray immediately afterwards.
Every hour even may count. The usual procedure is to follow a schedule of ap¬
plications, intended to afford continuous protection during the danger period,
lengthening the intervals somewhat under dry conditions and shortening them under wet. Do not be misled by sediment that may have lost its fungicidal properties.
Consideration must also be given to the rapid increase in size of young parts, and the necessity for keeping them covered as they grow.

The spray solution must be chosen with reference to its effectiveness against the fungus in question, its non-injurious ef¬
fects on the host, together with reason¬
able cost and ease of preparation. An in¬
effective material is dear at any saving in money or trouble. There is a natural tendency to unduly magnify differences in cost of materials. Figure them down to the cost per box of fruit and see what they really amount to. Injuriousness in¬
cludes the matter of direct spray injury which may sometimes be as objectionable as the disease itself; and also the indirect effect of spraying on the insect-destroy¬
ing fungi, that are to be safeguareded as much as is practicable. Effectiveness de¬
pends in the main on killing power for the fungus in question, with a very im¬
portant consideration of the proper bal¬
ance between immediate action and ex¬
tended duration of effect. As a rule,
spray coatings that are easily redissolved in atmospheric water have a high initial fungicidal power, with a tendency to-


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


63


wards injuring the host tissues, but are,
from their very solubility more easily weathered away than the less soluble, and probably slower acting materials. Spread¬
ing power as well as sticking power is a desirable quality in the ideal solution.

All sorts of fungicides, good, bad and indifferent, have been devised and recom¬
mended for controlling crop diseases. A
word of caution must be given against the large-scale use of proprietary prepara¬
tions made merely to sell, before their worth has been demonstrated in small tests carefully made and checked.

We will confine our attention to three standard mixtures that are in rather gen¬
eral use for citrus diseases. Bordeaux mixture, ammoniacal copper carbonate solution, and lime-sulphur solution.

Bordeaux mixture has good fungicidal value, perhaps more lasting than imme¬
diate. It sticks well; the sediment may be objectionable on fruit nearing ma¬
turity. There is a certain amount of deepening of leaf color and apparently stimulation of the host plant following its use. Its use may be followed by an increase of scale insects in the grove,
and close watch must be kept, and timely measures taken for their control when necessary. To many this effect is a de¬
terrent against any extensive use of
Bordeaux mixture. Others find it pos¬
sible to take advantage of its good quali¬
ties by assigning it a proper place along with other sprays in a year-round sched¬
ule.

Ammoniacal copper carbonate has fair fungicidal power, but is not very lasting.
There is practically no sediment to mar the appearance of ripening fruit, and it


has little tendency to produce increase of scale insects. It may act on the metal of spray machinery, causing it to wear out,
probably the consequence of improper mixing of the spray.

Lime sulphur solution does not have a very long record in the control of citrus diseases on which to base conclusions. It has good fungicidal power, more im¬
mediate than lasting. It leaves a slight sediment. It tends to reduce certain in¬
sect pests, thus combining insecticidal and fungicidal properties. It consists of rather unstable chemical compounds, and there is the possibility of transformations occurring under certain atmospheric con¬
ditions that may give rise to spray injury.
Temperatures above 85 degrees immedi¬
ately after spraying seem to be unfavor¬
able for its use on citrus at strengths effective against parasitic fungi. Late afternoon spraying in warm months may escape this danger.

Each one of these solutions must be prepared accurately. Carelessness in mixing or diluting may make the dif¬
ference between success and failure.
Give attention to purity of ingredients,
standards of strengths, right methods of mixing and conveniences in mixing.

No one of these solutions meets all the requirements of the ideal, universal spray material. Some day such may be pro¬
duced ; until then we must use what we have to best advantage. A combination schedule, in which more than one spray finds a place, may offset the disadvan¬
tages of any spray used alone. Care must be taken to avoid the injury that may be caused by the mixing of different sprays, as the copper and sulphur ones on




64


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


the host plant parts when following each other too closely.

The final proving ground for spray materials, to determine which is best adapted for a particular purpose, is in the grove itself. Comparative tests, checked by leaving a small block of unsprayed trees, carried on systematically year after year, will reveal the strong and weak points of the spray materials. It would be a distinct advantage to the industry if more growers would carefully plan and conduct such tests for their own guidance, and information regarding ef¬
fectiveness of control, cost, and net re¬
turns under their own peculiar condi¬
tions.

The whole question of whether spray¬
ing is a proper means of control depends after all upon the peculiar life habits of the parasitic organism and its relation¬
ships to its host. Wei cannot discuss these in detail at the present time. The three citrus diseases with which the spraying experiments of our office are concerned at the present time are scab,
melanose and withertip. All three affect various parts of the plant besides the fruit, but it is towards the protection of the latter that we center effort in spray¬
ing.

I will briefly indicate the lines along which we are working in our tests:

Scab infections occur as a rule early in the development of the fruit, from the blossoming period until the fruit is an inch or somewhat more in size. To adequately protect during this period of about two months, requires three or pos¬
sibly four spray applications, the first be¬
ing made as soon as enough bloom has


dropped to expose a fair setting of young fruit, the second ten days to two weeks later. Even before these, on the early spring flush of growth, a clean-up appli¬
cation is advantageous in tending to re¬
duce the early spread of the disease on leaves.

The first melanose fruit infections usu¬
ally occur during the scab danger period,
and thorough spraying for scab will tend to reduce melanose. Under severe con¬
ditions one or two additional later appli¬
cations will be needed.

Withertip or anthracnose of grape¬
fruit and orange usually affects the fruit late in the season. The use of sulphur sprays during the summer for insects tends to control it. Where this trouble is severe a special protective application in early fall is advisable.

The cumulative effects of following a sound spraying system throughout the year in reducing the sources of infection for the following season, must not be overlooked. The best results from spray¬
ing are usually attained after it has been practiced a year or more.

I wish to emphasize again the impor¬
tance of eliminating in so far as practi¬
cable hold over sources of infection, es¬
pecially through the removal of dead limbs and twigs that harbor melanose,
and withertip organisms. Judicious prun¬
ing further adds to the efficiency of spray¬
ing by giving a less dense top that allows the spray to penetrate better. The admis¬
sion of light and air to the interior of the tree tends to eliminate moisture con¬
ditions that would prove favorable for fungus infection.

In conclusion I wish to utter a word of


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


65


warning against the idea that blindly following a set of rules will always insure success in spraying. Rules, however good, must be used with judgment; and judgment must be based on knowledge of the factors involved,—the peculiarities of host and parasite and spray material, and the surrounding conditions that govern


their interrelationships. To knowledge and judgment must be added a third requisite—skill in manipulation, before one is fully equipped to cope with the threefold problem of spraying,—the use of the right material, at the right time, in the right way.




5





Irrigation


F. W. Stanley, Irrigation Engineer.


Although there seems to be no official place on this society’s program this year for the consideration of irrigation prob¬
lems, I am very glad to have the privilege of addressing this body on the subject. I admit that I have talked before many of you for several successive years,
and have usually discussed the subject in somewhat the same manner. Yet a recent trip along the lower East Coast has led me to believe that irrigation is still a very pressing problem and that there are probably a number of men here today who have not heard me before. On this account I hope that you who have had to listen to me so often before will be very patient for a few moments, for I
promise you I will be brief. I would like to say in this connection, however, that this society has been of great help in the work which the irrigation office of the
Department of Agriculture has done in this state, both in gathering new data and in becoming acquainted with men who do things. For instance, about 400
acres of grove irrigation has been instal¬
led the last three years, or is under con¬
struction, which has been put in from plans submitted by our office. These men have done most excellent work and I
can say the plants have been successful in all cases. All these irrigation plants use vitrified clay pipe for distributing


water through the grove. Many of the members of this society have received a recent bulletin from our office entitled
“Irrigation in Florida” which goes into considerable detail on this style of con¬
struction.

But I am here to speak of particular problems that are present on the East
Coast. These problems have not been treated in detail in the bulletin mentioned above, nor discussed before this society.
The problems are:

1st. Irrigation of the rocky limestone grove lands that lie between the ocean and the glades.

2nd. Irrigation of the muck lands that lie at the edge of or within the glades.

3rd. The irrigation of the sandy lands in most cases adjacent to the glades.

The irrigation of groves (either avo¬
cado or citrus, and the irrigation of avo¬
cado groves is assuming importance)
that lie on the rocky lands cannot be ir¬
rigated by the ordinary furrow or flood¬
ing methods. Yet this type of soil pre¬
sents no particular difficulty to the ordinary low-pressure irrigation system that is used in central Florida, if porta¬
ble or conductor pipe is used to carry water to the individual tree. Probably the best way to illustrate this point is to give a brief description of a grove re¬
cently surveyed for irrigation near


60



FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


67


Miami. This grove is very rocky and is nearly flat. Water is obtained from a bored well about 40 to 60 feet deep, the water rising within 15 feet of the sur¬
face. The distributaries are to be vitri¬
fied clay sewer pipe, laid with tightly cemented joints. This has nothing what¬
ever to do with subirrigation, but the terra cotta or sewer pipe is used instead of iron pipe. In this grove 600 feet of
6-inch terra cotta pipe is used instead of
4-inch iron pipe. The 6-inch sewer pipe costs 15 cents a foot delivered and the
4-inch iron 62 cents per foot. This sewer pipe is buried so that the top of the pipe is at least 6 inches below the surface of the ground. This means con¬
siderable work in excavation of trenches in rock, but competent engineers in this section tell me that ditching on this class of soil should be done for 10 cents per foot easily. This means a total of 25
cents per foot for the sewer pipe against about 65 for the iron, or 'allowing 5
cents for laying, a total of 30 cents laid against about 70 for the iron pipe or about 60 per cent saving. If a larger grove was to be irrigated the saving would be very much more. This sewer pipe main, is to be laid down the center of the grove. Special irrigation valves are connected to it at every other tree row,
and water is taken from the valves and carried to the trees through 6-inch light¬
weight galvanized portable pipe.

The detail of irrigation is as follows:
One man connects up enough of this light,
portable pipe to reach the edge of the grove. In the above case just 330 feet would be needed, or 33 10-ft. joints. The connections are simply made by pushing


the joints together like joints of stove pipe. When all are connected the valve is turned on and water flooded at the roots of the trees, when two trees are flooded, two joints of pipe are discon¬
nected and carried over two rows and there connected, by the time'all of the joints are disconnected and carried over two rows the line is all connected and ready to connect to another valve. This operation is continued until irrigation is completed. It will be noticed the design is such that all the water is handled through one outlet, so that one man can do all the work. This plant uses 300
gallons per minute, pumped by No, 3
centrifugal pump and 5 h. p engine. The cost complete for 10 acres is $450 to
$500 or about $50 per acre. The same pumping outfit would answer for
20 acres, which would mean an outlay of only 35 dollars per acre for the com¬
plete irrigation outfit; except the cost of the well. I must say again what I have so often repeated at these meetings “that ordinary tera cotta pipe is to be used only under low heads, and in all cases suitable relief stands or air vent pipes must be provided, as it is not safe to pump into a closed pipe of this make. There should however, be no grove in this section that could not be easily irrigated by use of sewer pipe mains and portable pipe, if water is obtainable. In fact I think I
am safe in saying that there are no groves along the East Coast that I could not guarantee to irrigate by using such a system as described above.

I would like to state for the benefit of orange growers on the sandy soil of cen¬
tral Florida, that we now have six-inch



68


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


irrigation valve that is being made at
Orlando that can be sold for $2.00 or less.
This valve is connected to a sewer pipe main and can be placed 6 to 8 inches be¬
neath the surface of the ground, so that cultivation can go on with no impedi¬
ment in the grove. This buried valve or cap, also is safe from being knocked off by teams, etc., which so often causes so much trouble. I would also like to state for the benefit of growers in the hillier country that we have experimented with drain tile or sewer pipe that has been re¬
inforced with wire and concrete so as to stand relatively high pressures. This pipe being laid continuously in the trench,
such pipe is much cheaper than iron pipe and will stand very high pressure if suffi¬
ciently re-inforced.

Irrigation of muck land adjacent to or within the glades can be accomplished by the methods described above for groves,
and can also be used to irrigate many truck crops, but generally speaking the ir¬
rigation of this class of lands can be done by simply installing a pump of large ca¬
pacity and raising the water table. As most of you know muck lands sometimes become very dry when well drained, and truck crops often suffer severely, but if the water table can be raised sufficiently irri¬
gation is accomplished satisfactorily. In the future it may be possible to raise the water table on a large section of the glades by holding the water up in the main canals by means of locks or dams, but un¬
til the drainage plans are further advanced it probably will not be safe to try out this plan on a large scale on account of danger from flooding by heavy rains. In the meantime thousands of acres may be in


need of water. It is probable that large capacity pumping plants will be used to supply this want. Many acres somewhat similar to the glades, have been irrigated in California by running water in ditches spaced from 20 to 40 feet apart, and hold¬
ing the water in until the intervening land is irrigated. This same method is used in the large Hastings potato district of this state, but in this case a hard pan prevents the waste of water. Still the water plane can often be raised without an impervious substratum if enough water is pumped. And enormous amounts of water can be pumped through lifts of 4 or
5 feet with comparatively small engines.

Several hundreds of acres of truck-
crops have been irrigated near Ft. Lau¬
derdale on the sandy lands, by running water between the rows of the plants us¬
ing open ditches for mains. In most of these cases large heads of water have been pumped from the drainage canals by home made pumps. Most of these pumps con¬
sist of a square wooden box set on an in¬
cline, one end in the canal and the other end upon the bank. Water is forced through this flume by a swiftly revolving boat propeller placed in a short piece of pipe in the end of the flume that sets in the water. An ordinary marine engine is used to operate the propeller, the en¬
gine being perched on the dry end of the wooden box. Some of these pumps deliv¬
er as much as 2,000 gallons per minute,
and will irrigate large tracts of land, even though a high per cent of the water is lost in transit through open ditches. Yet the low lift and large quantities of water available makes the system very satisfac¬
tory. Such an outfit costs a few dollars


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


69


per acre, and is very easily taken up and moved to another point. It must be re¬
membered though, that such pumps are only available where low lifts are possible,
and where large quantities of water are available. There are a large number of pumps on the market similar in general principles to the home made pumps de¬
scribed. These pumps are used in many parts of the south for drainage purposes and in the north in flooding cranberry bogs. The low pressure centrifugal and the Wood impeller pumps are also very good for large quantities of water. Such pumps are likely to be much more efficient than the home-made variety, and would be advisable if a permanent plant is to be in¬
stalled. If a head of over four feet is to be pumped against in the home made pump it probably would be advisable to put in two propellers instead of one. The shape and number of blades of the pro¬
pellers can doubtlessly be improved upon,
and we hope to be able to experiment with them before long.

Overhead sprinkler systems of various designs have assumed considerable prom¬
inence on the east coast during the past few years, many of the systems being designed by local men. These systems


are excellent for close planted crops, and also have the advantage of affording some protection against light frosts. Of course such systems are expensive, especially since the war, on account of the high price of iron pipe. Many such plants will continue to be installed, yet I still insist that if irrigation can be accomplished at less cost it should be done, and in many cases cheap surface methods can be used instead of overhead methods, both for grove or truck patch, and in any case a thorough investigation should be made be¬
fore a large outlay is made.

Mr. Robinson: I want to emphasize the importance of the citrus irrigation outlined by Mr. Stanley. We have re¬
cently put in about ten acres, irrigating with this vitrified tile, six inch size, and are astonished at the amount of water we get through this method of delivery. We can irrigate three times the amount of land we were irrigating with that one well. If we had had this information sev¬
eral year ago, it would have saved thou¬
sands of dollars for us.

Vitrified tile is very well described in the bulletin he refers to, and I hope you will investigate it thoroughly before you do any more irrigating.



Fertilization


L. B. Skinner.


Fertilizer is supreme—“With what measure ye mete it shall be measured to you again.” Little fertilizer, little crops,
poor fertilizer, poor crops. Liberal fer¬
tilizer, liberal crops. Best grade of fer¬
tilizer produces best grade of crops.

Stingy fertilizing, small crops, no re¬
turns, no profits, lots of debt, lots of waste, lots of faultfinding, lots of failure and disappointment.

Generous, but careful fertilizing, makes generous returns, even extravagant fer¬
tilizing gives enormous returns if wisely applied. In these times we are prone to stint the fertilizer, but it can't be done and make money.

The tree' or plant will take its main¬
tenance first, enough to support it. If there is any left over it will make profit for you. I know little of farming outside of orange* groves,; but" I judge the same rule to hold true everywhere.

It takes just so much to sustain life and on this there is no profit directly. Beyond this line lies the realm of profit. If you would profit, withhold not your hand, put on all you can afford—double it and apply as much again.

This does not mean that you are to throw a baby tree into an ocean of fertili¬
zer. If you do you will lose both tree and fertilizer. Neither does it mean, if a tree ask bread, for you to give it a stone, or if


it craves nitrogen are you to feed it phos¬
phate rock. Or if it wants potash, to ex¬
pect lime to do as well. For seventy-
five years the best minds have been blaz¬
ing the way of safety and profit, and put¬
ting up danger signs to warn us of dan¬
gerous practices.

Heed no one’s “Lo, here is something just as good as Soluble Phosphoric Acid,
or lo, there is something that will take the place of potash.” If the blind lead the blind both will fall into the ditch. Life is short—time is fleeting—you have not time to follow after false gods, follow the laws laid down as the result of half a cen¬
tury of careful experiments, and you and
I have little time to experiment. Few of us are fitted for it—we have not the time or the patience, and there is no direct pro¬
fit in experiments. I can take no interest in following a line of work that I know is going to show why a certain method is a failure if I am satisfied in my mind that the method is a failure. If I don’t see success ahead my interest is gone, and so it is with most of us. Some of us eat to live and some live to eat, some work to produce something. Some are satisfied to work a whole lot just for the pleasure of seeing the motions made, and in the end consider the worst failure is success, and they are satisfied—and put up a sign
“This road don’t get you anywhere, keep


70



FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


/i


out.” But it don’t buy potatoes for the starving millions. On the other hand they, the experimenters, have shown the proper main road to follow. They have made it plain it is a straight and narrow road, and there are some that find it.

Let the experimenters try the short cuts, the excursions, let them try the new patent medicine fertilizer and try it on the dog—but let’s you and I stay in the mid¬
dle of the road—experimenters have marked it for us—until the new roads are pronounced safe. We owe much to train¬
ed experimenters—we owe all to them and we owe it to them to keep in the middle of the road until they advise going out. Go the limit, but play safe. Many an operation has been pronounced suc¬
cessful by the surgeon, but the patient failed to survive. Many a fertilizer ex¬
periment has been successful, but the tree died. If your tree needs nitrogen don’t give it Phoisphoric Acid and expect the tree to come back—or if it needs Phos¬
phoric acid don’t expect it to mature its


crop with nitrogen. And where it has all the nitrogen it can stand and all the phos¬
phoric acid it can assimilate don’t believe any one who tells you that you can apply more of these, even together, and expect to fool the tree into thinking it is potash.
Trees are never fooled, as man sometimes seems to assume, but they have got to take what is given them even if it kills them,
and it often does.

Fertilize when needed. It don’t do much good to fertilize for bloom after the bloom period is over. You want to have your lamps trimmed and burning when the time comes. You want to feed the tree what it wants, when it wants it. A
great many growers are too late. Too late never caught a train, too late never made a crop, too late always was too late,,
and always will be. Be on time to apply plenty of the right fertilizer when needed.
I call to mind a grove in my County that could be made a wonderful producer, but the owner is always too late, and rarely ever does he get a heavy crop.


A BRIEF REVIEW OF WAR’S EFFECT ON FERTILIZERS


W. J. Driscoll


Mr. President, Ladies and Gentlemen :

I was invited to become a member of this Committee, and as I am so repeatedly asked “Why the high cost of fertilizer,” it seemed a good opportunity to prepare a paper along those lines. Whenever we approach a consumer these days in an ef¬
fort to sell him fertilizer, everything is all right until we get down to prices; then he goes away up in the air. So I have pre¬


pared a paper which may enlighten you somewhat as to the cause of this increase.

We must recognize at the outset that supply and price of any commodity can¬
not be rightly considered without consid¬
ering demand also, since supply is exces¬
sive or deficient only as it applies to de¬
mand existing for the commodity under consideration. Briefly reviewing the ef¬
fect of the war upon demand for fertiliz-









72


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


ers, we will all remember that there was a very great demoralization on the out¬
break of hostilities. The stock ex¬
changes closed; the money market tight¬
ened. This re-acted on general indus¬
tries, reducing the purchasing power of laborers and employees and resulting in decreased demand for almost all farm products.

The farm product which suffered most severely at this period also is the one which uses more fertilizer in its produc¬
tion than any other crop; namely, cotton,
and the 1914 crop was enormous while the central European market was at once en¬
tirely cut off. Later, as stock exchanges opened, demand coming from Europe for various supplies such as food stuffs, muni¬
tions, etc., created better feeling general¬
ly. Industries of the country awakened.
More money became available and in¬
creased demand for farm products was created not only for domestic consump¬
tion but for export. But this phase did not appear in time to bring the cotton growers back to prosperous conditions and the year 1915 saw the close of many fertilizer factories in the cotton section.
Good prices obtained for the cotton crop of 1915 re-acted in such a way as to pro¬
duce far more interest in planting cotton in the spring of 1916, with heavy demand for fertilizers and materials. The high prices being obtained for grain and feed¬
ing stuffs also resulted in larger consump¬
tion of fertilizers in the north for the growing of this crop than ever before.
Unfortunately, disastrous storms and damage from boll weevil created a re¬
stricting influence on the cotton crop, but notwithstanding this, demand for fertili¬


zer has been greater during the spring of
1917 than for any year since the war started, although not so great as in 1914.
Prices obtained during the past year for all kinds of farm produce have been in general such as to make the farmer pros¬
perous and also to make him use every means possible to increase his crop.

We can say, then, that every influence has tended toward an increased consump¬
tion of fertilizer except the single one of increased price of fertilizer. This has kept the actual consumption below that of the normal years before the war. We all know that with increasing demand we may normally expect increased prices.
This is likewise true where there is a short supply of the commodity. The reasons for the demand are pretty well known to all of us and we will now examine some of the causes leading to shortage in supply or increased cost of certain fertilizer ma¬
terials.

POTASH

Little need be said regarding potash.
The wonderfully rich deposits existing in
Germany had for years served practically as the world’s supply. The outbreak of war found the United States dependent upon such small stocks of German potash as had been left over from the preceding season, since only a comparatively small amount of the next year’s supplies had been delivered. There were, it is true, a limited number of by-products which had always been used, such as ashes and to¬
bacco dust. Practically the only way to handle this situation was by careful con¬
servation of such potash as the country had. Strenuous efforts have been made


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIE1 Y


73


to develop and increase other sources of potash supply, but only a very small amount is being produced as compared with the amount of German potash for¬
merly consumed. The principal Ameri¬
can sources the brines from certain Ne¬
braska lakes; the Searles Lake district in
California which has recently advertised as able to produce 1,200 to 1,500 tons per month; the Giant Kelps off the Califor¬
nia coast which have proved a disappoint¬
ment because of difficulties in extracting and the amount of potash produced;
Alunite which is now producing a limited quanity of very high grade sulphate of potash, and Ashes from various materials such as hardwood, cotton bolls, cotton hulls, etc. The last mentioned material,
(ashes), is used in a fertilizer way in its crude form. There is, however, a limited amount of carbonate of potash being pro¬
duced from ashes which is being taken up by the glass makers, soap makers, etc.

It is hardly necessary to comment on reasons for shortage in supply and ad¬
vanced price of potash.

SULPHURIC ACID

Sulphuric acid is not generally thought of in connection with fertilizer, yet it plays an extremely important part in the manufacture of certain materials; for in¬
stance, in changing insoluble and unavail¬
able phosphates into soluble and available forms, such as acid phosphate, dissolved bone, dissolved bone black, etc. It also is essential in the manufacture of sulphate of ammonia.

Many sulphuric acid plants closed down in the fall of 1914 by reason of the antici¬


pated greatly decreased demand for fer¬
tilizer on account of the cotton situation and general demoralization. When the general outlook began to brighten, large contracts were placed by the Allies with munitions manufacturers who then re¬
quired large quantities of sulphuric acid and who lacked supplies to care for this sudden and greatly increased demand for explosives. There has been for several year^. a very considerable quantity of sul¬
phur x acid manufactured by zinc and copper smelters which has gone into the manufacture of acid phosphate. Con¬
tracts were made between these large pro¬
ducers and munitions manufacturers.
This created the prospect of a large short¬
age of acid phosphate. Acid plants were immediately opened again and started in full force.

Then there came into play certain ele¬
ments which have affected the fertilizer materials market generally. Sulphuric acid requires sulphur or sulphur ore, also nitrate of soda, for its manufacture.
These materials are imported. The war situation created an extreme shortage of vessels, making it hard to get bottoms to bring these materials to this country.
Furthermore, the shortage of vessels and increased risk caused vessel owners to ad¬
vance their freights as much as 600 per cent to 700 per cent over normal rates.
War risk made it necessary to carry ex¬
cess insurance. Munition manufacturers were willing to pay extremely high prices for sulphuric acid which they simply had to have. Notwithstanding these influ¬
ences, the prices of acid phosphate did not advance in anything like the proportion that might be expected.




74


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


While we are considering sulphuric acid, it may be well to mention that the pyrites or sulphur ore from which the major portion of the sulphuric acid going into the fertilizer industry is manufactur¬
ed comes from Spain, and it is very possi¬
ble that we may be almost entirely cut off from this source of supply. The nitrate of soda used in the manufacture of sul¬
phuric acid is also used in large quantities in munitions manufacture, and of course we know its value as a fertilizer mater¬
ial. The high ocean freights have af¬
fected the price of this material very ser¬
iously, and at certain times an artificial shortage has been created in this country due to heavy buying by munitions manu¬
facturers for their immediate necessities.
This material may also be an object of in¬
terest to German raiders and U-boats.

SULPHATE OF AMMONIA

We have already mentioned that sul¬
phate of ammonia is dependent on sul¬
phuric acid for its manufacture. It is also a very interesting material for con¬
sideration since practically every condi¬
tion which has affected any fertilizer ma¬
terial has affected sulphate of ammonia.

By far the largest production of sul¬
phate of ammonia is that of steel manu¬
facturers who handle it as a by-product of coke ovens in which they prepare coke for use in the iron industry. As coal is coked in these by-product ovens, it gives off gas containing considerable ammonia.
This ammonia is “scrubbed” out of the gas and is absorbed by sulphuric acid.

Prior to the war, the United States pro¬
duced about two-thirds of its require¬


ments of sulphate of ammonia, the balance being imported. For instance, in 1914
we produced 183,000 tons and imported
75,010 tons, making a total of 258,010
tons. The sudden outbreak of the war prevented delivery of a number of import contracts. Ocean freights began to rise and imports became more and more re¬
stricted. England finally placed an em¬
bargo on exports of sulphate of ammonia on account of needing this material for her own agriculture, and also because of its use in the manufacture of munitions.
Meantime, in the fall of 1914, the steel industry in the United States became greatly depressed and production of sul¬
phate of ammonia consequently much curtailed. In the spring of 1915 the steel industry began reviving and the pro¬
duction of sulphate of ammonia began to increase. Then the manufacturers struck a snag in the high price of sulphuric acid.
It takes at least a ton of what we call 6o°
Baume sulphuric acid to make a ton of sul¬
phate of ammonia; and at least one-half the increase in price per ton of sulphuric acid had to be added to the cost per ton of manufacturing sulphate of ammonia.
Steel manufacturers have been putting in a great many new by-product plants, but they had to overcome a very considerable handicap in trying to increase production to' the point of taking care of the former imports. They have had difficulties in getting their plants completed, had strikes and labor troubles, have been unable to get the coal to their plants as fast as they needed it because of car shortages and railroad conditions, have had to pay high prices for the coal, and, in a number of cases, have not been able to furnish buy-


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


75


ers with the quantities of sulphate of ammonia they had contracted to deliver.
Furthermore, they have had difficulties in getting box cars in which to ship their fin¬
ished product, in common with other manufacturers in the north.

The spring of 1917 finds producers un¬
able to make any sales for prompt ship¬
ment as all their production is taken up on existing contracts. Demand is ahead of supply and present cost the highest known.

COTTON SEED MEAL

Cotten seed meal has been getting to the point where we must consider it as a feeding material rather than a fertilizer material, but it should be considered in this discussion since it has been so largely used as fertilizer material in the past.
The diverting of large quantities of cot¬
ton seed meal from fertilizer markets to feeding markets has caused fertilizer de¬
mand which formerly went to cotton seed meal to turn to other sources of plant food thus abnormally increasing demand for such other materials. The last two cot¬
ton crops have been short, not only on ac¬
count of the uncertain market and bad credit conditions which caused farmers to decrease acreage in 1915, but also on ac¬
count of storms, boll weevil conditions,
and insufficient fertilization. In addition to the supply being shorter than usual,
demand for feeding purposes has been un¬
usually heavy because of high price of other feeding stuffs.

PACKINGHOUSE PRODUCTS

With regard to the packinghouse pro¬
ducts, blood and tankage, there has been


a gradual decrease in supply of cattle in the United States for some years. It may interest you to know that only seven pounds of dried blood and twelve pounds of tankage are obtained from each aver¬
age full grown animal in good practice,
hence it takes about three hundred ani¬
mals to yield a ton of blood, and about
170 animals to yield a ton of tankage.
Furthermore, it is only in the larger and better organized packinghouses that these materials are properly saved. In country killing and small slaughterhouses these materials either go to waste or are han¬
dled in some other manner. This short supply of food animals is reflected in the high prices which are being paid for hogs and cattle at all centers. Furthermore shortage of other materials, especially sulphate of ammonia and cotton seed meal, has caused an unusually heavy de¬
mand to turn to blood and tankage in the face of a supply which is short anyway.
Another factor entering into the packing¬
house product situation is that there is an increasingly heavy demand for these products for feeding purposes, especially in the Middle West, and materials which might otherwise go into fertilizer pro¬
duction are being carefully selected and put into feeding meal for cattle, hogs, etc.

OTHER FERTILIZER MATERIALS

There are a number of other fertilizer materials which are used to some extent,
but their production and also the demand for them is limited, and it is hardly neces¬
sary to mention them in an article of this kind.


76


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


SUMMARY

To summarize the conditions which are affecting supply and price of fertilizers,
there is

First: The impossibility of importing certain materials which were formerly imported, such as potashes, sulphate of ammonia, etc.

Second: Difficulties in importing cer¬
tain other materials such as pyrites, ni¬
trate of soda, etc., due to shortage of ves¬
sels and high ocean freight rates and marine insurance.

Third: Heavily increased demand

from other industries for materials which have been going into fertilizers, such as the munitions makers’ demand for pot¬
ashes, nitrate of soda, ammonia salts, and sulphuric acid; also the demand from the feeding trade for such products as feed¬
ing tankages and cotton seed meal.

Fourth: Difficulties in railroad trans¬
portation due to car shortages.

Fifth: Increased price of coal due to transportation difficulties. Coal for mo¬
tive power purposes has increased practi¬
cally ioo per cent.

Sixth: Increase in labor costs, these having advanced from 50 to 100 per cent.


Dr. J. H. Ross.

Dr. Ross: I will say a word or two,
in order that there won’t be an entire blank for my part of the program.

These two papers we have just heard,
are really very suggestive. First of all,
Mr. Skinner has pointed out the impor¬
tance of feeding your trees regularly,
promptly, and intelligently, and Mr. Dris¬


coll has intimated to us that to do this is going to be somewhat expensive.
(Laughter).

If ever there was a time when the grower should refrain from expensive experiments, this is the time. I have a friend down the state who has an orange grove. He has been a good doctor, an excellent doctor, for a good many years.
He came to see me some time ago, and said “I have discovered a new way to feed my trees.” I said, “How are you going to feed them? How well is your new theory confirmed?’’ He said, “Well,
possibly it is something of an experiment,
but I think it is reasonable.” I said, “My friend, I used to know you when I
thought you were a pretty safe family physician, and I never knew you to try experiments on your patients’ children.
I think it is an unwise thing to do.”

I was traveling across a wheat field in western New York and a man who put in the wheat, drilled it in and with it drilled the fertilizer. Towards the end of the field he ran out of fertilizer, but he went on putting in the wheat. That whole end of the field was put in without fer¬
tilizer. You could tell almost to a line where the fertilizer had run out. The field where the fertilizer had been put in stood two or three feet high; where the unfertilized tract was, the wheat was about eight inches high.

Now it will cost the orange grower a fixed sum to prune, and harrow, and spray. That is all an overhead expense you cannot get away from. But every penny of profit you make, is involved in the fertilizer you apply. You might just as well talk about working your mules



FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


77


from day to day and getting service out of them if you don’t feed them. You will get just as much out of the orange tree without feeding it. I don’t think you would experiment on feeding your mule and give him every mule food that comes along. You know just the food to give him that can be eaten with relish and profit to the animal; the food that can be assimilated and that will benefit the mule. But the poor, helpless orange tree has to wait for its proper feed and has to take what you give it, regardless whether it is the right food or not.

But you can’t fool an orange tree. It has to take what you give it, that is true,
but it can and will retaliate in the amount of a crop it gives you in return. The only thing that is being deceived is yourself,
when you don’t feed your tree properly and regularly.

Now, about this question of regularity.
I think that we all know that work ani¬
mals do much better on the same amount of feed, if they get it at exactly the same time. Their systems become adjusted to the reception of food at certain times,
with a certain period in between for as¬
similating. Their digestive organs adapt themselves to that routine, and there is an uneasiness, to say the least, when that routine is not followed.

In my opinion, you should feed your orange trees as regularly as you feed your mules, and when the set time comes for applying fertilizer, put it on.

Summing up the matter, in Florida the profit of an orange grove is the money you pay for fertilizer.

I suppose in some of this rich land down here towards West Palm Beach,


you have different conditions from those which obtain on the high, light, pine soil over in Polk County which my friend
Skinner so delights to deride. But over with us, we preach the gospel of feeding regularly and generously.

But this does not mean over-feeding.
You know they say a man will do better with a little less food than he really wants. He will do better with a little less food than with more than is good for him. The thing that attracted my attention and gave me the most work many years ago while practicing medi¬
cine, was to keep the people who ate too much, going.

I apprehend that now, with the present prices and difficulty of getting materials and fertilizer, I apprehend it will be rather under-feeding than over-feeding.

A great many people of this state have had a very severe freeze. It was very expensive. Now, these trees are debili¬
tated. They must be nourished, if you expect them to recover within a reason¬
able time. They have had a shock,, and they need help to recover promptly and properly from that shock. It will be a hardship to pay a high price to fertilize trees which have temporarily ceased to produce. But the last word I will say, is that you strain a point, borrow the money, if you must, but feed those trees.
Don’t let them go hungry while they are trying their best to recover from the freeze.

Fertilizer is an important thing, but the average grower does not know much about it only that he has to buy it. I
think he should not try many experi¬
ments, especially just now, but should




78


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


feed his trees intelligently and gener¬
ously. (Applause).


Discussion

Mr. Hume: This discussion of the subject by Dr. Ross and Mr. Skinner,
and the attitude which perhaps some of us take toward our trees, makes me think about Pat and the pig.

Pat bought a pig for $6.00; he bought
$9.00 worth of feed, and sold the pig in the spring for $15.00. His friend met him and asked him:

“How much did you pay for the pig,
Pat?”

“$6.00”

“How much feed did you have to buy for him ”

“$9.00 worth.”

“That does not seem to be a profi¬
table transaction for you, Pat.”

“Ah, but shure, I had the use of the pig.” (Laughter).

If some of us are not careful about our trees, particularly at this time, we may have the use of the trees.

Is there any further discussion of the topic, or any questions you wish to ask?

Mr. - : I would like to ask if

ground phosphate rock or ground lime stone rock will injure the trees, when broadcasted.

Mr. Hume: I think Prof. Stevens dis¬
cussed this matter at the last meeting or possibly the meeting before that. Or was it Maj. Floyd?

Maj. Floyd: Under certain limited conditions, apparently ground limestone used in excessive amounts may prove in¬


jurious. We found a few cases where apparently it did. The conditions were a lack of humus in the soil, a light sandy soil, and very dry soil.

Under conditions where there is a moist soil, with plenty of humus, I think you can use an average amount, or more than an average amount of ground lime¬
stone, without injurious effects.

Mr.-: The finest, sweetest and

best fruit are grown in some localities with fertilizer that would be detrimen¬
tal on other soils. Then, again, trees that have not been fertilized for thirty years, bear good fruit and an abundance of it. It is well for a grower to mix brains with his fertilizer.

Mr. - : I notice Dr. Ross says to

fertilize regularly; I would like to ask what method he would suggest?

Dr. Ross: Get ahead of the growth with a stimulating mixture about Janu¬
ary; then another dose about the last of
May or first of June; then again early in
November.

Mr. - : I would like to ask what

amount. We expect to plant this fall several hundred trees; we expect to have a thousand acres within the next two or three years. I would like to ask from those who have had experience, which I
have not, what amount the new trees should have, and what time they should have it. 1

I would also like to ask which would be better to plant as a cover crop; peas or velvet beans?

Dr. Ross: The advice I have given re¬
lates to bearing trees.

When I have babies to take care of, I







FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


79


think they should be fed more than three times a day.

With young trees, it has been my cus¬
tom to give them fertilizer about every few weeks; not large quantities, possibly a pound to the tree during the first sum¬
mer, and two pounds every eight weeks,
say, during the second summer.

I don’t believe the young trees will do well by giving them all they want. You should feed these babies at regular inter¬
vals but not too long intervals, and not too much at a time.

I generally put fertilizer in the hole where the tree is planted; just mix it with the sand when I plant the tree, and then wait for them to get leaves at the top for breathing surface before fertilizing more.

Mr. -: What kind of fertilizer do

you use?

Dr. Ross: I can hardly answer that question. Just pay your money and take your choice. (Laughter.)

Mr.-: What do you use in your ex¬

perience ?

Dr. Ross: I don’t know whether one should answer that sort of question,
either.

Mr. Sample: He means about what analysis.

Dr. Ross: They are very much the same; just pay your money and take your choice. (Laughter.)

Mr. Hume: It is not now so much what you should give your trees, but more a question of what you can get.

Mr.-: While you are discussing the

fertilizer question; I would like to ask something.

Some years ago the fertilizer authori¬


ties told us we needed from 5 per cent to
10 per cent to 12 per cent or 14 per cent of potash. Now, since it is next to impos¬
sible to get potash, they seem to have changed their minds, and tell us a smaller quantity will do practically as well; that from 1 per cent to 3 per cent will be suf¬
ficient.

It is a question in my mind whether orange trees will continue to do as well with a smaller percentage of potash, and it is another question whether we will be able to get it or have the money to buy it with.

Another thing; we have been told many times that the Florida soil is devoid of potash. It will furnish only a bed for the trees to be set in. If this is true, there is nothing for the tree or anything else to live upon. Now, suppose you take the poor land we have in Florida, the white sand that the saw palmetto grows on, and analyze that soil, and find nothing in it of plant food. But you take the growth pro¬
duced on that land, and burn it while it is green, and it will produce about 20 per cent of potash. Where does that potash come from; how is it manufactured and put into the saw palmetto when there is no potash in the ground? Is it not pos¬
sible that Nature has a way of producing potash that we do not know anything about ?

I believe after awhile you will find that
Nature has a way to produce fertilizing elements in the soil and make them avail¬
able for trees and plants, where we find none of them in an analysis of the soil. I
would like to know what research has been made in this direction. It seems to me that there are things in the soil that





8o


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


are produced by bacterial action, the pro¬
cess of which we have not discovered, and
I would like to know something on that line, if possible. (Applause.)

Mr. Hume: Mr. Driscoll, I would like to turn that question over to you.

Mr. Driscoll: I would like to hear from
Prof. Rolfs. (Laughter) I am satisfied the
Professor has made some very important experiments on that line.

Mr. Hume: Prof. Rolfs does not seem to be here. Can anyone else furnish an answer ?

Mr. -: What is your advice in re¬

gard to mixing raw ground lime rock and acid phosphate together?

Maj. Floyd: That would revert a good deal of the available phosphoric acid.

Mr.-: The reason why I asked; in

South Carolina where there is a good deal of aluminum in the soil, lime, combined with the acid phosphate, makes it more like basic slag. Whether there is any al¬
uminum in this soil I do not know.

Mr. Green: I suggest we call Mrs.
Prange to answer that question.

Mrs. Prange : There is a very great deal of difference between mixing lime and acid phosphate above ground and having the dissolved acid phosphate mix with the lime in the soil. As we know acid phos¬
phate is made by taking away two parts of the lime. That leaves a soluble phos¬
phoric acid. When you put the acid phos¬
phate in the soil, this phosphoric acid is dissolved. As it is dissolved and comes in contact with the lime, it is reverted and to an extent precipitated in so much finer particles than any grinding could possibly bring it, that the availability is not im¬
paired.


Hr.-: How about the aluminum in

the soil?

Mrs. Prange: There is always some al¬
uminum and iron in all soils. It makes no difference how much there is, having plenty of lime in the soil keeps the phos¬
phoric acid available, although that seems to be contradictory.

Mrs. Skinner. Let’s refer the gentle¬
man’s question about the palmetto to Mrs
Prange, too (Laughter).

Mrs. Prange: There is one part of his question I really want to answer. He was speaking about the different advice about the use of potash since the potash is so difficult to get. Now, when you stop to consider, our plants and trees are really no more sensitive or important than are we, and our families. It there was any one article of food that was costing six times its real value, we cer¬
tainly would lessen the amount we put on our table, and we would not starve to death, either.

I believe all kinds of life will adjust it¬
self, in a measure, to it’s conditions.

I do not think anyone really considered an authority, claims that trees and plants can get on without any potash, but surely potash, at $6.00 per unit, is not a prac¬
tical proposition in the quantities as was used before, and I do not think any au¬
thority has ever advised the high amount of potash that the growers themselves have demanded in the past.

Mr. -: Mrs. Prange spoke about

acid phosphate and iron not working to¬
gether. I have a piece of ground with a sort of iron pebble. It is very hard, and’
in same places you have to move the peb-






FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


81


bles around with a pick. It can’t be plowed. What would be the use of put¬
ting acid phosphate on that; or had I bet¬
ter use something else to get my phos¬
phoric acid?

Mrs. Prange: I cannot imagine a soil with so much iron in it. I am sure you would find nothing more available than phosphoric acid. I think that would come more within the line of some scientist.
Mr. Hume, I think you had better take that.

Mr. Hume: Mr. Skinner, I will ask you to answer that question. (Laughter.)

Mr. Skinner: I don’t want to touch it. (Laughter).

After the freeze of ’94-95, one of the largest manufacturers of fertilizer in this country located in New Orleans,
came to Florida to close up all his ac¬
counts. Among some of the accounts,
was mine. I settled mine with him and helped him settle a good many others.
He was a big man, a fine man, and he said, “Skinner, I want to leave you one piece of advice to spread among the grow¬
ers of Florida, and that is this; the grow¬
ers of Florida are using altogether too much potash.”

There is absolutely no need of it. Fer¬
tilizer people are glad to sell it to you,
if you want it, of course. The German propaganda was pushing it all the time, to increase their trade.

Along the same line, one of the leading fertilizer manufacturers of our state was being tried out by the German potash agent in New York in regard to potash conditions in this country. Among other things he told this agent he did not think


the Americans would use, after the war,
half as much potash as they had been using before as they had been finding out they had been using too much and the potash had been going to waste.

This potash seems to get away, or move about, in a very peculiar manner.
Our friend over there has it manufac¬
tured by nature in saw palmetto roots,
and one funny thing about the palmetto roots (he spoke of it, too) is that when you burn palmetto roots green, you get a high percentage of potash; let them dry two or three months and you get nothing.
Where does it go to ?

Mr. Hume: Any further discussion ?

There is another thing about that saw palmetto root. Most of our Florida soils have a trace of potash. You must re¬
member those palmetto roots have been tracing that trace for a long time; we don’t know how long they may have been after it, but from my observation on the growth of palmettos, I think some of these old roots around in Florida, saw Colum¬
bus. I don’t think we appreciate the fact that it is a very slow-growing plant and the roots are very long.

Of course, when we refer to the potash in saw palmetto, we refer to the ash as being rich in potash. But bear in mind that the ash obtained is a very small part of the plant, and you sift that down and you will find a very small amount of potash from a very large root.
When this is put back on the soil, it may be that trace we were talking about.

There is Prof. Rolfs now. Prof. Rolfs,
you have missed this; I congratulate you.
(Laughter).


82


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


Mr. -: Isn't there a difference in

the soil which would determine the dif¬
ference in the quantity? I mean, the dif¬
ference in the amount of fertilizer to be applied ?

Dr. Ross: Of course, I suppose there should be a difference in the practice in the different sections of the state. Please remember I was alluding- to the light pine soil in Polk County. In this low-lying,
heavier soil, I am not prepared to say.

Mr.-: There is a good deal of dif¬

ference in the soils in this county alone. A
large area of this county, the analysis of the soil by the Department of Agricul¬
ture at Washington and by the state, an average in ammonia is 3 to 4 per cent,
phosphoric acid, about .35 per cent, and


potash one-tenth of 1 per cent. Several young groves are being planted out on this ground, and vegetables of all descrip¬
tions seem to thrive without the aid of any fertilizer whatever. This has been done for several years.

It seems evident, however, that sooner or later we must have potash and phos¬
phoric acid to add to the soil so that it will balance up the ammonia contained in the soil.

Speaking about the potash that Nature provides. There is very little potash in a soil that analyzes ten-one-hundredths of
1 per cent, yet our vegetables harden up well and stand shipments on that small percentage of potash.




Orchard Heating


B. C. Skinner


The members of this Association are probably more interested at the present time in the results obtained from orchard heating during the past freeze, than any other phase of the subject. The writer,
has, therefore, endeavored to collect in¬
formation on the results obtained and the methods employed in some of the lead¬
ing groves.

The results obtained have generally been excellent and have shown conclu¬
sively that firing pays. Preparing for a freeze is really a form of insurance and the grower does not expect a return of ten per cent per year, but rather a large return at long intervals. During the past thirty years the records show the freezes of more or less intensity occur at inter¬
vals averaging six to seven years. The saving from freeze damage will, if ade¬
quate preparation is made, pay for the initial investment, pay the cost of taking care of the wood, fire pots or coke stoves,
and pay the interest on the investment and a handsome profit besides.

The average up-to-date grower insures his house, barn and other buildings and his own life, but it is surprising what a small percentage of growers have in the past insured their groves and crops by preparing for freezes. It is probable,
however, that this percentage will be much increased in the future.


The examples of the effects of the freeze stand out prominently; Mr. L. B.
Skinner’s groves which were very well protected and the Floweree groves which were not protected at all owing to the fact that Fort Myers was considered too far south to be hurt by any cold no matter how severe. In the first case the fruit saved by firing amounted to about twenty thousand boxes. It is probable that many of these could have been shipped though frozen and some money received per box,
but it is safe to state that the return would probably be a dollar less per box, on the average. Then, to this saving can be added the crop which Mr. Skinner will get next year. As the average expected crop over the State is generally considered to be less than half the usual crop, it would be fair to state that half of the crop he will get can be credited to the firing,—or probably not less than thirty thousand boxes. The State crop will be short;
prices will be high, and the returns for these thirty thousand boxes will be large.
The investment in firepots and fuel is ap¬
proximately thirty thousand dollars, so it can be readily seen that the saving will pay for this equipment and the compound interest for the past seven years.

The Floweree grove had removed practically all their fruit and the loss there can be measured only by the loss of the


83






84


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


next year’s crop. Up to the present time no bloom has appeared worth mentioning,
so it is probable that they have lost prac¬
tically the entire crop for the next sea¬
son. Their trees were in good shope be¬
fore the freeze and a conservative esti¬
mate of the crop for next season placed it at 200 boxes per acre which is not by any means excessive. As grapefruit are now bringing two to three dollars per box the loss on fruit alone will be practically
$400 per acre. As protection could have been obtained for from two to three hun¬
dred dollars per acre the saving on next year’s crop would have paid for this pro¬
tection. Then consider the loss for two to three years to follow and the expense of pruning out the enormous amount of dead wood, and it is readily seen that the investment would have paid well. As this grove covers about four hundred acres the loss is enormous.

The sources of heat used in firing are wood, oil and coke. The wood is very satisfactory, the main objection to it be¬
ing the difficulty in getting enough wood for large acreage. In preparing to fire it is essential that enough wood be pro¬
vided to fire three nights in succession,
as, usually, the severe freezes are of this duration. It is useless to fire one. night and let your trees freeze on the second night. Another point of importance is to provide a large number of fires and not to be too saving of wood. Endeavor to save the grove and not the fire wood, should be the warning given the men attending the fires. The average of a large num¬
ber of fires is a better distribution of heat without danger of scorching the trees


nearest the fires. One hundred fires to the acre is recommended.

When firing with oil pots it is just as important to provide a supply of fuel for three successive nights, and just as im¬
portant to have a large number of fires.
One hundred to the acre is recommended as giving the best protection, though one in every square where trees are spaced twenty-five foot centers has given good results. The oil for the first night is stored in the pots in the grove. The re¬
serve fuel is stored in tanks at convenient places about the grove and distributed by means of wagon tanks. The grower should use an oil which is not too heavy,
for two reasons: The first is that the heavy oils obtainable in Florida come from Texas and have an asphalt base which cannot be burned in the ordinary oil fire pot; it, therefore, remains as a resi¬
due in the pot and after several firings re¬
duces the capacity of the heater to a con¬
siderable extent. The second objection is the difficulty in getting this heavy oil to run through valves and pipes when the temperature is around thirty-five degrees.
Heavy oil is like molasses under these conditions. The fuel best suited is what is known as “fuel distillate.”

The use of oil pots has many objections among which may be mentioned the dam¬
age to roots of the trees through spilling of oil, the high initial cost of the pots,
storage tanks, and oil sufficient to give the necessary protection, and the difficulty in refilling these pots after the first night’s freeze. For these reasons many growers are turning to coke stoves.

The stoves cost less than the oil pots;


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


85


the coke which is used as fuel does not deteriorate even when exposed to the weather. The cost of coke at the present time is high owing to the demands made on the coke burners by the steel mills.
Even at the present prices of $4.00 to
$10.00 per ton, coke is cheaper than oil.
The coke stove seems to be more efficient than the oil pots for the reason that it gives off its heat close to the ground, the radiating surface is vertical so that the most intense radiation is directed hori¬
zontally where most needed. The draft required for complete combustion is small so that very little heat is carried away by the gases coming out of the stove,
and (most important of all) the heat ra¬
diating area is large. Experiments on a coke stove twelve inches in diameter by two feet high show that the coke will be red hot for a depth of twelve inches,
whether the stove is half full or filled to the top. This gives a total area of very hot metal of three square feet. In the case of the oil pot the body of the pot has no value as a radiating surface for the oil keeps it cool. The top of the pot is of very little value, since it is practically flat so most of the radiant heat is directed vertically where not needed. This leaves only the stack which gets red hot for a distance of about twelve inches above the pot; as it is only four inches in diameter the total useful area is only one square foot, or one-third of the useful area of the coke stove.

The coke stove has been used by Mr.
H. B. Stevens in the Stetson Groves with success. He has used a large stove and few to the acre, but recommends a smaller


stove and a greater number to the acre in order to get better distribution of heat.
There is another advantage of the small stove. If you reduce the diameter of the stove by one-half you only reduce the ra¬
diating area one-half, but at the same time reduce the amount of coke necessary to fill the stove by three-fourths^-a very considerable saving.

The coke stove has been used in Whit¬
tier, California, for three years. The writer hopes to get definite information as to the success obtained there. They have been satisfactory, we know, for the num¬
ber of the coke stoves used has been in¬
creased each year by these parties.

It is to be hoped that the growers of
Florida will realize the value of this form of insurance and be prepared before another winter. It will pay in peace of mind as well as in dollars and cents.


Discussion

Mr. Hume: Mr. Hart, I believe you wished to say something about this sub¬
ject.

Mr. Hart: As we have a good deal to do, I will take only a few minutes.

In firing groves I have used wood for years, with very good results. I consider it one of the best materials we can use in protecting groves. There are a few drawbacks in my section; one is it is hard to get light wood; another is that it takes a good many men to handle even a small grove. Oftentimes when a freeze is on you cannot get all the help you need. This winter I had to let about one-fourth of



86


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


my grove go, and it was injured more or less by cold, while the rest of it was saved so far as the trees go, and the fruit was saved so that I got good prices on the market after the freeze.

Coke I know very little about; I never have used it but if it is better than oil
I am very anxious to know it, because I
want to use the best material I can get and that I can have available for the second and third and fourth nights, if necessary; something I can have in the grove ready to handle immediately with¬
out the employment of much help.

My custom is to have two rows of wood around the north and west sides of my grove and try to warm up the air as it comes into the grove, and then keep it warm by the use of oil pots.

I have not used the ground draft oil pot, because it does not seem to be as good as the square or oblong pots that were used before it came in.

I like those because you can have the heat where you want it. They also throw off considerable smoke, and I am con¬
vinced that smoke is of great value.
This year, where there was a two-acre grove to the northwest of another grove and there was one to the southeast, not being protected at all except as it got the smoke and warmth from the other groves,
that two acre grove was perfectly pro¬
tected the coldest night we had and the fruit was shipped and brought a good,
fair price, $550.00 per carload.

I find that fruit lightly frosted will dry out a little in one end, but if left in the grove for a little while, they will come


out all right. But $550.00 a carload is good from groves that have not been fired at all.

In protecting your grove, you not only protect your fruit for this year, but you also protect your crop for next year, as has been mentioned. That is well worth considering. Even if your trees are only frozen enough to drop the leaves,
that is quite a shock to the tree. The orange tree holds its leaves three years,
and if they all come off at once, that is quite a shock.

Another thing, now, in regard to prun¬
ing. If the trees have to be trimmed back to the size of your finger, that is a whole lot of work. A tree, too, after pruning like that, is more subject to disease.

Going back to the subject of oil pots.
I have heard those who have used it com¬
plain about the water getting into the pot.
You have to watch them very carefully or water will get into them in spite of you,
and then when you start the fire going,
as soon as that water gets heated enough to be converted into steam (water when converted into steam increases its volume about 600 times), it will throw the oil and fire and everything all around, and you may have a serious injury.

I have large tanks that hold 900 and
1000 gallons and quite a number that hold
600 gallons. I took what is called a bilge pump and I went around and pumped the water out from the bottom of my tanks,
and in some of my tanks I got as much as fifteen pails full of water, that had settled at the bottom of the oil in my 600
gallon tanks.

If you don’t pump this water out, it


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


87


will make trouble for you, or, at least,
get it out some way.


S. C. Warner

Our grove which is located on the east bank of the St. Johns River, five miles north of Palatka, a section of about twenty acres, is protected. About one-
third of this is grapefruit and two-thirds oranges. On thirteen acres there are tight board fences or walls, thirteen feet high, spaced eighty-four feet apart. On the balance these walls are spaced one hundred and sixty-eight feet apart. These walls face the northwest and act as wind¬
breaks.

For heating purposes we use pine wood, preferably lighter-wood.
This is placed in alternate rows, the fire heaps laid as near each other as practica¬
ble. These fires are small, consisting usu¬
ally, of three or four good sized four-foot sticks, under which have been placed kindling and some rotten wood. We light one or two of these heaps, as are needed, for each two trees. Kerosene is poured on to the kindling and rotten wood (which acts as a wick) and lighted with a torch, one man carrying the kero¬
sene can in one hand and the torch in the other hand.

We find that one man can take care of two acres and keep the fires burning well.
Reserve of wood is kept in cord piles be¬
tween the trees, the ends of the sticks opposite the fire rows. In this way our reserve is convenient for the workers.

During the last eight years we have


used about 100 cords of wood at a cost of
$3.00 per cord. The labor costing rather less than the fuel.

The total cost for protection during the past eight years, including upkeep of fences, interest on investment, placing the fire-heaps in position each year and re¬
moving to reserve pile when danger is over, wood burned, labor and kerosene,
will approximate $2,000.00

We have had occasion to fire at only two periods during the above eight years. The total hours fired was sixty, amount of wood consumed, one hundred cords,
which also includes fuel lost by rotting.
Cost for actual firing $600.00.

The results during the freeze of this winter were most pronounced. The lower half of the trees was saved in ex¬
cellent condition, including new wood and bloom. The upper half was defoli¬
ated and fruit injured, though but few twigs were killed, and showing now much better than trees outside the protection.

The monetary value of this protection this season alone will amount to —Fruit saved (on ten acres, the other ten having been picked) $1,200; prospective crop
$1,300.00, total $2,500.00.

The superior condition of the protected trees also is of considerable value, per¬
haps $3,000.00 to $5,000.00.

The result of this season’s work could have been much improved had we placed fire-heaps between the trees in both di¬
rections instead of only in alternate rows,
thus getting a better distribution of heat.
We believe that this arrangement will economize fuel, as well as give better re¬
sults. In wood heating, small fires in




88


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


greater number seem more efficient than much larger fires in less number. Also there is less injury to low growing branches, from the flame. This method is even more desirable during hard frosts than a real freeze with wind, when the heat is circulated into the trees, rather than passing directly upward.

We believe that some efficient method of grove heating is almost a necessity to successful citrus growing, except in such localities as have a natural protection from large bodies of water. These cold


snaps are sure to recur at intervals, caus¬
ing large losses and possibly destruction of the entire tops of the trees. In our situation, on the banks of a wide river,
windbreaks also are necessary, as other¬
wise the heat is swept away. This winter
I believe that our fires would have accom¬
plished nothing without windbreaks. The wind attained a velocity of something like
60 miles per hour and the temperature went to 20 degrees where it remained for about four hours.


Utilization of Citrus Culls and Other Products

by the Florida Home


Prof. Agnes

Mr. Hume; It has always been a source of wonderment to me that so many of our citrus products in this state have gone to waste. There is a side of our
Florida horticulture that for years has been very much neglected. This phase of the question was not borne in on me until I went to Spain some years ago. In going through the citrus districts, I was struck by two things; first, that sour oranges, the common sour orange as we know them, were grown in large numbers in orchards, receiving the same care as was given to the orchard of sweet oranges, and for no other reason than to ship the fruit to England and Scotland and then we import the manufactured pro¬
duct in the shape of orange marmalade to the extent of many hundreds of thou¬
sands of dollars annually.

The other thing that struck me was that in a Spanish orchard, absolutely nothing went to waste. I went through districts and saw the flowers after they were dried and was told that at the bloom¬
ing time they spread sheets under the trees and then as the petals dropped on these sheets they were gathered up, dried,
and sent to the perfume manufacturies.

I saw tons of the small dropped oranges the size of peas or half an inch in cliame-


Ellen Harris

ter. I was told they were dried and used in the manufacture of scents and per¬
fumes and distilling the oil.

I saw tons of orange peels of various kinds that were stripped off the culls and dried. It seems to me that there was not a single thing produced in an orange grove that was not utilized; not a thing was wasted.

But in Florida, we have been wasting these things by tons and tons and thou-
sonds and thousands of dollars.

I hope the time is here, or that we will shortly reach it when these things that are in demand in our country can be sup¬
plied from our own groves throughout this state. There is no reason why orange marmalade cannot be manufactured to the extent of filling the wants and needs of the American market.

I am very glad to know there is a gen¬
eral drift in that direction. The manu¬
facturing of grapefruit juice from fruit that would otherwise be useless, is being undertaken.

I hope that so long as this Society ex¬
ists, it will lend its every effort in fur¬
thering this work, because it means more from our groves, more to us individually,
and more for the State.

I am very happy at this time we have


89



90


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


with us, Professor Agnes Harris from the
Florida State College at Tallahassee, who is going to talk to us along these lines for home purposes, but which are capable of extension into our commercial life.

Miss Harris: I feel cpiite like the ne¬
gro man, who preached a sermon. When he began, he held up two fingers, and when he had closed his remarks, he held up two fingers. Someone asked him why he did that. He said that he copied his ser¬
mon, and holding up two fingers were quotation marks.

I have here nothing that I myself have found out, but I have had the pleasure of being in charge of the demonstration work that was started in the state several year ago, and our girls and women have been working on this work of saving the surplus fruits and vegetables for home use, and if we have done anything that can be of assistance to you, we shall cer¬
tainly be delighted.

The betterment of present living con¬
ditions and the training of the girl for the home of tomorrow is the chief aim of
Home Demonstration Work. We have not manufactured products from the grove on that large scale necessary to place them on a wholesale basis. We have, however, taught through our work,
the preservation of the fruits from the grove for home use, and in a small way have developed this work to commercial proportions.

Florida fruits have been shipped into other states, manufactured into marma¬
lades, preserves and jellies, and have been placed upon the market at a profit. A
recognition of the fact that a large per¬


cent of our fruit crop now goes to waste as culls, strongly suggests the undevelop¬
ed possibilities in this field of work within our State. Scientific investigation should precede the development of such work on a large scale. We have not been unmind¬
ful of this fact, but we have had no funds with which to pursue such investigation.
By frequent appeals to the Bureau of
Chemistry, at Washington, we have had four brief visits from one of their ex¬
perts in this line of work. What he has done has been sufficient to indicate to us what should be done.

As a result of our work, there are now hundreds of women in the State making products of excellent quality; but our work and the work of the manufacturers in the State, would be greatly helped if more scientists were at work upon our fruits, developing the best methods for handling them, and determining the need¬
ed equipment in kitchen and factory for the same. If there is money in marma¬
lades, jellies and preserves produced by factories located at a distance from the groves, then surely there is a profit to be realized on these products made in Flor¬
ida.

On the shelves of Florida's retail stores,
are California fruits of many kinds,
Louisiana figs, jellies and jams from vari¬
ous other States and English marmalades far inferior to the products which could be made from our own fruits. We should not only be supplying our home market,
but finding a place for our products in other fields.

In this discussion of the utilization of products from the grove, it will be im-


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


Qi


possible to give methods or recipes.
Should you be interested in these, you will find a collection of the ones that Dr.
Straughn, of the U. S. Department of
Agriculture, Bureau of Chemistry, Wash¬
ington, D. C. and others have worked out for us, in Bulletin No. 8, “Jellies, Pre¬
serves and Marmalades.’’

GUAVAS

In entering this discussion, we will first take up the guava. The two products from this fruit which we are emphasiz¬
ing, are the canned guava in tin and glass,
and the jelly from seed, pulp and peel.
We recommend the canning of the thick meated guava, with seed and pulp re¬
moved, in a heavy syrup; and the making of jelly from the seed, peel and pulp.
The guava may be canned without sugar,
but the fruit canned in the syrup is a far superior product. This should in part replace the canned California peach on the Florida grocery shelves.

In DeSoto County last fall, Elma
Wetherington, assisted by members of her family, put up 1,000 No. 2 cans of guavas in a heavy syrup, and soldi them for from 10 to 12 cents per can. In Marion
County one family put up 895 No. 3
cans and sold them at 35 cents per can retail. In a number of other instances,
families have canned guavas. I have never heard of anyone failing to dispose of their guavas. Of course, it is much better for commercial purposes to can any fruit in tin. Even with cans at the pres¬
ent prices, we will be able to sell products for sufficient profit to make it worth while.


GUAVA JELLY

In studying the making of any jelly,
we might with profit, refer to Miss
Goldthwaite’s Bulletin on Jellies and
Jelly-making, published by the University of Illinois, (Champaign, Ill.) as result of
Miss Goldthwaite’s reseach work begun in 1908. Miss Goldthwaite says : “Ideal fruit jelly is a beautifully colored, trans¬
parent, palatable product obtained by so treating fruit juice, that the resulting mass will quiver, not flow, when removed from its mold; a product with texture so tender that it cuts easily with a spoon,
and yet so firm that the angles thus pro¬
duced, retain their shape, a clear product that is neither syrupy, gummy, sticky nor tough, neither is it brittle, and yet it will break and does this with a distinct beauti¬
ful cleavage which leaves sparkling char¬
acteristic faces. This is that delicious,
appetizing substance, a fruit jelly.”

To get an ideal fruit jelly, several fac¬
tors must be considered. In the fruit juice there must be a substance akin to starch in composition and similar to gela¬
tin in characteristics only, called pectin.
This substance occurs in cooked juices in larger quantities than in the raw juice.

A jelly may be produced if the juice contains this substance and also> contains sufficient acid, with the proper amount of sugar added. An equal amount of ethyl alcohol and the fruit juice shaken to¬
gether gently, but never stirred, gives you instantly, definite information as to whether or not the juice contains pectin and in what proportion. If pectin is pres¬
ent the alcohol precipitates in a clot. The quantity of sugar added, should be based


•92


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


upon the amount of pectin contained in the juice. If the pectin is precipitated in a solid clot, one cup of sugar may be added for each cup of juice taken. If the precipitate is a broken mass, reduce the quantity of sugar in proportion to the amount of pectin contained.

If the proper amount of sugar is added to an acid fruit juice containing pectin,
an ideal jelly results. Miss Goldthwaite found that if too little sugar is added, the volume is less, the color deeper and the product tough. If too much sugar is added, the volume is increased, the color decreased in intensity, the pectin becomes softer, until finally it appears in lumps.

Failure in jelly making more frequently occurs because of the addition of too much sugar, than from any other cause.
If the juice does not contain the necessary amount of acid, more may be added. “A
fair rule is to add sufficient tartaric or citric acid powder, to make the juice of acid taste.” The acid should be well stirred in the juice and entirely dissolved before tasting. To determine the correct acidity for the housekeeper, is a matter of experience.

Dr Straughn in a report to Chief Als-
berg, of the Bureau of Chemistry, says that out of five varieties of guavas that he worked with, three had too small an amount of acid to make a good jelly,
but by the addition of citric acid, tartaric acid, lactic acid or lemon juice, an ex¬
cellent jelly could be produced. This acid should be declared on the label for inter¬
state commerce. The juice from the thick meated guava would not make jelly,


but by adding sufficient acid, an excellent jelly was produced.

The time for cooking jelly varies ac¬
cording to the amount of pectin in the juice and the proportion of sugar used.
The flaking or sheeting from the spoon is the most satisfactory jelly test, but in the making of guava jelly, this test is not to be relied on. For this reason the housekeepers from the North, who are accustomed to making jelly from cur¬
rants, apples and other such fruit, fail.

Dr. Straughn reports that frequently he got an excellent flake or sheet from the spoon when the thermometer regis¬
tered 105 degrees C. and 106 degrees, but when the jelly was cool, a syrup resulted.
He also reports that of the sixty batches he made, in which the acidity, pectin and sugar were all correct, successful jelly was produced by cooking the jelly to 108
degrees C.

The color of guava jelly depends, not on the color of the guava, but on the time taken to bring to the jellying point, usu¬
ally about 108 degrees C. The longer the juice and sugar are cooked together to reach this point, the darker in color is the finished product. In his experiments he found that the longer guava jelly was cooked to reach the jellying point, the deeper red it became. One batch of guava juice was divided into six equal portions. The same amount of sugar was added to each, and each batch cooked to
108 degrees C., but the time of cooking each succeeding batch was lengthened.
The first batch was cooked rapidly, reach¬
ing 108 degrees C. in a few minutes.


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


93-


Jelly of six different shades was pro¬
duced, varying in shade from a light am¬
ber when cooked rapidly, to a deep red when cooked slowly. One manufacturer of guava jelly withdrew from the State,
because a standard color could not be obtained.

If a standard color is to be obtained,
this point must receive consideration.
Unripe guavas do not make a standard jelly. Jelly made from seed and pulp,
shows no difference in flavor and texture,
from the jelly made from the meat and peel. Dr. Straughn states that all jelly made from seed and pulp, needs acid.

CITRUS MARMALADES

Marmalades may be made from the grapefruit, kumquat, orange, sour orange,
tangelo and other fruits, or from a com¬
bination of these fruits. The grapefruit,
orange and pineapple made in Tampa under the name of G. O. P. Marmalade has proven a splendid selling product. It would be a simple plan to can the pine¬
apple in its season, and use it with the orange and grapefruit in marmalade making when there is a surplus of the citrus fruit.

The sour orange marmalade has been most generally and successfully made by our club members. By following general instructions, a standard product can be produced. This orange is identical with the Seville Orange, which is shipped from
Spain to Dundee, Scotland, made into the famous Dundee Marmalade and shipped to America. Two years ago an American factory attempted to buy 600 boxes of these oranges in Florida and was unable


to find them. The order was filled in
Porto Rico. I am told that 200 boxes of these oranges were shipped to England from Dade County last year.

A variety of marmalades may be made from one fruit. The peel may be ground or sliced, the amount left in the marma¬
lade varies from one-quarter to all of the peel, and the length of the time cooked determines the color.

An ideal marmalade is of a light yel¬
low color, transparent, and with sufficient peel in it to have it generally distributed through the glass. It should be of jelly-
like consistency, and if the peel is sliced it should be sufficiently thin to be trans¬
parent. Thick pieces of peel should be avoided.

ORANGE PECTIN

Miss Goldthwaite in her experimental work with jellies, on observing that orange marmalade had a jelly-like consis¬
tency, tested out the orange juice for pectin and found it deficient. By remov¬
ing the outer yellow skin of the orange,
and from the white portion extracting a juice, she obtained an acidless, tasteless r colorless liquid rich in pectin. Her method has been generally followed, and this juice added to a fruit juice lacking pectin may be made into jelly. The fruit juice gives the needed color, flavor and acid and by this combination a successful jelly may be made. For example, from pineapple juice, deficient in pectin, delici¬
ous jelly may be made by combining it with pectin juice. The pineapple juice must first be boiled to render inactive the pectin-destroying enzyme. Strawberry juice frequently lacks the necessary pectin


94


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


to make jelly successfully, but by adding pectin juice of orange an ideal jelly may be made. A jelly made by this combi¬
nation will not have the rich red color of the strawberry jelly made without the pectin unless the pectin juice is heavy or the jelly is cooked slowly.

It has been suggested that this pectin juice can be used as a basis for pie filling,
and that it should find a ready market with the manufacturers of pie fillers.
Confectioners can find frequent use for this substance in making candy and cake fillings. The club girls throughout the
State have found a ready market for a jelly made from the orange pectin juice and sugar, with lemon juice added to give acidity, a vegetable coloring used to give a green color and flavored with mint.

The peel of the grapefruit in marma¬
lade causes it to be bitter, objectionable to some but relished by others. By extract¬
ing the bitter from the peel, the pectin is also removed, making a marmalade lacking a jelly-like consistency, but by adding orange pectin juice a marmalade of the required consistency can be made.

With the bottling of the orange juice and manufacture of an oil from the yel¬
low skin, cannot the white portion re¬
maining be made into pectin juice of com¬
mercial value; of value to the home¬
maker for use in her marmalades and her berry jellies; and of value to the manufacturers of candy, pie and marma¬
lades?

ORANGE JUICE

We have just started to bottle fruit juices. This year, immediately after the freeze, there were hundreds of bottles


of the juice put up. A small capping machine has been put on the market this year, which will assist those who wish to bottle juices in small quantities.

ORANGE VINEGAR

Dr. Chase last year became interested in making vinegar from orange juices at the Citrus By-Products Laboratory in
California. He made io hogsheads suc¬
cessfully, and sent samples of this orange juice vinegar to some of the leading wholesale merchants in the middle West.
Immediately came orders from every firm to which samples were sent. One firm ordered a car load. If all the juice of our citrus culls was made into vinegar it should go far towards supplying Florida with vinegar.

CRYSTALLIZED GRAPEFRUIT PEEL

No product is made in the State by our girls and women with greater profit than the crystallized grapefruit peel. Even when sugar has been at the highest price this product has been sold at a splendid profit. It may be cut into various shapes,
given various colors, or left the natural beautiful color; it is rolled in powdered or granulated sugar. One enterprising woman puts it on the market in a tin box,
for which she receives 80 cents per pound.
One of the County Agents writes that one of her co-operators crystallizes the peel and sells it for one dollar per pound.
In Dade County, a number of the women crystallized whole grapefruits. This, filled with grapefruit crystallized sticks, sells at one dollar per pound. The Tourist Sec-


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


95


tion is a splendid market for this product.

KUMQUAT PRODUCTS

No fruit from the grove lends itself to our work better than the kumquat. By plunging the fruit into boiling water, with a large proportion of soda, the oil sacks are broken, the peel made tender and much of the oil removed. From kum-
quats so treated, the preserves put up of whole kumquats and of the halves, a marmalade of excellent quality, a sweet pickle and crystallized kumquats may be made. The kumquat juice is rich in pec¬
tin. A confection may be made from this by preparing the juice from the fruit as for jelly, and adding to it sugar, and the kumquat boiled until tender and rubbed through a seive. This may be used like fondant as a basis for French candy, and also may be made into a gum drop. Kum¬
quats being rich in pectin, may be com¬
bined with the strawberry juice.

One woman in Brevard County who is selling thousands of glasses of jelly this year, makes a kumquat jelly flavored with mint and colored green. She calls it mint julep jelly.

Mrs. Ives, of Manatee, in response to a request from the Waldorf-Astoria for roselle jelly, sent samples of other pro¬
ducts and received from them at once an order for fifty-five pounds of kumquat jelly and later the order was duplicated.

REPORTS FROM HOME DEMONSTRATION

WORK

The following reports sent in from some of the home demonstration County


agents indicate to what extent this work is being carried on in some of the thirty-
three counties in the State.

From Putnam County 5,300 containers of products from the citrus fruits and
5,740 containers of products from the guava are reported this year. Winifred
Cannon, a Putnam County Club Girl,
made 1,500 glasses of guava jelly last year. She sold to the home market large¬
ly, supplying hotels near, but shipped a few cases North. Winifred has a good trade in citrus products, getting the citrus fruit at home. She buys all the guavas she needs and still makes a good profit.
From her prizes and profits this year, she is planning to build and equip a small preserving kitchen.

In Osceola County, 8,000 containers were reported, with one girl reporting
500 quarts of canned guavas, and 275
other containers.

In Brevard County, 8,800 containers were filled by the girls before the contest,
but the County Agent writes that several of the girls are making quantities of jel¬
lies and marmalades and find a ready sale for them.

Mrs. Vandergrift of St. Augustine, had had an excellent business for the past two years, and besides selling 312 half gallon jars of marmalade, she has sold 486 con¬
tainers filled with other preserves and jel¬
lies.

In DeSoto County a group of girls put up 1,400 glasses of guava jelly and sold it in Tampa.

In Polk County a number of women and. girls are making and selling marma-




96


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


lades and citrus fruits products at a good profit.

From Marion County we get the re¬
port that a number of families who live on groves are making marmalades and supplying the local markets, besides be¬
ginning to fill mail orders.

Leona Dedge, of Duval County, after the freeze, bought ten dollars worth of sugar, with this made marmalade of the frozen sour oranges from a tree in her yard. She sold $30.00 worth, besides having a liberal supply for the family pantry.

To estimate that the women and girls of our clubs have put up over 100,000
containers of marmalades, jellies, crystal¬
lized fruits and other products from the grove, is conservative. The most im¬
portant work our girls and women are doing, is the canning of vegetables in tin for the pantry and home market.

We shall continue our work in training the women and girls in the making of


these products, but we hope the time will soon come when the owners of groves will look into the possibilities of produc¬
ing on a factory scale, these by-products from the grove, that factories may con¬
tinue their investigations, and that our trained workers may assist in operating these factories.


Discussion

Mr. Hume: Is there any discussion of this address of Miss Harris’s? Any questions you would like +o ask?

Mr. Skinner: I want to move a special vote of thanks for this very valuable paper.

Motion seconded.

Mr. Hume. Let us give it rising. (Mo¬
tion carried).

Miss Harris. I wish to vote this audi¬
ence my thanks for being interested in this kind of work.



Tropical Fruits


R. L. Goodwin


Mr. President and friends:

I am the only one on the committee that is present. I thought some time ago it would be impossible for me to be pres¬
ent at this meeting, and I depended upon the rest of the Committee to furnish pa¬
pers upon tropical fruits and pineapples.
Fortunately, I found my way clear to come and here I am, and will tell you what I know.

Many of you, as you came down the
East Coast, saw the pineapples, and they looked bad. But I want to assure you they are not all dead. Probably 60 per pent of the crop has been lost from the effect of the freeze, and possibly another
20 per cent has been lost from the effects of our prolonged drought. From thirty-
five acres, I expect to ship somewhere in the neighborhood of 1500 crates. The fields that have been taken care of, that have been well fertilized, will give a minF
mum crop. The fields that have not been taken care of, will in all probability, be abandoned. The good fields will yield a good fall crop and next season a full crop.

In 1909, from the East Coast we ship¬
ped over one million crates of pineapples.
Last year, I believe we shipped less than
200,000. The industry has been gradu¬
ally declining from 1909 to the present time.


There is more than one cause for this;
one, the increased cost of fertilizer, crate material, labor, etc. You cannot run a pineapple plantation without fertilizing it heavily.

Various problems have come up since
1909, and among them is a diseased con¬
dition, or insect; in fact we do not know what it is but we call it wilt. There is a condition where the plants thrive for a while and then the leaves wilt and the plants fail to give a crop.

About three years ago, the wilt became alarming, and we took it up with the Ex¬
periment Station at Gainesville. They sent some of their scientific men down and their investigations have resulted in finding that the roots are affected with nematodes—root knot. How we are going to continue in the pineapple busi¬
ness and get rid of this trouble, is a ques¬
tion.

I have pineapples that were planted in
1892, that have borne for twenty-four years in succession, and are in fairly good condition. I have been applying plenty of fertilizer to them.

It seems to me we have tried to make the ground produce for entirely too long a period. We have exhausted the ele¬
ments of fertility in the soil, and we do not know what to do with the land


7






98


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


now unless crop rotation will restore it. We have grubbed the plants off the land, turned them under, and planted velvet beans. We hope to starve out the nematodes.

But if we find the nematodes are still there after a year, we will plant natal grass and turn that under, still with the idea of putting back the fertility in the land. If after three years of crop rota¬
tion, pineapples cannot be grown, the pineapple industry on the East Coast,
taken as a whole, is doomed. On the
West Coast, from Haines City south, you have land similar in character to the land on the East Coast of Florida. It may be possible the industry could be started in that part of the state, but a location must be found that is as immune from frost as is the ridge south of Fort Pierce, front¬
ing the Indian River with water protec¬


tion as we have on the west of the ridge.

I have planted four acres of limes on our worn out pineapple lands, and I am assured by our agricultural bureau that we can grow them there. During the freeze, I had lime trees fourteen inches high that received very little damage.
Large lime trees were scarcely damaged at all; on one or two trees a single branch was injured enough to cut back.

We can grow limes, avocados, man¬
gos, velvet beans and natal grass, and we are seeking for something else that can be grown that will yield a commercial profit. Pineapples have been a great product, and the culture of pineapples has turned thousands of dollars into the pock¬
ets of the grower. Now we are seeking to find something else as staple as pine¬
apples, to give us large profits.


Peaches and Other Deciduous Fruits


THE HOME FRUIT GARDEN


Maj. W. L. Floyd


In order to vary this report somewhat from those of recent years, I will discuss the home fruit garden consisting mainly of deciduous fruits; by so doing I trust
I will not be considered as deviating too far from the subject assigned the com¬
mittee.

The home fruit garden should receive the attention of every home maker in the state. No place is so small but that some fruit trees may be planted on the grounds,
on the larger ones no area will produce greater returns if pleasure, healthfulness and financial returns are taken into con¬
sideration.

We are notably a fruit-consuming peo¬
ple. Observe the dried, canned, pre¬
served, as well as fresh fruits that are brought into the state, consider the varie¬
ties adapted to our soil and climate and you must be impressed with the oppor¬
tunities for us to help reduce the high cost of living by growing our own fruit.

We give much attention to the growing of certain fruits commercially, while do¬
ing this we acquire a knowledge of the principles which are applicable to growing a much greater number of kinds suitable for the home table, yet how rare it is to see a good fruit garden in Florida with


its well selected varieties, properly ferti¬
lized, cultivated, pruned and sprayed so that it will be a pleasure and profit to its owner.

The following is a suggestion of what may be planted in such a home garden, an acre in extent in the vicinity of Gaines¬
ville.

5 Pecans, 42x40 ft.; 10 Plums, 15x15
ft.; 4 Pomegranates, 15x15 ft.; 28
Peaches, 15x15 ft.; 14 Pears, 26x20 ft.;
2 Apples, 26x20 ft.; 20 Figs, 10x10 ft.;
20 Bunch Grapes, 10x10 ft.; 10 Musca¬
dine Grapes, 20x20 ft.; 1260 Strawber¬
ries, 3x1 ft.

A total of 1373 plants of 10 different kinds, for some of which different varie¬
ties of each kind are desirable. Further south of course a number of changes would be made substituting subtropical for the hardier kinds.

SOIL

The location must be selected with ref¬
erence to the residence. It should be near by, either to the side or rear. So very often the best adapted soil can not be used. Therefore, special attention should be given to its improvement in order to make it suitable for the purpose intended.


99







100


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


As most of the Florida soil is light and sandy the addition of vegetable matter should be given first consideration.
In many cases it will be advisable to grow a leguminous cover crop such as velvet beans or beggar weed, and turn it under before the trees are planted. Cowpeas should not be used because of their susceptibility to root-knot which may be spread through¬
out the soil to attack the trees when planted. In some cases more than one such crop is desirable; as where there is but little humus in the soil and it is quite porous and lacking in plant food. Care¬
ful attention should be given to drainage and proper preparation of soil before planting.

PLANTING

Most of the trees will probably be purchased from a nursery. Florida nurs¬
erymen should be given preference as they are more familiar with the plants suited to Florida conditions. We have a num¬
ber of reliable ones which can assist much in the selection of proper varieties adapt¬
ed to a given locality. December and
January are the preferable months for making the plantings. All broken and decayed roots should be cut away, leaving only clean cut surfaces, and as the roots must be very much reduced in transplant¬
ing, the tops should be cut back in pro¬
portion to the roots remaining. For most fruit trees they should be cut back from 18 inches to 24 inches, so when growth begins, a low headed tree will de¬
velop. In digging the holes for the plants they should be made large enough to receive the roots without bending or


crowding together. The top soil should be placed to one side in digging, and after the tree has been put in place this top soil should be put in first about the roots.
It should be packed closely and if moist no water is necessary, but the sub-soil should be rounded up to a height of 6
inches to 8 inches about the stem of the plant. Careful cultivation should be given throughout the season up to about
July 1st. After growth starts it is well to put one or two pounds of a good com¬
mercial fertilizer about each tree and work it in lightly. A cover crop should be grown after cultivation ceases. This latter should be worked into the soil in
October or November to increase its hu¬
mus content.

This home fruit garden is a good place to grow a few rare plants, as one often likes to grow things not ordinarily grown in the vicinity. New introductions may be tried out, thus securing valuable infor¬
mation regarding adaptability. Every fruit grower should feel a pride in in¬
troducing and growing successfully something that may prove of value and thereby adding to the list of those adapted to Florida conditions.

Many, too, are likely to become inter¬
ested in propagating their own plants.
The trying out of buds and scions and ex¬
perimenting in methods of propagation will add much to the interest in this home planting.

PRUNING

Since no two plants are alike, each plant presents a special problem to the pruner; as different kinds of plants bear their fruit differently he observes these


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


IOI


differences and gives them proper con¬
sideration in his work. He may give more importance to the form of his trees,
or more to general welfare and behavior,
but in either case personal preference and opportunity are important factors in his pruning. No operation connected with the trees will bring the owner into such close contact and sympathy with them.
He should thoughtfully and patiently work out his ideas as in the training of a child. He must use proper implements,
make clean smooth cuts, and prune at the right time.

SPRAYING

As fruit growing has developed, insect and fungal pests have increased. No one can now reasonably expect to be success¬
ful without being able to recognize the most troublesome of these and knowing the best remedies for them. A good spray pump is, therefore, a indispensable ad¬
junct to this home fruit garden. If an acre or more is included in it, a barrel pump would be the most satisfactory; for smaller area a good bucket pump should be secured.

In addition to the economic value of the home fruit garden which one natur¬
ally thinks of first, there is an aesthetic side not to be overlooked. The beauty of


shapely trees, conveniently placed with their flowers and fruit in season adds much to the beauty and home like appear¬
ance of a place. They furnish havens for the birds, where in return for their toll of fruit they give their generous aid in destroying insects, in field and garden,
their gay companionship and cheerful songs. The man who grows old in his fruit garden lives in daily communion with nature, with the associations of ear¬
lier years about him, and the conditions most favorable for making him, like his favorite fruit, grow mellower with the years.


Discussion

Mrs.-: I would like to ask how he

manages to raise apples in his garden.

Maj. Floyd: The garden I propose is supposed to be grown in the vicinity of
Gainesville. We do succeed in raising a few apples of poor quality there. You will note I put in only two trees in my garden, and I put them there largely for association’s sake. Many of us come from other states and for the sake of the old apple tree we remember, I would stick in one or two, provided my garden is anywhere north of Ocala.





Avocado Varieties for Florida


E. D. Vosbury, U. S.

That the avocado shows great promise of becoming an important fruit crop of
Florida is well indicated by the interest which so many of our foremost horticul¬
turists are taking in its culture. Where only a few years ago our entire crop was harvested from a few scattered seedling trees, there are now over 500 acres of budded groves in Florida and plantings are rapidly increasing. Of the many problems which must be solved before this new fruit industry becomes fully established, none is more important than that of the selection of standard varieties.
While it is true that our present data on avocado varieties for Florida are still scanty and incomplete, it might be well worth while at the very start of the game to sum up our experience to date and to consider the merits and limitations of a few of the many varieties already avail¬
able.

More than 140 varieties are described in recent publications. In order to more conveniently study this large number of avocado varieties several attempts have been made to group together those varie¬
ties having common characteristics. Per¬
haps the most convenient plan of classi¬
fication is that which divides them into the West Indian, Guatemalan, and Mexi¬
can races.


Dept, of Agriculture

THE WEST INDIAN RACE

Most of the common avocado trees in
Florida, seedling as well as budded, be¬
long to the West Indian race. The fruits of this race are variable in size, with thin skins, and ripen in Florida from July to
December. The origin of this race is held to have been in the warm, moist lowlands of tropical America and this origin is reflected in the tenderness of the trees, which, as illustrated in the recent freeze, are considerably less hardy than the Key lime and somewhat more tender than the common guava. Mature trees be¬
gin to show pronounced injury at about 28
degrees, while at 25 degrees all of the largest trees will be killed to the main trunk or to the ground. Young trees, 1
to 4 years old, are much more tender and may be injured at any temperature below
30 degrees. While the avocados of the
West Indian race are really tropical in nature, there is a considerable area in Flor¬
ida where they may be commercially planted with reasonable safety. This area is perhaps best indicated by the presence of numerous old avocado trees which have grown for years without special attention. It includes much of the
East Coast, from the vicinity of Ft. Pierce south; the best protected localities south


102



FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


103


of Tampa on the West Coast; and por¬
tions of Pinellas County. In the interior of the state only the safest localities, such as the highlands of Pope and DeSoto
Counties and sections protected on the north and northwest by large bodies of water like Lake Okeechobee, can be con¬
sidered reasonably safe for commercial planting.

Of the West Indian varieties the most important and in fact the one standard variety on the market today is the Trapp.
This variety constitutes more than 90 per cent of the budded groves of Florida where it has proven a reliable bearer and a good shipper. The season is from Sep¬
tember to December, a few fruits hanging on later. While Trapp is only fair in quality, it would take a very good variety indeed to replace it as a standard variety for commercial planting.

Pollock has been planted commercially to some extent. The fruit is high in quality and the tree is vigorous, but un¬
fortunately Pollock is such a shy bearer that it is generally considered an unprofi¬
table variety for commercial planting. Its excellent quality, however, will give it a place in many home gardens as an August and September fruit. Occasionally a tree of Pollock is found that is much more productive than the average and it is quite possible that we may eventually find a strain which will combine productivity with the good qualities of this otherwise splendid fruit.

Butler is another August and Septem¬
ber variety recently propagated and dis¬
seminated from the United States Plant
Introduction Garden at Miami, Florida.


It has borne heavily and regularly and is of a very good quality.

A seedling tree possibly originated from a seed of Pollock as yet unnamed is bearing at the same station and is con¬
sidered by Mr. Edward Simmonds, in charge, as the most promising in point of yield, vigor, and quality of the many mid¬
summer varieties he has tested.

Family is another summer variety grown to a limited extent. Although not high in quality it ripens through a long season, from early July to October, and is, for this reason, considered desirable for home groves.

The earliest commercial variety is the
Estelle, ripening in early July. The fruit is only fair and the tree, while productive,
is a weak grower. A very early summer variety, ripening early in July, more vig¬
orous and of better quality than Estelle,
would be a most desirable acquisition.

Webster is considered worthy of men¬
tion as a fruit for home planting to ripen in September and October. It is a reli¬
able bearer and is fine in flavor. In color it is an attractive maroon, and it is inter¬
esting to note in this connection that some growers consider that any color ex¬
cept green will be discounted in the mar¬
ket. Others hold, with perhaps better reason, that the market is still so new that it can be easily educated to take de¬
sirable fruit no matter what the color.
In fact, a distinct color may be of advan¬
tage in advertising a variety.

Among the other very recent West In¬
dian varieties -that seem worthy of men¬
tion are the Baker, a very late variety originating at Ojus; Waldin, another


104


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


very late variety originating at Home¬
stead ; and the McKean, a third very late variety originating at Ft. Myers.

THE GUATEMALAN RACE

In California, where the West Indian varieties are too tender, Guatemalan va¬
rieties are chiefly grown. In recent years,
varieties of this race have attracted great interest in Florida on account of their extreme lateness of season and superior hardiness. In contrast to the thin-skin¬
ned West Indian fruit, they have fruits with a rough, leathery or shell-like skin.
The quality of the Guatemalan fruits,
while quite variable, is held by many to be somewhat superior in flavor and rich¬
ness to the West Indian race.

In season the Guatemalan varieties promise to ripen in Florida from Decem¬
ber to May and even later. This factor of late season may prove a great factor in extending the shipping season so as to make it possible for Florida to ship some variety of avocado practically every month of the year. Furthermore, the
Guatemalan varieties, as demonstrated in the recent freeze, are considerably hardier than West Indian varieties. At the
Miami Station, where the temperature registered approximately 26 degrees, they were for the most part untouched, while
West Indian varieties growing by their side were severely cut back. It must not be supposed, however, that the Guate¬
malan varieties are in any sense freeze-
proof. Mr. Wilson Popenoe, of this De¬
partment, who has made extensive obser¬
vations with avocados in many parts of the world, considers that the average


tree of the Guatemalan race ranks in hardiness with the lemon. During the recent freeze in Florida five-year old trees of many varieties were killed to the ground at a temperature of approxi¬
mately 23 degrees. Some of the Guate¬
malan varieties, Fnerte and Pueblo, for example, appear to be considerably har¬
dier than the average.

The first Guatemalan fruited in Flor¬
ida in 1912 and since that date many varieties have been introduced from Cali¬
fornia. For the most part these are grow¬
ing well although none have fruited suf¬
ficiently as yet to fully establish their value for Florida conditions. Even in
California where Guatemalans have been grown for the past ten years only four or five of the hundred or more varieties that have fruited there are beginning to show up as desirable in all respects. Fuerte,
one of the leading California varieties,
has attracted much attention at Miami on account of its very rapid growth and hardiness. In many of its characteristics the first crop, borne in November, 1916,
was somewhat disappointing, however, as the fruits showed a tendency to shrivel on maturing. Possibly this defect was due to the rapid growth made by the young tree and may disappear as the tree gets older. Its behavior illustrates the point, however, that even the most promising California avocados must be thoroughly tested before they can be safely planted in Florida.

Taft has also fruited in Florida, ripen¬
ing from February to April, and is con¬
sidered worthy of further trial.

Taylor is the only Guatemalan variety


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


105


that has been originated in Florida to date, having been grown from seed at the Miami Station. Its season here is from January to April, and those who are testing it consider it promising for further trial. An introduction of the
United States Department of Agriculture,
which has been propagated under the name of Collins, is a very late variety,
ripening at Miami from April to May.
The fruit, while small, is of high quality and the tree is a vigorous grower. A
very promising new Guatemalan variety,
introduced from Honolulu, is now bear¬
ing at the Miami station for the first time. This variety his been propagated under the name of Beardsley. In point of vigor, late season, and quality, it is one of the most interesting trees so far tested.

THE MEXICAN RACE

The Mexican race originated probably in the highlands of Mexico. The trees are distinguished by a curious anise-like scent of the leaves, and are markedly hardier than either the West Indian or
Guatemalan types. In the recent freeze small trees withstood temperatures below
23 degrees, while large trees have under¬
gone temperatures of 20 degrees without serious injury, indicating a hardiness ap¬
parently as great as the orange.

One seedling Mexican tree has been growing at Waldo, Alachua County, for many years. Most of the Mexican trees now growing in Florida are seedlings,
but several choice named Mexican varie¬
ties are now available. The fruits of most of these varieties are high in quality but usually very small in size, and often


inclined to decay on ripening, so that most authorities consider them unprofi¬
table for commercial groves. For home and local use, however, they will doubt¬
less prove of great value, especially for localities too cold for the West Indian and Guatemalan varieties.

Among the most promising of the
Mexican varieties for Florida is Harmon which ripens at Miami in July. The fruit, although small, is rich and oily and one of the earliest in season. Several other promising named varieties are on the market.

COMMERCIAL VARITIES for FLORIDA

Perhaps the leading question among avocado growers today is “What varie¬
ties shall we plant?” Until the Guate¬
malan varieties have been more fully test¬
ed, commercial planting in Florida will be largely limited to the West Indian varie¬
ties. Most growers of experience agree on Trapp for 75 per cent or more of the groves. Many will plant a good block of the best summer varieties, and this would seem to be an excellent plan. The sum¬
mer varieties are already in good de¬
mand, and moreover the man who has them is able to start shipping earlier and thus better satisfy his customers. In ad¬
dition to Trapp and earlier sorts, most growers plan to plant and test out a few trees each of the most promising Guate¬
malan and new West Indian varieties.

VARIETIES FOR HOME GROVES

While commercial culture is at present limited to the tender varieties and hence



io6


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


to the more tropical portions of the State,
there is a much greater area wherein the avocado may be safely planted for home and local use. Even the more tender varieties can be grown in sheltered door-
yards as far north as Orange and Lake
Counties if the young trees are protected and banked in winter while hardier varie¬
ties, like Harmon, can doubtless be grown in any section not too cold for oranges.

A list of varieties can be selected for home planting which will supply fruit of highest .cjuality through a long season,
beginning, for example, with Harmon in
July ; following with Pollock and Butler for midsummer; Trapp and Webster for fall and Guatemalan variteies for winter and spring. It is now quite possible to pick fruit every month in the year from your own dooryards.

This fruit is high in real food value and is considered a luxury on the finest tables in the country. There is no better way of reducing the Florida summer canned goods bill than to plant avocados in the home grove. These small mixed plant¬
ings will prove, moreover, valuable test plots where the commercial possibilities and the requirements of new varieties can be carefully studied for each locality.
In many cases, old dooryard seedling trees, bearing inferior, scanty crops, have been successfully topworked to superior named varieties.

The biggest problem in the avocado industry today is the selection from the great number of varieties now available,
the half-dozen or so that in vigor, hardi¬
ness, yield, and quality are best suited to rank as standard Florida varieties. To


this end there is no greater service that the grower can render than that of keep¬
ing careful and accurate records of each individual tree in his grove, especially of the new varieties. Such records will enable us to determine not only the com¬
parative value of varieties, but may very possibly result in the discovery of sup¬
erior strains and the elimination of in¬
ferior strains within the variety. When we stop to consider the wide range of hardiness, season, and quality of this new fruit, we must all agree that there is no more fascinating or more profitable ob¬
ject for careful horticultural study than the avocado.


W. J. Krome

Mr. President, Ladies and Gentlemen of the Horticultural Society:

For a man who is usually most pro¬
gressive, our perfectly good president has some decidedly stand-pat tendencies. I
believe I am correct in stating that dur¬
ing the past ten years he has made only one change or addition to the standing committees of this Society. That one exception was the appointment last year of a committee on avocados.

I mention this, however, simply as a positive proof that the avocado has ob¬
tained a firm foot-hold and has become an established factor in the horticulture of the state.

In appointing me as chairman of the
Committee on Avocados, our president probably did not take into consideration that I have some quite pronounced ideas as to the duties of a chairman. Some



FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


107


chairmen, for instance I might cite the chairman of our Citrus Canker Commit¬
tee, have an idea that it is their duty to do a little more work than all the rest of the Committee put together.

My own ideas in that respect are de¬
cidedly different. My idea of the proper duties of a chairman of a committee are that he should see that the other members of the committee do all the work. I have tried to carry that out, and I think, since the president has favored me with a par¬
ticularly strong committee, that you will all agree to be satisfied with my judg¬
ment.

During this time of war and prepara¬
tion for war, we are very prone to analyze the merits of any product from a strictly utilitarian standpoint. From such a basis
I am afraid most of you would not give a great deal of consideration to the avo¬
cado. I think that most of you would agree with a member of the California
Avocado Association. He said at one of their meetings, in speaking of the charac¬
teristics that should be embodied in a


good avocado, that the fruit should have a rich and nutty flavor, and that a good many people considered that was also the qualifications necessary for the consumer of it. (Laughter.)

That is, to some extent, justified, but the things we are learning about varie¬
ties, about cultivation and the apprecia¬
tion that must eventually come to the avocado as a food product, must soon bring to hand the day when the avocado will have a firm place in the horticulture of this state, based strictly on its eco^
nomic value as a food product; not as a luxury, not as a salid fruit, but as a food.
That day is certainly not at hand right now. The fruit is now grown for a re¬
stricted market, but with the extensive plantings that are bound to come and with a fruit that possesses so many high quali¬
ties from a nutritive standpoint, I be¬
lieve that before many years we will see the avocado cultivated as much in Florida as the olive is in Italy, strictly as a food product.


MARKETING AVOCADOS BY PARCEL POST


Mrs. P. H. Rolfs


Mr. President , Ladies and Gentlemen :

After two seasons of interesting and satisfactory results obtained by marketing avocados by parcel post, I believe I have the right to recommend it. By timely ad¬
vertising, careful picking and packing,
and prompt attention to all the details of mail order service, the grower can de¬
velop a satisfactory market for his crop.


The consumer can place on his table pro¬
ducts almost as fresh as can the grower himself, by availing himself of the par¬
cel post method.

The paper published on page 216 of the Proceedings of the Florida State
Horticultural Society for 1915, speaks of the success of my first trial. The fol¬
lowing season the work was necessarily




io8


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


dropped owing to my absence from the state, thus losing the trade so favorably started.

Following the results of last year’s work, a campaign had been planned to market as much as possible of the 1917
crop of avocados by parcel post, but I
am forced to again suspend the work,
this time on account of the disastrous results of the cold of February first.

Before the 1916 crop was ready to be offered to the consumer, mailing boxes and other necessary supplies were secured,
and for six months I was able to give parcel post marketing the second trial,—
again with satisfactory results. The many courteous responses to my request that I be informed of the condition of the fruit at point of destination have furnished information for the writing of this paper.

I have sent parcel post packages to
Maryland, Pennsylvania, Washington, D.
C., Massachusetts, New Jersey, Minne¬
sota, Michigan, Indiana, Ohio, Washing¬
ton (State), New Mexico, Louisiana,
Georgia and Florida. So far as known,
only two boxes were received by the consignee in poor condition. One was due to the use of a damaged box. The loss of the other—sent to New Mexico—
was unaccounted for.

I was determined to test the parcel post shipments into this territory, so a second box was packed exactly as the first, and it was reported to have arrived in good condition. Several fruits were remailed to Alberta, Canada, from a box sent to
Seattle, Wash.

My work so far has been mostly with


seedling avocados and, as is well known,
there are as many variations in the fruit from such a grove, as there are trees in the grove. The fruit from different trees varies also as to time of softening after being cut from the tree.

Unless otherwise noted in the order, I
made it a point to select fruits from sev¬
eral trees. This gives a pleasing varia¬
tion in appearance to the parcel, and also insures that the fruit will not all soften at the same time. With an adequate supply of budded fruits, and the trade knowing what variety to call for, the uniform box will probably prove the better seller.

ADVERTISING

When the fruit on the trees was suf¬
ficiently mature to allow time for an advertisement to appear in the paper and the consumer to place an order, the
Family Box was advertised in one of our
State papers. The proper wording of this advertisement was a problem to an amateur. The one finally used stated the size of the box in inches and price. It is not practicable to advertise by the dozen.
As this method brought results, I shall use the same advertisement, or a similar one, in future mail order work, and have it appear regularly during the season.
A well satisfied customer is one of the best advertisements the grower can have,
so care must be taken to please the buyer.

The extra work and cost of putting up parcel post boxes must not be overlooked by the grower in stating his price. The consumer has the advantage of getting fruit in the shortest possible time after being cut from the tree.



FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


109


NECESSARY SUPPLIES

The following supplies are all that is necessary. Parcel post boxes, gummed strips, packing and twine. Do not use an ordinary pasteboard box and expect satisfactory results, but get the box put out for the purpose.

I use the 6x6x6 and 12x12x4 corru¬
gated mailing boxes, but other sizes would prove equally good. The smaller box closely packed with fruit weighed about seven pounds, the larger about twelve. These boxes in a folded form,
may be obtained in several styles from various dealers. I prefer the one known as the Two Piece L style. When re¬
quired for use they are opened and the bottom flaps are fastened with a gummed strip. After packing, the top flaps are folded over each other, making a double layer of corrugated paper on both top and bottom of the box. It is well to keep a supply made up and ready for use, but care must be taken to keep them clean and dry.

HOW TO PACK

With the made up box placed flat on a table, fruit gathered and orders received,
careful packing is next in order. During the early part of the season the fruits were wrapped in small pineapple wraps,
but later the wraps were discarded. The wrapping is believed to hasten the soften¬
ing of the fruit and is not in favor with some growers. A layer of fine excelsior,
known to the trade as wood wool, is placed in the bottom of the box. On this the fruits are packed as closely as possible,—the number being governed by


the size and shape of the fruit, and all *
vacant spaces filled with the packing.

When fruits from budded trees are used, the name, written on a slip of paper,
was placed inside the wrapping or pasted on the fruit. This is allowable under our postal regulations, and will help in ad¬
vertising desirable varieties. The boxes were not wrapped after being packed,
but were tied with No. 18 seine twine.
The name and address of the grower, as well as of the consignee, and the word perishable, were written on the box.
It is better to use gummed paper with the word perishable printed on it.

MAIL SCHEDULE AND PARCEL POST RATES

An effort was made to know how many hours would be required to place an order at the point of destination after being placed in the post office. This proved of much help in selecting the fruit to fill the order. The express rate on some long distances is cheaper and more convenient.
The same kind of boxes were used for express as for parcel post shipments, and both methods of marketing were equally satisfactory for long distance shipments.

A rule that will be of help in determin¬
ing the cost of transportation is, that for the first and second zones (which is up to 150 miles from any given point) the weight limit is 50 pounds, and the cost is 1 cent per pound, plus 4 cents; thus 50
pounds would cost 54 cents. To the third zone (which is between 150 and
300 miles from any given point) the weight limit is 20 pounds, and the rate
2 cents for each pound plus 4 cents; thus
20 pounds would cost 44 cents. To the



no


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


eighth zone, which is over 1,800 miles from any given point, the rate is 12 cents per pound. For the other zones, refer to the Parcel Post sheet, which may be had for the asking at any postoffice.

CONCLUSION

This paper has been prepared with my experience in mind, but from reference to various articles on parcel post marking,
I believe other growers who have been marketing fruits and vegetables, are sat¬
isfied that by this method the producer and consumer are brought more closely in


touch with each other than by any other manner of marketing, and I believe it will become more popular with the careful buyer.

Parcel Post marketing cannot fail to be of inestimable value in the better dis¬
tribution of the fruit and in developing new markets. This method will enable the housewife in many a small town where the fruit is not for sale, to place them on her menu. One trial and the successful handling of a single Parcel
Post shipment will often create a demand for larger supplies.


SELECTION OF MARKET VARIETIES


John J. Beach


In selection of varieties of avocados for commercial propagation, they will naturally be divided into two classes,
those intended for home use and local markets, and those for long distance ship¬
ment. This is because our tropical strain has the habit of producing fruit with loose seeds. The most desirable fruit in every other particular, quality, flavor, pro¬
ductiveness, etc., etc., is disqualified for long shipment by a tendency to loose seed. This was proven to me very clearly last summer. I was in Baltimore during
July, and had fruit sent me by parcel post while there, and later bought Cuban seedling fruit at fruit stores in New York.
Every one which had a loose seed had begun to decay inside by the time it was mellow, and some in which the cavity was unusually large, were actually of¬


fensive within, before the neck was soft enough to eat. As a commercial ship¬
ping proposition what we want to plant are varieties which will furnish fruit from November 1st, till July 1st, the period when the tropical seedlings in the
West Indies are in season. While the
Trapp is not by any means an ideal fruit in every particular, it is very good indeed,
has a 15-year pedigree behind it, has made its own place in the market, and is with us to stay. At the same time if we could only secure an equally good variety of Guatemalan hard-shell type, which would begin its season December 1st, we would be much better off, because we would then market our Trapps, while they were just at their prime, and save a considerable loss from dropping. But we certainly must have something to come




FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


iii


in by January ist, as holding Trapps after that is too great a loss to attempt on a commercial scale. Here the hard-
shells, with their always tight seed will come in. In selecting a market fruit,
quality and flavor, after shipping and qualities, must be considered, also appear¬
ance and size. Relative weight of seed is also a matter of moment, as well as nutritive value, and productiveness is also a most important item. Then we desire a succession from November to
June, and probably we shall find, when we get them fully standardized, that it will require half a dozen varieties to furnish shipping fruit to best advantage over this extended period. The hardshell type with its habit of winter maturity, as well as its tight seed and hard shell, will doubtless supply the majority of our standard sorts, and this type possesses a very large percentage of purple skinned sorts. Some people want to bar out every variety which has not a purely green rind, but if this is done, it is placing a serious handicap against us at the start.
Nearly 50 per cent of our Guatemalas will be eliminated at the start and it seems to me hardly justifiable. The industry is in its infancy and there seems no reason why any prejudice should be formed in the market against a purple skinned fruit, if we do not encourage it ourselves. Most pf the lovers of avocados at this time are
Those who have learned to eat them in the tropics, and these people all know that a green rind does not in any way distin¬
guish a superior fruit, nor is a purple one a sign of inferior quality within. In
California and its adjacent markets, there


is no prejudice against purple fruit, and there is no reason why anything of the sort need grow up in Florida and our markets, if we are all careful from the start not to encourage it. If we are sad¬
dled with this handicap, it will be wholly our own fault. What can be more at¬
tractive than the deep, mahogany red of some of these, or the dark glossy purple-
black, like a fine eggplant, so often seen.

A round fruit is the best shape for packing, of course, though it need not bar out ovate or even pear-shaped varie¬
ties possessing other desirable character¬
istics. Then we come to size: Our tropical strain averages over a pound in weight, and for this reason it has become customary to cut an avocado in half for serving, and in buying fruit the purchaser has an involuntary impulse to try to get the biggest one he can for his money.
Everything else being equal, however, a fruit the size of the orange and apple,
possesses many advantages over the big fruit. It may be served whole as an in¬
dividual portion, and one opens his own fruit himself, as he cracks his own egg,
and knows that no unclean hands, and no germ-bearing fly, has had a chance to contaminate it. Lightening the in¬
dividual weight tends to safety in hand¬
ling, while aggregate loss from damage or overripe individual fruit is reduced as the individual size is reduced. In decid¬
ing upon varieties we must not pass final judgment upon less than five years of fruiting experience, and eight or ten years is better. Moreover we must not judge a variety by its first crop, even though it may showobjectionable features.


112


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


It is safer to give it another chance, pro¬
vided it possesses any good qualities, as the objectionable feature noted in the initial crop may never recur.


Lloyd S. Tenny

Mr Simmonds had to leave this after¬
noon and can not take part in this discus¬
sion. He left a sample here of an avo¬
cado which has, in the last six weeks,
been given the name of Beardsley. There is some question as to whether this va¬
riety will retain this name as there is a possibility that there is a prior name.

Mr. Simmonds is an enthusiastic be¬
liever in the avocado. I wish he had been here to say something to the Society. So


long as he is not here, I feel it is an op¬
portunity for me to congratulate the growers of Florida, especially the avocado grower, that we have Mr. Simmonds in the state, and that we have a government station at Miami. They are testing out many varieties there. Mr. Simmonds is an excellent observer and the reports coming out from time to time from the
Miami station relating to the different avocado varieties, will be simply invalu¬
able to us during the coming years. I
think we should appreciate the work Mr.
Simmonds is doing and give him any sup¬
port we can.

Mr. Simmonds left this speciman with me, No. 36603; each of you can see it at the close of the session.



Vegetables


FOLLOW-UP CROPS ON VEGETABLE LANDS


H. S. McLendon


Mr, President, Ladies and Gentlemen :

In looking over the proceedings of the
State Horticultural Society for the past few years, under the head vegetables, I
find so many things that have been cov¬
ered, that there does not seem to be much more to say on these lines, until I
am in doubt as to what to try and say that will interest many. But I have decided to take what seems the most important changes we need.

SUMMER CROPS

What we mean by summer crops is some follow-up crop after vegetables.
That is, instead of letting our lands lie idle after we are through with vegetable crops until the time to start another vege¬
table crop that we grow something more than grass and weeds.

Now there are several things we wish to accomplish by this method: first, is more money during the season; second,
to increase the producing power of our lands.

During the season that we are growing vegetables on the land there is usually applied from one to six tons of fertilizers,
and where we do not have any irrigation


and happen to get a dry spring, as we do so often, a great deal of this fertilizer will be left in the soil unused.

Does it not look reasonable to think we might have a little growing power left from this amount if we were to get busy and start some crop immediately after the celery was harvested ?

MORE MONEY THAT SEASON

Now, for the first purpose of these crops—more money that season—we are going to have to grow some crop that we can turn into money. First among these will be corn, sorghum, velvet beans,
peanuts, beggarweed, etc. Space will not permit me to mention all that can be grown, with a more or less success, de¬
pending upon the local conditions, you will have to decide which are best suited to your special purpose.

It will depend upon how you harvest and sell these crops as to how much profit you get from them. Take the corn and sorghum, for instance. These should be put into a silo and fed to cattle right on the place. Sell the cattle and get your money for the corn through the profit from them.


8






FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


114

PROFITS FROM FEEDING CATTLE ENSILAGE

You can make a profit of from $50.00
to $100.00 per acre by growing corn af¬
ter other crops and feeding this to cattle in the shape of ensilage. This may seem a little large at first sight, but let us look into the matter a little. You can grow from ten to tweny tons of corn on good land; feeders have found out by experi¬
ence in feeding that this silage is worth from six to twelve dollars per ton. Well,
you can grow and put it in the silo for
$2.00 to $3.00 per ton.

Now some will say that it takes too much money to buy cattle to feed. It is not necessary that you buy these cattle.
There are plenty of men that own or will buy cattle and let you fatten them on this ensilage, you getting pay for all the gain they make. You should weigh the cattle when they are put in your feed lots and weigh them again when they come out, you being paid for the difference in weight.

Now to get the best results from this ensilage or all there is in feeding it, you want to run some hogs with the cattle.
Of course you will understand that to get the most out of the feeding business you have got to get some good cattle. Still you can make money feeding any kind that will fatten.

THE CHANGE

Instead of letting our fields after each vegetable crop grow up in weeds and grass, then cutting this crop, setting fire to it and burning all the humus and plant food up, and buying more high priced fertilizers and growing another vege¬


table crop we grow the corn, erect some silos, put the corn in and feed cattle.

To get the best results from these cattle we will need to feed something more than ensilage, and to make the most clear money we must grow these necessary feeds. So plant some velvet beans and peanuts. You can let the cattle run on the first and gather them or you can gather and feed in the hull or run through a feed mill. The peanuts can be gathered and cured and fed as a hay or run through a mill and fed. The peanuts can be grown on a separate piece of land or planted between the corn rows. But the beans must not be planted in with the corn that is to go into the silo or you will have trouble in handling the corn. But to have a legume on all your land each year you can at the last cultivation of the corn sow beggarweed. You can turn this back in your land or make hay out of it.
I consider this the best crop for hay that we can grow on the truck lands.

GROWING MORE VEGETABLES AT LESS COST

How we are going to accomplish this under our change of methods will be by saving all the manure we can make while feeding our livestock, growing a legume crop on the lands each year, thus getting nitrogen from the air and storing in the soil at no cost, also adding more humus to our soils, making them stand more rain and more drought. That may sound like the Irishman that blew hot and cold from the same place, still it is true.

Yes, gentlemen, if we grow these le¬
gume crops each year, feed livestock,
save all the manure and apply it to our


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


soils, we are going to make some of the fertilizer men find more customers if they handle the same amount of business. And we will make more and better crops than have ever been produced in Florida.

Our state is now a large producer of truck, and I expect it will continue to grow along this line. That is we will produce more truck each year. We pro¬
duce some livestock, still we are not counted as a livestock state at present,
but we are going to soon be one of the most foremost in this line, and the truck¬
ers of the state are going to fatten a large part of this livestock. When they do this they will not belong to the bankers and fertilizer men of Florida.

A great many are already starting in this business. The Sanford section will have erected before this year is out ten to thirteen silos, the Hastings section several, and a few others all over the state. When they get these up and feed cattle and hogs, even though their vege¬
table crops do not bring in any clear money they will have some clear money at the end of every year, and it is the follow-up crop that is going to turn the trick, too.

There are a great many growing truck and vegetables on a small acreage, and they may think that they will not be able to carry out any of these plans that I
have mentioned. It may be impossible to erect a silo, but they can put some le¬
gume on their land after vegetables, turn this crop in the soil, and have their land producing more and be reducing their fertilizer bill too, thus getting more clear money on their acreage no matter what the size of their patches.


1*5

If you are doubtful about this way of handling your land paying, just take part of it and try handling the new way while you handle the balance as you have always done. You may not see any big difference the first year, but just try it three years and you will be satisfied.
You would never let any more weeds grow up in your fields to be burned.

THE KITCHEN GARDEN

There is just one other thing along this vegetable question that I would like to mention, while I am on the subject,
and it is the most important, but still the most neglected in the state, especially since everything has got so high, and that is the kitchen garden.

In this beautiful sunshine land of ours where we can have vegetables of some kind growing during the 365 days in the year there is not any excuse for not hav¬
ing fresh vegetables on our table right from our own gardens every one of these
365 days.

Still you may go on one hundred truck farms and take dinner with the owner and at least ninety out of that one hundred will serve you canned vegetables shipped in from some other state, or if they have fresh vegetables they will be some that they have bought, and very often which were shipped in from some other state,
too.

LOCATION OF THE KITCHEN GARDEN

One of the most important things to be considered about our kitchen garden is its location. Two things need to be taken into consideration when we are




ii6


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


looking for the location. First, suitable soil, and second, nearness to the kitchen.
That is, we want it convenient for the good wife to gather the vegetables with the least trouble.

Of course the soil is the most important thing, for if we do not have the soil that is adapted to growing vegetables the garden is going to be a failure. Still,
here in Florida we can usually get any of our soils to grow vegetables with more or less success, especially if we will manage properly. But we want a spot that is naturally well drained, not too high and sandy, and if possible so situated that we can use some form of irrigation. Even if the land is naturally rather dry and thirsty, by getting plenty of humus in it and breaking deep this trouble can gradu¬
ally be overcome.

Now since we have selected the land let us give a few minutes to the way to prepare and plant. The land should be broken deep and quite a while before you are going to plant, for you may either turn under some legume crop or a heavy application of stable manure or compost,
and for any of these it will take some time for them to decompose. Then, too, you want to break early so the rains that fall may be saved in the soil for the time that moisture is scarce and the crops are need¬
ing it. This soil moisture will have to be conserved, though, by giving the land frequent and shallow cultivations, thus breaking the capillary action in the soil and keeping the soil moisture from evap¬
orating.

There are very few farmers but who have vegetables from their own gardens


for at least a short time each year. Still,
we do not want to stop at a short time,
when we have the climate that we have in this state. What we want is some¬
thing to come direct from our garden to our table every day in the year. When we do this the high cost of living that we hear so much talk of will not worry us nearly so much. To accomplish this we must plant a succession of crops, also make a number of plantings of the same crops. That is to keep putting seed in the ground every week or ten days. By this method we have good young healthy plants coming on all the time and if con¬
ditions are not suitable for a good crop as they might be these plants will be much better able to stand these unfavor¬
able conditions and still produce a crop than old plants that have used up most of their vitality by production.

Another thing, if we want to make a success of this kitchen garden we have got to give it careful and constant atten¬
tion in the way of cultivating, etc. If we want nice juicy, well-flavored vege¬
tables we have got to keep the plants healthy and growing all the time. This can only be accomplished by frequent cul¬
tivations and attention. Give the plants plenty of moisture and necessary plant food.

This is another place where the garden being close to the kitchen will sometimes come in nice, for the lady of the house may be able to get a hand and look after having the vegetables worked when the man is too busy at some other work.

What I want to see is a small piece of land set aside on every farm and as many


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


n 7


town lots as possible for a kitchen garden.
This piece of land properly handled and as many different kinds of vegetables grown as the family may like, and in such quantities as to more than supply their need. You can always exchange nice fresh vegetables for groceries that you need and cannot produce.

Who in this audience would not feel better by getting up some bright clear morning just as the sunbeams were mak¬
ing the dewdrops sparkle as diamonds, go out in their own kitchen garden and gather a basket of luscious strawberries that had ripened on the vine? Just think of plucking the blushing beauties from under the shadows of their dark green leaves! And all the pleasures do not stop here. For when these have been capped and sugar has been sprinkled over them and allowed to stand for awhile, then they are served with pure golden cream poured over them, who would not say that a kitchen garden is worth having;
even if this were the only thing we could get from it?

But it affects one other thing that is very dear to everyone here—that is our pocketbook. Yes, we can reduce the cost of living by having this garden if we manage it right.

Would I be asking too much if I should insist that everyone that has not already a kitchen garden start one, and those that now have a garden grow more and better vegetables in it.


Discussion

Mr. Mead: I want to say a few words


in corroboration of the paper we heard on vegetables. In Sanford, the feeding of stock has been tried very successfully.
If anyone has a silo, the local banks will lend him enough money to buy cattle to be repaid when the cattle are fattened and sold. Not only is there a profit in fattening the cattle and selling them, but there is also the value of the manure to be counted in. A ten acre lot may be ex¬
pected to return a profit of $800.00 dur¬
ing the summer in the cattle, and the manure obtained is of almost equal value with the cattle profit.

Mr. Tenny: I just want to make an announcement that I think will be of in¬
terest to the people here who are inter¬
ested in truck. I am not directly, of course, interested in truck growing, but it is rather difficult for me to keep out of any farmers’ organization.

We scarcely appreciate the extent of the trucking on the East Coast and also in other parts of Florida. Approximately
6,000 cars of tomatoes moved from the
East Coast last year. There are heavy losses due to diseases and poor methods of handling, and a movement has been started during the past year that is going to be very far reaching. We have gotten two organizations on the lower East Coast to co-operate with the Department of
Agriculture at Washington and with the
State Experiment Staion at Gainesville,
to undertake another series of experi¬
ments to investigate all sorts of truck diseases and truck growers' difficulties.
We are about ready to sign up a memo¬
randum agreement which will probably be signed in the next month or six weeks,





FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


118

providing for a five-year series of experi¬
ments, which will center upon the tomato industry, but which will probably include other vegetables before it is concluded.
The Plant Pathologist will reside at
Miami, and additional pathological work has been promised, so far as they are able to give it, from the Experiment Sta¬
tion, and we are hoping in the course of the next two or three years we can get at the fundamental causes of some of our troubles, and help out materially the


problems that are troubling the truck growers.

This is not to be confined to the East
Coast, although the growers on the lower
East Coast are being asked to put up a reasonable sum of money to carry the work on.

I hope it will be possible for the path¬
ologist to be present at the Florida State
Horticultural Society next year and make a preliminary report


Sugar Cane


R. L. Goodwin


The Fort Pierce Chamber of Com¬
merce is backing me up in a product that
I have not heard mentioned on the plat¬
form, and I would like to talk about that a little. It is not a tropical fruit, but it is a tropical product; I refer to sugar cane. Prof. Rolfs and Capt. Rose have been trying to get people to grow sugar cane for a long time. They say every man to whom they have talked about it,
says there is more profit in sugar cane with less labor and less expense, than any other single product grown in the
State of Florida. Now, if this is the case,
then 75 per cent of the lands in our state are adapted to the production of sugar cane. It seems we have overlooked our very best bet.

Someone says, “the reason why we have no large sugar cane plantations, is because we have no sugar mills, and the reason we have no mills is because we have no large fields of cane.”

The question has been how to dispose of the cane at a profit after it is grown.

In my campaign, I am planning this;
the planting of all the cane seed available at the present time. All the sugar cane grown now, instead of being ground for syrup, shall be saved and planted for seed.
The next year, we will grind half of it into syrup and plant the other half. There


is a great demand for this syrup, as you well know. There is the Alaga syrup,
which is half cane and half corn syrup,
and the other syrups have a greater or smaller percentage of the cane syrup.
We import thousands of gallons into the state because we are unable to obtain here the syrup we should produce.

In various parts of the county, Vero,
Felsmere, Okeechobee, Fort Pierce, etc. r we will plant this sugar cane and then form co-operative organizations to build a small syrup plant that will cost about
$1,200.00. We will grind our cane into syrup and make a standard product,
which we have not done in the state up to the present time. There will be central organizations to market the product.

If we have a successful start in St.
Lucie County, the planting of sugar cane might extend all over the state, and it will give us a crop that will put money into' our pockets every year. We are aiming to have a sugar mill as soon as we have acreage enough to warrant it.

I would like to hear a discussion about sugar cane this morning. There are many things I do not know about sugar cane, and I am anxious to get all the in¬
formation I can.

I have been told the greatest problem we will have to contend with, is an insect,
the borer. Some people say it never





120


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


becomes bad enough to destroy a crop or keep one from making money. Some say we can be free from it if we plant seed free from that worm. Some say we can get rid of it; same say we cannot get rid of it; even though we do not plant infected seed cane the worm will come and infest the corn, from Maiden cane that is infested with it.

I would like to have those of you who have tried it, say if you have made a failure, and if you think sugar cane grow¬
ing cannot be made a success in the State of Florida, and why. I do not want to work myself to “a rag and a bone and a hank of hair” and have the growers make a failure after being urged to plant the seed cane.

Mr. Sheppard: I raised some sugar cane once, and if you think it does not require any work, you won’t think that after you have raised a crop of it. I
do not think it will grow on the pineapple ridge.

In regard to the Cuban worm, it was introduced some years ago when Mr.
Disston had his farm. That worm put the sugar cane business almost out. The farmers had to stop growing cane on account of that worm. The boys and the negroes chewed it, and the worm was objectionable. (Laughter.) When it was made into syrup, the worm and the juice all went in together.

I do not think the worm lives in the
Maiden cane; it entirely belongs in the sugar cane, and if you get cane free from


the worm, I do not think you will be troubled with it at all.

Mr. McQuarrie: I have grown cane about twenty years, and I have always found where the land is prepared prop-
erly, you need not work much.

I think it is one of the most remarkable crops we have, and I have often won¬
dered why the people of Florida did not grow more of it and make syrup. I
believe eventually we are going to have some sugar factories in the state.

The general rotation of farm crops is a great field. Where you make a num¬
ber of crop rotations and bear in mind the idea of building up the land, I think sugar cane is one of the most desirable crops in the State of Florida.

Mr. -: I have seen thousands of

acres of sugar cane, and I would like to know if anyone here has ever seen a successful crop of sugar cane grown on poor land, loose, pine land, without its being heavily cow-penned or fertilized.

Mr. Goodwin: It is far from my in¬
tention to try to grow sugar cane upon our high dry, spruce pine land. Our high, sandy ridges are too dry, but we expect to extend our operations to the flat woods and where the soil is heavier,
and make sugar cane a staple crop to replace the pineapple industry as a money maker for St. Lucie County.

Mr. Wilson: At one time I made a considerable study of the sugar cane borer. We found in a number of cases the sugar cane borer has practically run the sugar cane out. Now, whether that



FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


121


was necessary or not, I cannot say, but it is a fact, just the same. In some parts of the state the sugar cane had existed for many years and it is still grown.
Whether or not in those particular locali¬
ties there are enough parasites to keep the borer in check, I cannot say. The sugar cane worm is infected with para¬
sites that keep him in subjection in some parts of the world.

Mr. Goodwin: In many parts of the state there are no sugar cane borers at all. In most parts of the state, if clean seed is used, there is no reason that I can see why the borer should not be control¬
led.

So far as Maiden cane is concerned,
there are many people who say it is found in Maiden cane. I have never found any in it. There have been made in this county during the past year, some very careful tests as to the glucose content of sugar cane. A large sugar cane grow¬
er in Louisiana who had charge of sev¬
eral large factories in Cuba, has made these tests very carefully. Contrary to general expectations, the glucose content on the muck runs as high, practically as that raised on the sand.

A good deal of the cane is being plant¬
ed this year in Palm Beach County, and next year a thousand acres will be put in.
If the results this year are promising and encouraging, a sugar factory will be put in this county next year.

Mr. Taylor: I am glad this sugar cane question has been brought up in regard to the borer.

We started at Moore Haven some fourteen months ago, the planting of


sugar cane. We had some cane sent to
Moore Haven and we planted it. During the time we planted it, I discovered what was known as the borer. I afterwards sent word to the president of our company that I had found this cane was infected with what we called the borer and wanted him to have the cane pulled up and burn¬
ed, to which he objected because the cane was valuable. Nevertheless, I dug it up and burned it, as I think it is a serious matter.

After being in the citrus canker work for about a year and a half, I realized what it meant to the state if it was not stopped, and after hearing Mr. Gillett talk about the citrus canker last night, I
thought what if it were to start now and ruin the groves and citrus industry of
Florida.

I am also a firm believer that a few years hence the sugar cane industry will mean as much to the State of Florida as the citrus industry does now. There¬
fore, I think we should take steps to trace this sugar cane borer up so that it may be eradicated as the citrus canker is be¬
ing eradicated.

We have started an industry at Moore
Haven in which there will be hundreds of acres planted the next few years, and if we can grow cane enough, we will have a sugar refinery.

We have had fine success with the seed cane we found on Lake Okeechobee; I
have found no trace of it; that is, I have found no trace of the borer in the cane which I planted nor in the cane which we grew from that seed.

The cane grown upon the muck lands



122


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


of Okeechobee produces good syrup. We planted cane last May and June, and we have now syrup ground from that cane pressed out in January. It was a great success with us. In this state there are thousands of acres which will grow fine cane, without fertilizer.

Mr. Dade: How much syrup; I mean,
how many gallons of syrup are produced per acre?

Mr. McQuarrie: About 500 gallons to to the acre.

Mr.-: I came to Florida about six

years ago. I put in about two acres of seed cane; fine cane. I planted it so that it was on new land, took extra good care of it and gave it an extra amount of fertilizer, and it did splendidly. I ex¬
pected to use that first crop for seed but some way or other we did not quite have the land ready for that seed when the seed was ready. We inspected every bit of cane that went into the ground, but the borer came in somehow, and it turned yellow.

It was on new ground and we gave it extra good care. It did not have any stable manure; nothing but commercial fertilizer, and it has always been a great question to me where that borer worm was introduced. There was no other cane within four miles.

I think the proper way to go about having a mill to- take our cane, is to have someone go around to the different cane growers and ask each one, “How much will you supply for the mill ?” Then later he can go around with a contract to be signed by each farmer as to how much cane he will grow. You get such


a thing as this established on this basis,
and suppose the grower has a bad season;
the people at the head of the business will go with that man to the bank and help him out to get the money he needs to buy fertilizer, or whatever he needs. I
would like to- see the matter taken up and something done with it. On almost any land you can make a crop of sugar cane and make it quick.

Mr. Taylor: I would like to know if anybody knows anything about the ori¬
gin of this worm, and how it started and all about it. Does any one know?

Mr. Wilson: The borer worm has been in the state a long time. It is practically all over the southern states; it may have come from Cuba. I believe it was ori¬
ginally introduced into Louisiana from
Cuba back in the ’yo’s. In Louisiana they raise sugar cane and make syrup in spite of the borer worm. The govern¬
ment has been studying this proposition for many years; sometimes they have had as many as three men at work upon it.
Last year they had a man in Cuba, but it is impossible at this time to state posi¬
tively the best methods of control.

They used to recommend in Louisiana that the tops be burned, the idea being that the eggs were laid in the tops, which is true. However, they found that by burning the tops off they were doing more harm than good, as burning killed the parasites as well as the borer. The last
I heard, the control measures were pretty well up in the air, because they had to abandon the only control measures they knew anything about, that of burning.

There are several government bulletins



FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


123


issued in regard to the sugar cane borer,
and also bulletins of the several states.
The insect is a moth, you know.

Mr. Goodwin: About four years, I saw an article in the “Rural New Yorker”
describing a White Sapota (The Casirni-
roa edulis), as a most delicious tropical fruit that was similar to a peach in flavor.
I sent to Reasoner Brothers and got one of the plants and planted it four years ago, and now it is about fifteen feet high and ready to bear.

While I was at the Fair in Tampa, the freeze came and I worried more over that one plant than all the other put together.

When I came home, I went out expect¬
ing to find it killed. Much to my sur¬
prise, it was entirely uninjured.

Now, a friend of mine from Mexico


tells me the fruit is one of the best fruits of Mexico. Day before yesterday I
looked it up in Funk and Wagnalls dic¬
tionary, and found they say it is a fruit something like an apple; that it is un¬
wholesome and the seeds are poisonous.
Mr. Reasoner says it is a fine fruit for
South Florida, with pleasing taste. I
would like to know something about it.

Mr. Krome: I have grown the White
Sapota, and my own personal opinion of it is that I am in favor of it if any one wants it. For myself, I would take something else.

Mr. Goodwin: I have found out since,
that seeds do not come true and inferior,
unpalatable varieties may come from seed, as is true of other fruits.






Ornamentals


H. S. Pennock


About a week ago our President wrote to me and said, “Last fall you were ap¬
pointed on the Ornamental Committee with Miss Elizabeth Skinner as chair¬
man. Please get in touch with her.”

I have been trying to make out why he withheld the good news so long; whether he thought by springing it on me at the last moment I would not have time to back out or whether he kept waiting to see if he could not do better. I am rather inclined to think it was the latter as he has already tried me twice previously,
but perhaps he thought somewhat this way; “I have tried that fellow a couple of times and now I am going to do it just once more to see if he can’t do something.” I think he is going to be disappointed, though, as I hardly know the first thing about ornamentals. Now,
if he had asked me to tell you something about a good looking cow I could have told you something—I could have told you she ought to have a nicely dished face with large placid eyes and a nice little pair of crooked horns and a good level back and so forth; or if he had asked me to say something about good looking roads I think I could have told how to make a good looking road and a lasting one too, but ornamentals, as I said before,
I hardly know the first thing about.

Take for instance the cabbage palmet¬


to, they are used a good deal for avenue planting, but I do not see anything very ornamental in them with their dead leaves hanging down below and dead ber¬
ry branches sticking out above. They can’t compare with the cocoanut or the phoenix canariensis. The cocoanuts are grand with their long swinging leaves,
but of course they won’t grow much fur¬
ther north of here without being cut back with the cold pretty often. The canari¬
ensis is different in that respect as it will stand lots of cold. Lots of them are used about New Orleans and there are some fine ones there, too. It certainly doesn’t get any colder in Florida than it does in Louisiana and yet you see very few of them in Florida. One big advan¬
tage the cabbage palmetto has, it is cheap;
the sprouted cocoanuts, though, for the southern part of Florida, are on a par with them as they can be bought for twelve dollars and a half a hundred.

Then again, to show how little I know about ornamentals, is this, I think the yellow pine would make a fine avenue tree. I suppose they are too common to think about, but will they be common seventy-five or a hundred years hence?
Can’t you imagine what a grand view an avenue of these fine big trees would make and have you ever noticed how interest¬
ing and handsome the trunks of the older


124



FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


125


trees are. There is such a variety of col¬
or in the bark and in the late afternoons with the sun at your back they are almost a bright pink and the tops seem to be so many green puffs. They have quite a number of good points, too. They do not grow as fast as the Australian pine which is being used a great deal in Dade
County, but they grow quite rapidly,
growing more than a foot in a year and the young trees are such good looking little fellows with their nice bushy heads.
They make much better looking young trees than the Australian pines and then,
too, they are not subject to disease like the Australian pines. In some places they have to be sprayed once a year to keep one from dying out here and there.

The mango is being used for an avenue tree also. Some let them grow up in their natural bush shape, others trim


them up so they have a trunk six or eight feet high. I think the latter way is the nicer. They take on a nice round top when treated this way. The mango,
though, is only for the southern part of
Florida. A tree that could be treated the same way and give the same effect for the northern part of Florida would be the camphor. It is naturally of a bushy growth, but if trimmed up so as to have a single trunk at the bottom it makes a very nice head quite similar to the water oak.

The great thing to my mind in orna¬
menting is simplicity. Don’t try too much, but get started; it takes years for trees to grow and we are soon dead and gone.

I thank you very much for your atten¬
tion.


WHAT THE WOMEN OF THE FEDERATION ARE DOING: ORNA¬
MENTAL PLANTING AND ROYAL PALM STATE PARK


Mrs. Edgar Lewis, Vice-President of Section Five, Florida Federation

Women’s Clubs


The Florida Federation of Woman’s
Clubs grows so rapidly that it is danger¬
ous to quote membership statistics; state¬
ments which are perfectly good and reli¬
able, one month, will not pass muster in thirty days; glittering generalities leave one’s reputation for accuracy in better standing.

However, until the next meeting of the
Board of Directors, it is reasonably safe to say that there are in the Florida Fed¬


eration, 145 clubs, with a total member¬
ship of more than 8,000 women. These clubs are doing all kinds of work, since the latitude for Federation eligibility is very broad indeed; when applying for membership, a club must only show that it is working for individual or community betterment, is non-sectarian and is or¬
ganized to operate within the state. It is, therefore, not hard to believe that these 145 clubs show 145 varying possi-








126


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


bilities for activity, representing as they do, the needs of almost 145 separate and differing communities.

The state organization has a State
Chairman for each and every department of work possible to any club, and there are nineteen of these chairmen, with still others at the head of special committees,
such as the Committee on Moving Pic¬
tures, etc. Of course, no one club tries to do nineteen kinds of work. Some are strictly literary clubs, some are musical only; others are civic clubs, still others are mothers' clubs; some emphasize home economics, others, educational work,
equal suffrage, philanthropy, social ser¬
vice, public health, library work, rug and general art weaving, needlecraft, bas¬
ketry, and so on through an infinite va¬
riety. Some clubs follow a single line of work; many follow several, and are divided into departments ranging from two to thirteen in number.

Out of the entire 145 clubs, 85, with possibly 4 or 5 more of the new clubs whose scope is not fully known, are doing civic work; and while the first civic im¬
pulse is, undoubtedly, to “clean up,” the second is, just as surely, “to plant and beautify.”

In the Federation edition of The Tam¬
pa Times, published a few weeks ago,
considerable space was devoted to a col¬
lection of opinions, under the heading:
“The Most Valuable Work Our Club
Has Done,” “by The Club Presidents.”
It is interesting to note the frequency with which statements like this appear:
“The most valuable work our club has


done, has been working for a city park.”
“Planting shade trees,” “Improving rail¬
road station grounds,” “Planting trees and shrubs around a city monument,”
“Holding our annual fruit and flower show,” “Planting ornamentals along the
Dixie Highway,” etc., etc.

Several clubs report commendable im¬
provement work in the local cemeteries,
the Cycadia Cemetery Association of
Tarpon Springs, which owes much to the capable management of Mrs. J. C. Beek-
man, a past president of the Federation,
perhaps leading along this particular line.
School yards come in for attention; also church properties, and the grounds around all sorts of public buildings.
Club women are not exclusive in their labor, but give gladly of their strength wherever a need is manifest; if the town council or the county commission¬
ers, or the chamber of commerce graci¬
ously co-operate, as, fortunately, they generally do, so much the better, but the women have been known to produce gratifying results in the face of seem¬
ingly overwhelming odds.

The materials used in this state-wide planting show a correspondingly wide range, since this beautiful Florida of ours offers a diversification of soil and climate that not only admit of, but demands a marvelous variety. And clubs are show¬
ing their wisdom, by making use of that growth which thrives best in each partic¬
ular locality. Some are using the na¬
tive oak, others, the camphor tree; yet others, the sour orange, the Australian or silk oak, the Australian pine, the


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


1-7


eucalyptus robusta, the palms, cocoanut,
date or sago, the hibiscus, crotons, and oleanders.

The Dade County Federation of Wo¬
men’s Organizations, with over 700
members, will plant a tree for every club baby; in Palm Beach County, several miles of the Dixie Highway have been planted with ornamentals, by the club women. The Saint Lucie County Fed¬
eration of Women’s Clubs, has promised the commissioners to plant the entire 52
miles of the Highway through that county, furnishing all ornamentals them¬
selves, and only asking the assistance of the county convicts, in the actual planting,
and the use of the county water wagon to facilitate the watering. Ten miles are already planted, with material for sev¬
eral more ready, and awaiting the com¬
pletion of the roads. The Saint Lucie plan includes the planting of eucalyptus robusta, every fifty feet, with red hibiscus between; occasional clumps of white oleander, red hibiscus and jacaranda to furnish the red, white and blue, of the
Dixie Highway color scheme; giant bam¬
boo at the waterways; and cabbage palmetto seeds planted throughout the course, so that, in time to come, if so desired, the eucalyptus may be cut down,
leaving a driveway bordered by red hi¬
biscus and cabbage palmetto, two charac¬
teristic growths of St. Lucie County.
A member of the Woman’s Club of Fort
Pierce raises the eucalyptus robusta, as well as the jacaranda, from seed, while many women throughout the county, have large beds of hibiscus cuttings and quan¬
tities of palmetto seed, in the saving of


which, by far the most difficult part was to harden one’s heart against the hordes of hungry robins who evidently consid¬
ered palmetto seeds their own particular dainty.

While the women of the federated clubs have, through their civic planting,
dotted the state with beautiful and lasting monuments to their taste, their public spirit and their industry, they have ac¬
complished quite as much of value through the conservation of natural beau¬
ties that must otherwise have fallen be¬
fore that so-called progress, in which the ruling idea of advancement seems to be,
“to cut down.” Many towns of the state have to thank the clubs for the present possession of the noble trees on which they base their sole claim to character and beauty, and no one can quite forget the valiant woman who stood for hours,
with their arms around some beloved trees, in order to save them from the axes of the destroyers.

But the crowning conservation glory of
Federation, destined, through the strug¬
gles of the Federation, to stand for the glory of Florida, and the benefit of future generations, is Royal Palm State Park,
the only property of its kind in the United
States, and probably in the world, owned by a woman’s organization.

Lying 48 miles south of Miami, a rare tropical jungle called Paradise Key was for years a wonderland of romance and beauty, known only through the tales of the Seminoles and of the fortunate few white men who had the hardihood and good fortune to reach it.

Many years passed, many things hap¬
pened that might easily be woven into an






128


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


interesting story, but, to be brief, in 1915,
soon after Mrs. W. S. Jennings became president, the Legislature ceded to the
Florida Federation of Women’s Clubs, a tract of 960 acres, in its midst, the fairy¬
land of Paradise Key, to be maintained as
Royal Palm State Park. At the same time, conditioned upon the grant, Mrs.
Mary Lily Flagler-Bingham gave the
Federation another 960 acres as endow¬
ment. This endowment land did not im¬
mediately adjoin the Park, so was, sub¬
sequently, exchanged for other tracts which do, and the entire 1920 acres lie together and on the Ingraham Highway,
the last 78-raile lap of the Dixie Highway,
which runs from Miami to Cape Sable and is hard surfaced, not only from
Miami to the Park, but through it and for some distance beyond it, making the entire tract easy of access.

The jungle part of Royal Palm Park comprises 350 acres; contains hundreds of royal palms, large and small; a tropical growth which, botanically, belongs to the
West Indies, is peculiar unto itself, and not duplicated anywhere in the United
States; 241 forms of plant life, from mushrooms up; over 60 varieties of trees; and between 50 and 100 kinds of birds. There are gigantic live oaks whose spreading branches form the leafy roofs of what might be called “out-door audi¬
toriums ;” there is grey-green moss in graceful festoons, and every exquisite variation of color on the tree-trunks;
there are head-high ferns, and tiny,
dainty growths that only close scrutiny can disclose; there are wonderful vines,
and orchids, and tree snails; beauty over¬
head, beauty underfoot, such a riot of


loveliness as to overwhelm one anew with the mystery and power of nature, and make the mere beholding almost a sacri¬
lege, and an intrusion.

Planning to destroy as little as possible of the natural beauty of the hammock,
narrow paths lead from the one broad road which is allowed and which passes through the park. There are at present about six miles of these paths, named
‘‘The Mrs. W. S. Jennings Paths” by the appreciative women of the Federation, in recognition of the wonderful president to whom they are indebted for the posses¬
sion of Royal Palm State Park.

Scientists in all parts of the country are manifesting interest in the park and asking the privilege of studying its pe¬
culiar and unusual flora.

Dr. Chas. Simpson, of national fame and world wide experience, and Dr. J. K.
Small, Curator of the Bronx Botanical
Gardens, N. Y., have been of untold as¬
sistance already, in the work of prelimi¬
nary classification, and promise yet fur¬
ther help. Both are enthusiastic regard¬
ing the Park, and deeply thankful for its preservation.

It is planned to make the Park a bird reserve and sanctuary, and the valuable co-operation of Mr. Edward Mcllhenny of Louisiana, the greatest living bird con¬
servationist, is promised in the work of restoring many lovely forms of bird life,
formerly abounding in Florida but now well-nigh extinct. A deer park is one of the visions of the future, and a scenic driveway, bordered by a canal, to extend entirely around the Park, has already been outlined by skilled engineers, but is too expensive to be more than dreamed of.


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


129


A most competent warden and at the same time a naturalist of no mean ability has been employed by the Federation for more than a year, not only to guard the
Park from depredation and fire, but to perform the difficult and delicate task of opening up paths with the least possible loss of plant life.

A comfortable lodge has been built for his use, with water and light plants and a garage. There are to be rooms set aside for scientists wishing to remain in the
Park for study, and it will be possible for visitors to obtain a light luncheon from the warden’s wife. Though the
Park is 13 miles from Homestead, there are sometimes as many as 50 visitors in a day, with the number constantly in¬
creasing. The furnishing of the lodge promises to be a labor of love with the clubs, and various plans are on foot to carry out unique designs.

The grant by the Legislature carried an exemption from all taxation, but no ap¬
propriation, so that the financing of the
Park has been a problem which has taxed the ingenuity of the club women, though it has never sapped their courage nor weakened their faith.

The Dade County Commissioners ap¬
propriated $1,000.00; another $1,000.00
was raised by a mile of dimes and a chain letter scheme; friends have been appre¬
ciative and generous; some money has been borrowed; but while the burden has been heavy, the reward has justified every effort, and the committee in charge has handled the Park business in so able a manner that no one despairs of the out¬
come. It is confidently expected that the present Legislature, realizing that the


great trust of Royal Palm State Park has fallen into worthy hands, will make a suf¬
ficient appropriation to insure its main¬
tenance and steady development.

The Federation is almost as enthusi¬
astic over Ingraham Highway as over the
Park, since it was largely through the efforts of Mr. J. E. Ingraham that the wonderland came into their possession,
and there is accordingly, a marvellous plan for making the highway which bears his name a wonder road bordered by royal palms and yellow flowering shrubs,
the green and yellow of the Federation colors.

On November 23, 1916, during the week of the Federation Convention in
Miami, the Park was formally dedicated by the president, Mrs. W. S. Jennings,
and the Ingraham Highway, by the Hon¬
orable S. A. Belcher, Chairman of the
Dade County Board of Commissioners.
The day was a remarkable one in the his¬
tory of the Federation. An interesting program was carried out, Mrs. John Dick¬
inson Sherman, Conservation Chairman of the General Federation making the principal address; Mr. Ingraham and Dr.
Chas. Simpson also spoke. 136 automo¬
biles carried over 1,100 people to the Park for the day, and the Woman’s Club of
Homestead served an elaborate luncheon to more than 600 of the visitors.

Now while the women of the clubs have advanced rapidly and with enthusiasm along the trail blazed by the pioneer Hor¬
ticultural Society; while they have worked with almost fevered intensity for beauti¬
fication and conservation, their minds,
just now, are turning to other and more serious needs, and the 8,000 trained work-



130


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


ers of the Florida Federation will be a power upon which to depend when they turn their skill and energy to the raising of food supplies, or to any other labor


that shall help in the struggle looming ahead of us, that struggle in which our men must risk their lives and our country be in danger.


The Federal Land Bank and the Florida

Citrus Grower


Mr. Hume: We had expected to take up topic No. 19 this evening instead of this morning, but it has been deemed best that the discussion of the Federal
Land Bank work in relation to Florida,
should come up this morning. It was postponed until this evening because for several days past the Florida East Coast trains have had a habit of running late and we did not believe the gentlemen who are to address us on this occasion would be able to get in in time for the morning session.

However, contrary to our expectations,
they are here, so that we will now take up this part of our program.

I am going to ask Mr. D. C. Gillett to open this discussion.

Mr. Gillett: Mr. Chairman, Ladies and Gentlemen:

In discussing this matter, I shall take into consideration the fact that I am a grower interested in nurseries, the hold¬
ers of some grove mortgages, and a di¬
rector in two banks in Tampa, which might be rightfully considered the center of the industry, at least on the West
Coast. Therefore, in what I am going to say, I shall endeavor in a small way to reflect the attitude or sentiment of two banks in this state.

As I understand it, the basic principle underlying the Farm Loan Act, the meas¬


ure of the loan primarily is the produc¬
tivity of the soil upon which the mortgage will be based. Of course, the moral risk and any other risk which would come into a loan of either commercial or industrial matters would also apply to this.

As I understand it, what you want to know is this: assuming that the improve¬
ments on a Florida mortgaged grove were removed in a single night by a freeze,
over which, of course, we had no control,
what productive value would that land have with those improvements removed ?

Now, if it is to be considered that the freezing of an orange grove to the ground means total depreciation of that land from a citrus-producing standpoint, then it might be a subject of discussion.

But a frozen orange grove, with the vitality of the root system in the ground,
certainly has a value as an orange grove far in excess of the raw value of the land,
plus the improvements to rebuild one.

The age which an orange tree may at¬
tain and still bear fruit, has never yet been determined. In Sicily there are groves four hundred years old, and apparently just in their prime. In Florida we have them seventy-five years old and bearing more fruit each year. Unlike deciduous fruits which at a certain age begin to depreciate, a citrus grove con¬
tinues to appreciate as years go on. There








132


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


are groves in this state that I would not hesitate for loan purposes to value at
$1,000 per acre, and loan $500 per acre thereon. There are other groves in this state for which I would not read the loan application, and those two properties may be identically the same in soil, in char¬
acter and only divided by a fence.

Florida has every kind and description of soil, from the sands of the sea to the richest muck in the world. Our soil is not uniform; there is no graduation. A
fence will often divide good from worth¬
less land.

Therefore, it seems to me no set rule can be established for the intelligent val¬
uation of any citrus property, and that there must be an individual inspection,
taking into consideration the physical con¬
dition of the property and other con¬
ditions surrounding it.

If I were asked to value a citrus prop¬
erty, there are three things I would con¬
sider :

First, the location of the property with respect to elevation and immunity from cold.

Second, the adaptivity of the soil to profitably produce citrus fruits.

Third, the varieties planted in that grove, and whether profitable or not.

Any banking loan on farming property,
whether it be corn or wheat or cotton or citrus, has an element of risk which must be considered, just as the risk is carried in any other loan. If you loan on a cotton field for thirty-six years, the local board approving or recommending that loan must have confidence in the borrower to the extent that he will not lose heart; that he will keep on planting crops continu¬


ously for thirty-six operations in order that the security of what you loan may be conserved.

In a citrus grove in a high state of pro¬
duction, that risk is to a certain extent eliminated, for our trees will stand much abuse, and if it were seen that the owner of that grove was not keeping it up in the very best manner, the local board could go in and rehabiliate that property and keep in up to a high state of production without any impairment of the security of the loan.

In a cotton or a corn field, it is true, if you have a crop failure or invasion of boll weevil, you can recover in one year.
Now, granted that the worst should come to a citrus investment and it should be frozen to the ground. The owner of that grove, under favorable or even normal circumstances, would be back in profitable operation of his grove in from three to five years and, therefore, I say that the length of time the loan can run, thirty-six years, is a very strong point in favor of the citrus grower.

Take a given acreage of cotton, or corn, or wheat, with the normal draw¬
backs that come to them, and carry them along for a period of thirty-six years, and then consider a similar acreage of citrus,
which may be frozen twice in thirty-six years (which is above the average); the citrus grove at the end of that time will be worth ten times the value from a pro¬
ductive standpoint as all of the other lands combined, because, as years go on, our values are increasing. From the stand¬
point of profit, if we did not have this one great drawback to the industry, the pos¬
sibility of a freeze, I am firm in my be-


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


*33


lief that every man in America would be down here growing citrus fruits, the in¬
dustry is so profitable, the business is so easy, our people are so happy and con¬
tented. It is just these freezes that keep down the value of our lands.

But for these freezes there would be citrus in Georgia, possibly farther north,
but when these freezes come they push back the line where citrus fruits can be profitably grown and establish and in¬
crease the valuation of those lands where they should be grown.

I can show you statements of profits of groves in this state, undamaged in any way from the freeze of February 2nd,
that will run from $300 to $500 per acre per annum over a period of the last five or seven or eight years.

In any industry, or commercial invest¬
ment any stock that will pay 6 per cent is considered worth par, usually, and 10 per cent stock is worth considerably above par.
On that basis these properties are worth
$2,000 and $3,000 and $4,000 per acre.
I do not say that is a proper basis for general loans, because those are selected properties here and there, and cannot be considered in any way as an average.

Let us assume for a moment that here is a grove, a ten-acre grove, in a high state of production, ten or twelve years old. It has a value of $10,000 by your appraiser, and you will loan the owner on that grove, say, 30 per cent of its value,
about three thousand dollars. The re¬
payment of the principal and interest over a period of thirty-six years on that investment, would amount to about
$112.00 per year from a ten acre grove or less than $15.00 per acre per year for


thirty-six years. The average, as the gen¬
tleman who will follow me will tell you,
is about six times that per annum cover¬
ing the entire industry, and in that is in¬
cluded “skeletons” and non-producing properties.

Now, gentlemen, if you are going to be of any benefit to the citrus growers, if this law has been created for the encouragement and advance of the re¬
sources of this country, the citrus grower must not be considered in the class with those who pursue general farming. He has a cumulative value to his property that even a freeze cannot destroy.

Value those groves at as near their real value as you possibly can. Let it be known that the Farm Loan Bank places an one hundred per cent valuation on the properties. And then, if you wish, cut the amount on which you will loan down below fifty per cent as much as in your opinion it should be. In establishing an one hundred per cent valuation on our cit¬
rus properties, it then places our groves in such condition with the money market that there is no question about how much they are worth.

For instance, in some of our cities our taxes are on a 100 per cent valuation.
If I owned a $50,000 property and of¬
fered it for sale to someone a hundred miles away from it at $10,000 below the assessed valuation, without any inspection or without any inquiry as to the sur¬
rounding values, that man would know that I am sacrificing $10,000 from a $50,-
000 investment, because the tax receipt shows it.

If you will assess our citrus properties at 100 per cent, our receipt or our mort-


134


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


gage from you will establish a value on that property so that in case of disaster our people can take that and create a sec¬
ond mortgage on their property and still have a good merchantable security.

Suppose you establish a 30 per cent valuation on citrus properties; suppose you have a leeway of 20 per cent of what you loan; then suppose a severe freeze should visit the state again and raze those properties to the ground; you then, under the law, could properly loan an additional
20 per cent on that mortgage and with those funds properly expended that prop¬
erty can be brought back again to a state of production where it can go on and take care of the interest and the principal.

I believe a 30 per cent loan on a 100
per cent valuation in the state of Florida,
offers the Farm Loan Bank a better se¬
curity than any other farming land in
America.

From a banking standpoint, there are loans in this state made on a higher per¬
centage than 30 per cent, considered per¬
fectly good, but for the fact that these are not liquid loans and on account of national restrictions on real estate loans,
our banks in this state, if they had any money they could loan for thirty-six years, would be eager for these invest¬
ments, because they know that, taking the average which has come in the past on these disasters, and judging the future thereby, a citrus grove will pay back prin¬
cipal and interest so many times during its period of prosperity that they can stand these losses and still have an ex¬
cellent investment and ample security.

Therefore, in considering this matter,
if your appraisers will try to establish a


100 per cent valuation on our property,
and then cut down the percentage that you are going to loan, if you fear there will not be enough left to take care of the property during some disaster, you will then give to this state a basis of val¬
uation which it has never had before, and which will serve our growers well if we should need to place a second mortgage for short-time periods on the property.

It was a happy thought that came to the author of this law when he provided for the local boards. You can go into every community in this state and select three or five men, and those three or five men know every property within a given radius. They know what each property will produce; they know the moral risk behind the loan; they know the possibility of the property being frozen, because they know local conditions; they know if a property is planted on cold land or not.
Those questions can all be answered by that local board and the investment is safeguarded to far greater extent than any appraiser could possibly safeguard it in establishing his valuation. It re¬
quires local knowledge to obtain that in¬
formation.

You have come to Florida at what I re¬
gard the most opportune time to hear this discussion, within the past twenty-two years, for you are seeing this state at its lowest ebb from the standpoint of secu¬
rity that at any time within that period.
It will be very interesting to you gen¬
tlemen to return to the state in twelve months from today, or twenty-four months from today, and see for your¬
selves the great recovery that has taken place in these properties, which today are


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


* i


135


frozen to the ground. Only in that way can you appreciate the value of the citrus properties.

I have some pictures of properties in this state taken on the 10th of March.
I show these, not in a spirit of braggado¬
cio, but I would like to have you gentle¬
men see the photos of these properties and then decide whether or not you can class all citrus land under one head, or each locality under one basis of valua¬
tion. Thank you. (Applause.)

Mr. Hume: We have with us Capt.
Smith of the Farm Loan Commission,
who is going to address us now.

Mr. Smith: Mr. Chairman, Ladies and
Gentlemen: I question very much when those gentlemen in Washington per¬
fected and put through the Farm Loan
Act, whether they realized the work that was necessary to put it into effect. You know we have very little to go by in this country to guide us. Those countries that already have a Farm Loan system are, comparatively speaking, small coun¬
tries ; many of them no larger than our states, and to attempt in this country to bring into active operation an act that would work from the Canadian border to the Gulf, and from the Atlantic to the
Pacific, is a huge task.

I did not come down here to talk, I
came down here to listen.

We have just heard this gentleman speak of the citrus problems, that is one of the fruit troubles. But you must re¬
alize one thing, and that is that the atti¬
tude of the Board in Washington is to help the farmer, and if there is any pos¬
sible way to help them, we must do it.

But there are two sides to be consid¬


ered; there is, first, the man who wants to borrow the money, and there is the se¬
curity, on the other side.

There is a wrong impression in many parts of this country, that is that this money is “easy money.” Now, to put the thing in plain language, it means this:
that where a man has good title to pro¬
ductive property, to be mortgaged as se¬
curity, he can borrow a sum equal to one-
half of the value put upon his property by the appraisers. It is just as well to be perfectly plain with the whole mat¬
ter, and I have been particularly anxious to come through Florida and see what your problems are and see if there is any way to help you out of the difficulty you are in.

We have today on file about $175,-
000.000 worth of applications on hand for farm loans. We have already loaned in the State of Kansas, and we hope shortly to be lending in this district here.

There are very few people who realize the different problems that are going to come up from time to time, and in many cases it will be impossible to form any rules that will be applicable to all the dis¬
tricts ; they will all have to be handled sep¬
arately.

But we must keep in mind one thing;
that each one of those banks, the other eleven, are responsible for what each bank does. This does not mean that the other banks are going to carry along a weak system. But it means every loan is going to be made on its own bottom.

You must realize the government is not lending money on the Farm Loan Bank basis; it has temporarily put in $9,000,-
000, which we have to pay back, and after


136


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


a bank has lent so much of this money and begins so sell its bonds, it begins to be an endless chain. To keep this endless chain going, it must have the confidence of the people of the country.

We are figuring this bank in Kansas will have to turn over its capital of $750,-
000 every few weeks. If we could issue one large issue of bonds and put it be¬
fore the country and be done with it, the matter would be simplified, but we are going to be on this bond market every few weeks forever, and we cannot afford to have any bonds come before this country that there will be the slightest question about.

I hope these men who are interested in the farm loan question, will realize that they alone make the first valuation of their lands. After that comes the ap¬
praiser, and yet these men should realize that the whole system depends on these bonds, and that they ought to look at this thing with a cold-blooded view, to make these bonds safe.

You doubtless can comprehend that in every state, the people who live in it think that their state is the best and that their land is the best. This is a very pardon¬
able pride. I sincerely hope if there are any growers here, that you will see that you look at this thing from an entirely reasonable point of view, and value your lands at actually what they are worth.

I should like very much down here to¬
day, to get an idea from some of the bankers here, just to ask one or two ques¬
tions. I do not ask these questions with a view to criticize or with a view of
“knocking,” but I would like to know this :
we are told that some of these groves are


worth $1,000.00 an acre. I have no doubt they are. Now, I would like to know what the local banks will lend on these groves on their valuation. May I
have an answer ?

Mr. Gillette: No local bank in Florida would loan $500.00 per acre on any grove that I know of.

Mr. Smith: That is one of the points I
wanted to be assured of.

Mr. -: I would state that I have

borrowed $600.00 per acre from the banks on my grove on short loans. And the bankers, when it came due, were willing for it not to be paid then, but were willing to carry it.

Mr.-: I am attorney for a bank,

and I know they will lend more than $500
per acre on grove property in our section of the state, that is, productive groves.
But they will not lend for long terms and they must be assured the man who bor¬
rows the money has other security to pay back the loan.

Mr. Smith: There is one other point that is well worthy of a little consider¬
ation.

Under the present system of lending,
where a man goes to a banker, the moral risk has a great bearing upon the matter.
If the banker knows that man is person¬
ally all right, that he understands his busi¬
ness, he may, in many cases, give him a considerable loan to carry him for a few years. But we are making these loans for thirty-six years, and the moral risk at the time the loan is made may be safe. But later on the man who borrowed the money may not live the thirty-six years and some¬
one else may get hold of the place and it may not be good security.




FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


137


We must have the actuality of security outside of the moral risk, you see.

Mr. Brown: Isn’t the moral risk on groves in Florida, as good as on Illinois farms ?

Mr. Smith: Certainly. But I would say in regard to Illinois farms. It is valued at $300.00 an acre. We have no intention of loaning $150.00 per acre.

You understand, I am not talking about
Florida in particular, I am talking about the system all over the country.

That is all I am going to say this morn¬
ing.

Mr. Hume: I will ask Prof. Rolfs to continue this discussion.

Mr. Rolfs: Mr. President, Members of the Farm Loan Bank and Ladies and
Gentlemen:

Mr. Gillett, in addressing you on this subject, mentioned the matter of a dis¬
aster that is upon us at the present time;
that is, the freeze.

We hear it stated over and over again in the papers; also we hear it stated that
Florida has had a freeze and the citrus industry is wiped off the map. I have lived a long time and seen the citrus in¬
dustry wiped off the map, figuratively speaking, many times. Put it down now,
that when a man talks about the citrus in¬
dustry being wiped off the map through a freeze in Florida, he has been misin¬
formed.

There certainly could not be a worse freeze than we had in 94-95- So long as the records of thermometers have been kept in Florida, there is no other instance where the conditions were so disastrous,
and yet, gentlemen of the Board, the citrus groves rocked through the storm; in a


short time we had a splendid production again of citrus fruits.

Further than that, Florida has had freezes before, in ’58 we had a freeze, in
’37 we had a freeze, and when we began to look through the state for stock upon which to bud groves, we found on the shores of Lake George, some old citrus trees, and cutting those off and looking at the rings, we found that stock was grow¬
ing before ’58, and the sprouts growing from it were younger than ’58. I may mention that to show the extreme longev¬
ity of the citrus tree root, its persistence.
I know of no other tree comparable to the citrus tree in this respect except the olive and we do not grow olives in Florida, so we cannot make a comparison with that.

But the citrus tree stock is very long lived. That we proved by the trees in the woods which were frozen down before the state was inhabited by the present gener¬
ation, or the white race, possibly.

We have had experience in ’94-’95
where the trees were frozen to the ground and in the fall of ’99, you will remember what a splendid crop we had. The crop was marketed and brought a good price,
showing that there was a very rapid and quick recuperation of the industry on a large scale.

We should not for a moment, however,
consider that a citrus tree planted in any place and cared for in an indifferent way,
may be frozen down and recuperate im¬
mediately. We must take into consider¬
ation the local conditions concerning those trees, and yet when a citrus tree is planted on the proper citrus soil, the root may be neglected for as long as eighteen or twenty years, without disastrous effects.


138


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


We have numerous cases of trees and sometimes groves that were neglected fif¬
teen or even twenty years and then re¬
habilitated and rebudded, and a good,
marketable product produced.

I am mentioning that to show how very different the citrus root is from a peach root, for instance, the apple root and the other fruit crops of the United States.

Mr. Gillett has already spoken about the long life of citrus trees in Europe. We have not grown citrus long enough in
America to state just how old a citrus tree must be before it becomes too old to be productive.

Mr. Chairman, I believe I have pointed out the matters I wished to bring before the Board. I want to assure them that when a citrus grove has been, as we generally say, “frozen to the ground,”
that does not mean frozen to the ground at all. In Gainesville, really beyond the northern limits of citrus growing, a few days after the freeze, people said the trees were frozen to the ground, even the roots were dead. Yet you can go there and find leaves twelve feet up in the trees.

Somehow people like to go around and magnify disasters, and they do not tell the truth in a calm and dispassionate way.
The trouble is in our minds and not in the citrus tree.

We can rebuild these citrus roots in a very short time, or, rather, rebuild the citrus grove. Five years is ample time in which to rebuild a grove to a condition in which the grove will again produce a pay¬
ing crop, not only a paying crop but a crop that will pay an interest on the invest¬
ment. There are many groves that have


done that in three years, but five years has been shown to be ample time, taking the state as a whole, and basing that statement in view of the great freeze in ’94-95.

Mr. Smith: If a man had a ten-acre grove, and we should loan him, say,
$4,000 on that grove, and it takes four or five years after a freeze to have it begin to bear again, how could he utilize that grove in the meantime, or would he have to live on that $4,000 we loaned him?

Mr. Rolfs: He would have to have some means of livelihood besides that grove, and you want to know how he could get that livelihood.

Our people had that experience; you remember that freeze was a clean sweep.
It wasn't like this year's freeze. Well, the first thing the people did—and they had no farm loan to fall back upon; they had to fall back upon their own local insti¬
tutions—the first thing done was that of producing crops so they could live at home, and in the five years following that disaster, our people by living at home and finding out that the Florida climate in the summer time was thoroughly delightful,
produced vegetables, corn and other ma¬
terials not to be used at home. In the five years following the freeze, the length of good roads in the state more than doubled; there were four times the num¬
ber of school houses built and painted and more churches built and painted than there were in the five years preceding that. (Ap¬
plause.)

That was the renaissance of education,
road building and church building. Re¬
markable as it may seem, with $70,000,-
000 of property wiped out in one night,
you see the farmers starting in to raise


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


139


truck and crops, taxing themselves higher when they had apparently nothing to tax;
taxing themselves to build roads, school houses and churches. That seems im¬
probable, but I would not dare to say it before this audience if it were not so, be¬
cause there are men and women here who went through that freeze and know I am speaking the truth.

If you wanted to go into the details it would take two or three hours, but you will know from what I have told you that we have a fine recuperative power, and when it comes to the question of doing something else or getting something to do that will tide us over until the citrus comes back, I have shown you that it has been done in the past, and can be done again. (Applause.)

Mr. Hume: I might further say at this moment for your information, Cap¬
tain Smith, that it was out of the freeze of ’94~’95 that the vegetable industry of
Florida was born, and that industry prob¬
ably equals or is greater in its worth to the state than is the citrus industry.

I am going to ask Mr. Skinner to con¬
tinue this discussion.

For your information I might say that
Mr. Skinner is a large orange grower, and large handler of oranges and a manu¬
facturer of packing-house machinery, con¬
sequently is pretty well posted on the several phases he will discuss.

Mr. Skinner: I have been greatly in¬
terested in these talks.

I have been in the state thirty-four years. When I came to the state I had
$500.00. It seemed to me that every man
I met was anxious to take it away from


me—and they did, and a great deal more besides.

But the year after I came to Florida,
’86, I went out in the morning and my oranges were frozen, my trees were fro¬
zen and I was without much money. My neighbors were all in the same fix. But we all recovered.

There is a phase that has not been touched on. There is no need of a man being frozen out. You can insure your grove by fire just as well as you can in¬
sure your house against fire. In most parts of the state, as Mr. Gillett says,
every place must be judged on its own merits, there is no reason why any man should freeze in the greater part of the
State of Florida, so far as citrus groves are concerned.

The reason why more farm crops are not grown in Florida, is because citrus products are much more profitable. I
would loan a great deal more money on good citrus land than I would loan on good farm land, and any man, any banker,
in the State of Florida would do the same.
A good citrus grove with a good growth of trees on it, and a good piece of land with a farm crop of some kind; ask these people which they would take. They will take the grove every time. It has estab¬
lished value.

A great many of the wealthiest men in our state now, are men who took those frozen groves after the freeze of ’94-95,
and brought them out. I say, groves have an established value, and it is a big value,
too, not a small one.

As this attorney says, the banks would loan money on grove property, but a safe


140


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


banker will loan his money when he can get it back when he wants it. Ninety-day paper; that is a different proposition and does not appeal to a grower.

If your loan is secured, it does not make much difference who the man is if he takes care of the property, and if you have a loan board it is their business to see that the man does care for the property in the right way, and if he does not take care of it, you can go in and take possession.

It is not the rich man who wants this loan bank; it is the man of moderate cir¬
cumstances, the working man, who gets
$1.75 or $2.00 a day. Give him a chance to get ahead; don’t be overcautious. I
have wanted to do that in my community.
Sometimes one makes enemies of the ones you are trying to help; they distrust you the minute you intimate that you are go¬
ing to give them something for nothing,
you might say. It is the greatest pleasure of my life to help these men to start, and
I would give him thirty-six years if I
stayed here that long, to pay it back, and be glad to do it.

I let one of my workmen have some money to pay for his place and he wanted to know if it could go on for a while, and

Oranges


Five years FOB averages_$ 1.483

Cost to produce_ .50

Cost to market_ .625

Total cost_ 1.125

Net profit per box_ .358

Average profit per acre on basis

160 boxes_ 57.28

Values per acre on basis 6 per

cent on capital_954.66

Loanable value at 25 per cent_238.66


I told him yes. “Well,” he said, “I am going to get in this farm loan bank, if it isn’t another one of those fakes.”

The people need the help; the value is there, and any community that will take five or six men, whatever the number is,
who will say they will stand responsible for these different loans, I think it is a pretty safe proposition, and you men are in position to know who these five men are. You are going to know; you are going to look up every one of these men, write to the bank and to prominent citizens about them. To loan a man an inadequate amount is going to do him an injury instead of helping him. You should lend him enough so that he can go ahead and succeed.

You can go over this state anywhere,
and you will find the most prosperous men are those who have groves. The value is there. Any man who owns a grove can go into a bank and get money imme¬
diately. A grove has an established value,
notwithstanding freezes or anything else.

I have here the averages by one of the large selling agencies for a period of five years:


Grapefruit

Tangerines

Total Citrus

$ 1831

$ 2.052

$ 1-597

•50

•50

•50

.625

.825

•633

1-125

1-325

I-I 33

.706

.727

.464

112.96

116.32

74.24

1882.66

1938.66

1237.22

470.66

484.66

309-33








FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


Mr. Hume: I am now going to call on Dr. Ross, president of the Florida
Citrus Exchange, to continue the discus¬
sion.

Dr. Ross: The first thing I will say

is, I am not going to talk to you long. Not that these things have not all been true,
but I understand there must be a limit,
and I am going to set the limit.

You observe the gentlemen who have spoken to you make very frequent and free allusions to freezes which have oc¬
curred in this state. That would seem to intimate to you that we are living under the shadow of a freeze all the time. Now, that is really the only element of a chance this part of the country has.
It is really the only element of chance there is in the citrus industry of Florida.

I know that a good deal of consider¬
ation must be given to the moral element in a loan which is to run for thirty-six years. And yet I apprehend that the men who are going to succeed the present people who are engaged in this industry,
will be of much the same caliber and mental timber as those who are engaged in it now and this element of uncertainty and danger is to be counted upon in every like undertaking.

Certainly this business has attracted to

it, the bold, venturesome, daring people who mean progress; people who are wil¬
ling and like to take a chance. These are the kind of people who do not often fall down, and when they do, they don’t stay down.

Mr. Skinner read us some figures show¬
ing returns in fruit. We have tried to collect statistics recently by the acre in most of the citrus counties in the state and


141

base that upon the net returns to the grower. I do not know where Mr. Skin¬
ner got his figures, I am sure we did not get them from the same source, but the very best figures we have been able to get have indicated, and I am pretty sure
I am representing no other marketing agency, but the best figures we have been able to get are that the net returns to the growers from twenty counties or more of the citrus parts of the state, and I
would have you understand that we in¬
cluded a great many groves both well cared for and indifferent groves, many of them miles and miles from a packing house, where the overhead expense of carrying the fruit to a packing house is very heavy; after getting these returns together and making a most conservative tabulation over that entire area, the an¬
nual net return to the grower has been about $95.00 per acre.

Now, I submit that is not a poor return,
and that it will compare very favorably with agricultural returns in the most fertile parts of the north.

I have had experience farming in the north, and I know a corn crop is consid¬
ered a very good crop if it brings a net return to the farmer of from $15.00 to
$20.00 per acre. My son recently boasted of a crop of oats he had, and it was a very beautiful crop and oats are worth 35c a bushel, and I asked him what net profit he was making. We made an exhaustive calculation and found that oat crop netted him $9.00 per acre.

We have tried to eliminate all the ele¬
ments that should be subtracted from the
Florida producer of citrus fruits. Mr.
Skinner has given you a profit of about


142


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


$60.00 per acre, while the figures I have collected and which might bear shading a little, although I assure you they are con¬
scientious, are a little higher.

There is one other thing I should men¬
tion, merely for the purpose of calling your attention to it, and because in all probability we have all thought of it.
The other day a man had a box of King oranges which he sent to New York, and someone paid $18.00 for that box. At this season fruit is scarce and it brings high prices. A good quality of orange brings $5.00 or $6.00 per box.

I was looking at a map of the United
States some time ago, a map two or three feet square, on which the areas producing various articles of food were shaded in different colors so that one could see at a glance the areas producing corn, cotton,
wheat, cattle, etc. I looked to see where the citrus product area was, and I found a little spot away down here on this arm pointing into the south seas. Compared with the total area it was almost infini¬
tesimal, about the size of my thumb. Of course, California is a citrus-producing area, but the citrus-producing parts of the country are comparatively small. If you were to take Florida and squeeze out all the land that will not produce citrus fruit successfully, you will have dimin¬
ished the size of Florida by about three-
fourths. There are thousands and thou¬
sands of acres of land in the peninsula where the orange tree should never be planted.

And this area where it can be grown cannot be extended. And the population of the entire country is increasing very rapidly and it is growing in wealth and


they will insist more and more on having citrus fruits, and the actual returns from these fruits are going to be so satisfactory that it will add to the intrinsic value of this land that it brings within the juris¬
diction of the Farm Loan Bank.

Let me give you an example of the im¬
pression the stability of Florida se¬
curities has made upon close and care¬
ful and thorough financial investors, by alluding to the county in which I live. We don’t manufacture anything in our county, not even an axe handle. We have no factories of any kind. The county is given over almost exclusively to the pro¬
duction of citrus fruits. It became nec¬
essary, we thought, to bond for good roads. The county did so, and at the first sale of bonds of that county, held a few months ago, a great many bond buyers investigated the security and bid upon those bonds and paid a large premium above par for a million and a half of bonds carrying 5 per cent interest.

We thought those roads would be a very great thing for the county, and we think so yet, and we are rather a restless village and want to have the best of every¬
thing if we can get it, and so we formed a local road and bridge district which em¬
braces two townships, and we had a bond election and voted $325,000 to pay for these rural roads running around our lakes. They will be useful and be a beau¬
tiful pleasure drive. With that little bond issue, in a county which was bonded for
$1,500,000, these bonds running for thirty years, bearing interest at 6 per cent, we sold them two weeks ago at a premium of $10,075.00. That was a second mort¬
gage, you might say.


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


143


In a county where there is practically nothing but citrus culture; the $1,500,000
sold at a premium, and the second bond issue, or second mortgage you might call it, of $325,000, sold at a premium of
$10,075.00. That proves that there must be some value to citrus lands.

I stated to you at Jacksonville at the hearing there, that I believed on a seven-
year-old bearing grove, or older, it would be extremely conservative to put a valu¬
ation of $300.00 per acre on it for pur¬
poses of loaning money. I base that val¬
uation first of all upon the enormous profits which result from the business when the trees are not injured, and upon the limited area in the United States upon which citrus fruits can be raised.

I offered a man across the fence from me, $11,000 for twenty-two acres of land, twelve acres in six-year-old bearing trees, the other ten acres not planted. We came very near trading but not quite.
Now, if every tree on that place were killed tonight, I would be glad to give him
$300.00 an acre for the twenty-two acres,
the trees killed to the ground, because I
would think I was getting a bargain.

I want to allude to one more thing;
that is, the people who live in Florida, the people who are supposed to know the actual value of real estate, have in the last few years taxed themselves to build $14,-
000,000 worth of roads in this state. That must add to the productivity of this land,
at least so far as net profits are concerned,
because these roads will lessen the cost of hauling, it adds to the facility with which people can get their farm products to a market or shipping point.

These $14,000,000 expended to the bet¬


terment of the state, must increase the intrinsic value of the lands of the state,
and I believe it will be perfectly safe for the Farm Loan Bank to act on the as¬
sumption that citrus grove properties are among the most profitable agricultural or horticultural businesses in the world.
(Applause.)

Mr. Hume: When the district in which we are included under the Farm Loan
Act was made up, the Bank was located in a South Carolina city, but they came to
Florida for the president of the Bank.

I am now going to introduce to you,
Mr. Von Engelkin, the president of the
Farm Loan Bank at Columbia, South
Carolina. (Applause.)

Mr. Von Engelkin: Mr. Chairman,
ladies and gentlemen: If that is an in¬
vitation for a speech, it is going to meet with failure. I hope you are glad to see me now, and that you will be glad to see me a year or two from now. (Laughter.)

We have come down here for you to help us to arrive at a determination as to what shall be done in a matter in which you and we are vitally interested; that is,
to determine a valuation that will be safe and secure. Naturally, this being my own state, it is a matter of the deepest concern to me, and you may, of course, rely upon me to do everything possible to meet the situation as fairly and amply as it is pos¬
sible to do.

It was at my suggestion and invitation that Captain Smith of the Farm Loan
Bank has come down here. We felt in
Columbia we might need the counsel of our superior officers in this situation, and
I hope before we leave we may get from you gentlemen your frank and honest








144


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


opinion as to what you think is the thing to be done. We will rely on that to a very large extent, and I know, being so well acquainted with the membership of this society, that we will get opinions from you which will not in any way be preju¬
diced or biased.

Mr. Hume: On our program appears the name of one of our members, Mr.
Warner of Palatka. He had a very grace¬
ful way of getting out of this discussion this morning, but he is going to say just a word to us before we adjourn.

Mr. Warner: Mr. Chairman, Ladies and Gentlemen: We should congratulate ourselves very heartily in having the mem¬
bers of the Farm Loan Board who are here this morning, and officials of the
Bank in Columbia, and it seems to me we have presented our case to them most happily and well. I do not think much can be added to it, except that these gen¬
tlemen see for themselves the condition of the orange groves in Florida, just at this time. It is a good time to form a very correct idea of the possible effect of cold on our groves. In some localities, the groves are still in good condition, while in others they are severely injured.

Of course, The amount of protection from cold will form a very decided basis for the value of those properties. We have done a little firing. Years ago we were much interested in the different methods of protection of grove property,
but for the last few years we seem to have been quite willing to take chances,
and if a freeze happened along to take the freeze.

But a few of us have persistently pre¬


pared for a freeze in the belief it was sure to come, sooner or later.

I fired a part of my grove this year. We have a grove of about fifty acres on the
St. Johns River facing the northwest and when the freezes come, the wind is about as strong as it can be anywhere. We have high board fences facing the northwest and these break the wind and cause an eddy behind them.

We use light wood for firing. We have fired about sixty hours in the last eight years at different times, two times par¬
ticularly, and during this last freeze,
Friday night and Saturday morning, we fired twenty-four hours. Our results were not exactly what we could have wished, but I am sure with the experience we had this time, another time they would be much more satisfactory and make the firing much more effective.

However, it is my conclusion we saved enough of the fruit and prospective crop for another year and in the better con¬
dition of the trees, to pay for the ex¬
pense of building those fences, for all the upkeep and the interest on the invest¬
ment, and yet have several thousand dol¬
lars to spare.

Mr. Skinner had a very interesting ex¬
perience this year in firing, and I think it will be of decided interest to these gentle¬
men to know what the results of his firing have been. It will surely preserve the fruit and trees, if properly done.

Mr. Skinner, may we not hear from you about this ?

Mr. Skinner: Well, you would not think there had been any freeze at all in my home grove, as I call it. The trees


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


145


there are about eight feet high at the entrance, and they have been loaded with oranges up to the present time, and suf¬
fered no damage whatever.

We fired with oil pots and wood. We fired, I suppose, about seventy-five fires to the acre. We fired, altogether, I should think, in the neighborhood of pretty nearly two hundred acres in three dif¬
ferent groves, and you could tell where firing was not done right to the line, you might say, right to the rows of trees. In fact, the Florida Grower published a couple of weeks ago a photograph of a pineapple grove at Sutherland, Florida,
where you really could tell to the row of trees where the firing took place. There was a ten-acre pineapple grove and ten acres of Tardiffs. The pineapple grove was fired adequately, and hardly a leaf was touched, and the fruit went to the market and averaged over $5.00. The
Tardifif grove, the trees lost a good many leaves, some wood and most of the fruit.

In the grove west of that there was no loss at all, the fires protected it absolutely,
and the groves south of that, also scarcely anv loss occurred.

At Dunedin where we fired, there was no loss at all. Where we did not fire, the


trees lost their leaves, most of them, they lost some wood and most of their fruit.

We feel that firing practically insures your grove and your crop. If you fire,
there are no “ifs” and “ands” about it.

Wood is as good as anything you can use, if you can get it. But it may very frequently happen, when you need it the most, you can’t get it.

The first man who fired in our neigh¬
borhood, fired in ’94-’95. He had pur¬
chased his grove without any money whatever, had made his living up to this time, and had these large trees loaded with fruit. With this threatened loss staring him in the face, late in the after-
noil he went out in the woods and hauled in lightwoocl and saved his crop. He started the idea of firing in our vicinity.

A little time ago, one of the speakers asked the question about what a man can do while he is waiting for his grove to come on. There are people in our com¬
munity, who make their entire living off their places. There is a man in Largo,
I think you can put him down on any forty acres in Florida and he can make a good living without any trouble whatever.
And there are lots of others just like him.
(Applause.)


10



Necrology


THOMAS E. ARNOLD

Thomas E. Arnold was born in Gar¬
rard County, Kentucky, February 19,
i860. On September 23, 1897 he was married to Miss Delta Heartick of De-
Land, who survives him.

Most of his early life was spent in
Richmond, Ivy., where he was in business.
Nearly twenty-five years ago Mr. and
Mrs. Arnold moved to Florida to make their future home, and he engaged in citrus and truck growing.

On January 29, 1917, while on his way to the depot with an automobile full of oranges, a long freight train backed into
Mr. Arnold’s machine, demolishing the machine and crushing Mr. Arnold be¬
neath the wreckage. Death resulted in¬
stantly, the immediate cause being a crushed chest.

Mr. Arnold was a member of the First
Christian church at DeLand and for years identified with all good movements in his town and county. Liberal with his finances as well as with his time, he was always among the first to be called upon to assist in public enterprises.

He was the first manager of the Vo¬
lusia Citrus Sub-Exchange and it was through his efforts that so much of the fruit of his section was secured. After getting the exchange firmly established,
he refused re-election as manager, but acted as secretary until his death.


No man in Volusia County was held in higher esteem by all people than Thomas
E. Arnold.

DR. W. H. CONIBEAR

Although he had not been a resident of long years nor a veteran member of the
Society, we all owe much to the memory of another of our departed members in the person of the late Dr. W. H. Coni-
bear.

He came to this state first in March,
1909, from Illinois being persuaded to come here by a real estate man who as¬
sured the doctor that the genial climate of Florida would cure a cough which bothered him constantly during the winter months in the cold north. He came and on that first trip purchased 80 acres near
Fort Myers.

In December, 1911, he again came to the state and remained four months.

In August, 1912, he moved his family to his home at Lake Hollingsworth where he had a small 6-year-old grove and a
14-acre truck patch under irrigation. The doctor was a student of chemistry and bi¬
ology and made many experiments in his own grove and garden the results of which he published in the Lakeland Tele¬
gram and the result of his studies in¬
duced a commercial fertilizer company to put a grinder (the first in the state) at their mines where they began turning out


146



FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


147


a fine grade of ground phosphate. One of the last things we have seen that the doctor wrote stated:

“Agricultural and horticultural science is yet in its infancy, some are beginning to get a glimpse of its possibilities, especially if we study the working of the soil bac¬
teria which God has undoubtedly made for a purpose.

“Heretofore chemists have had the stage and tried to make us believe that the acids produced by decaying vegeta¬
tion were the solvents of earthy matter for plant food. Bacteriologists now know that this is not wholly so and some go so far as to dare to think there is none of it true but that the whole business is done by the bacteria of the soil.

“Yours truly,

“W. H. Conibear, M. D.”

MRS. GEORGE W. ADAMS

Another of our members to depart this life during the last year was Mrs. George
W. Adams, born Elizabeth Conant. She died on March 6th, 1917, at her home at
Lake Thonotosassa.

Mrs. Adams was the oldest lady mem¬
ber of the society, being 83 years old, and had been on the roll of the Society for twenty years.

She was born at Dudley, Mass., being a descendant of Roger Conant, one of the pioneers of that state. After her marriage to Mr. George Willard Adams she moved with her husband to Florida in 1877,
where they were the first setlers to take up a homestead at Lake Thonotosassa.

In addition to her interest in the devel¬
opment of her home section, Mrs. Adams was deeply interested in religious matters,


being the founder and patron of the
Union Mission at her home city.

LEMUEL HARRIS CUNLIFF

On August 8th, 1916, Lemuel Harris
Cunliff, who had spent twenty winters with us passed away at his summer home in Norwich, Conn.

Mr. Cunliff was born in North Provi¬
dence, R. I., on May 13th, 1838.

In early life he fitted himself for a draughtsman and mill engineer. He served in that capacity for the Franklin
Mfg. Co. of Providence, R. I., and made the plans for the Oriental Mill.

In January, 1861, he married Abbie J.
Cadwell, daughter of Henry M. Cadwell of Sutton, Mass. He left Providence to enter the employ of the Frank Skinner
Company of Lewiston, Me., and made plans for the Androscoggin Mills, also re-organized and put in operation the
Duck Mill at Rockport, Mass.

After a residence there of three years he went to Norwich, Conn., and made plans for the Ponemah Mills at Taftville,
three miles from Norwich. From there he went to Manchang, Mass., and made and executed plans for a large cotton mill.
Completing his work there after a resi¬
dence of four years he went to Boston,
Mass., and opened an office in the Rialto
Building as a mill engineer. He after¬
wards was engaged by the A. T. Stewart
Co., of N. Y., which position he held for five years when he was appointed agent and general manager of the A. T. Stewart estate at Garden City, L. I., resigning the position after fifteen years of service. He was well known among the industrial leaders of New England.


148


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


He retired from active service in 1896
spending summers in New England and winters in Florida. Was prominent in
Masonic circles being a K. T. in the order.

Was a staunch Republican and director and vice-president of the Aspinook Com¬
pany of Jewett City, Conn.

MAHLON GORE

On June 26th, 1916, there passed away at Orlando one of our members whose loss will ever be deeply felt. I refer to the late Mahlon Gore.

Born in Michigan in 1837, he was in¬
ured from birth to the joys and hardships of pioneering. It is stated that he was the first American citizen to homestead under the Andrew Johnson law. He moved from Michigan to Yankton, Dakota, and in the year 1864, having lost his entire crop through the grashopper devastation was anxious for something else than farming as an outlet for his energies. At that time he learned that the Sioux
City Journal was for sale and went to
Iowa where he concluded arrangements for the editorial management of the paper.
In a year or so he bought it and became a prominent figure in the ranks of the Re¬
publican editors of the Middle West.

In May, 1869, he sold the paper to the late Geo. D. Perkins. Subsequently, from
1880 to 1884 he lived in Colorado, coming to Florida in the latter year.

Florida at that time had not even prom¬
ised to become a state of world-wide prominence in any of its present devel¬
opments. It was practically a wilder-
nes when Mr. Gore arrived here.

But the pioneer spirit was in his blood and he ached with the spirit of hoped-for


achievement. For thirty-five years he labored with his tongue, with his pen,
with the utmost of his magnetic person¬
ality to make known to the rest of the world the glories of the land he had cho¬
sen as his permanent home.

Those who knew him have, to a man,
stated that he had a way of reaching any man’s heart at once. The hearty hand clasp, the genial smile, the logical enthusiasm with which he presented any proposition, won him friends and ad¬
mirers on every side. For several years he edited a paper at what is now Orlando,
but turned it over to other capable hands,
realizing that the real estate business was a better field for him and that he could do more real good to those who desired to make Florida their home, in that call¬
ing.

The beauty and the development of that section of the country will ever be a mon¬
ument to his memory. He mastered all the things that a Floridian should know.
He studied nature both in the raw and from the text book and laboratory, and could advise any of his friends and neighbors as to just what to do and when to do it in any of the problems that wor¬
ried them as citrus growers or truckers.
And like all big men he was glad to see others succeed when their success meant increased prosperity for Florida. In the words of his widow which I take the lib¬
erty of quoting: “Mr. Gore loved Flor¬
ida and everything that was done for its benefit. I was rather happy that he did not live to see the disaster which the freeze of February 2nd brought to the
State.”


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


149


May the example he set cause others to follow his footsteps.

C. M. GRIFFING

Mr. Griffing died at his home in Jack¬
sonville on September 23, 1916. He would have been forty-five years old on the 10th of October. Born in New
York, Mr. Griffing removed to Florida while yet a young boy. It was necessary for him to make his own way in the world, and he was not long in establish¬
ing the reputation for industry and ap¬
plication that was characteristic of his whole life.

Before he had been in the State very long, Mr. Griffing secured a position with a nursery concern. After a few years he started in this business, with one or more of his brothers, under the firm name of
Griffing Brothers. From a very modest beginning, the big establishment at Mac-
clenny developed, and was later supple¬
mented by plants at Grand Bay, Alabama;
Fort Arthur and McAllen, Texas; and two or three branches at Florida points.

Just at the time that the long years of hard work on the part of himself and brothers seemed to have had such re¬
sults as to assure the future of the great business that they had built up, citrus canker was introduced into their nurs¬
eries. The story of the unfortunate out¬
come of this matter is too fresh in the minds of Florida to need recital. There were many angles to the situation, in some of which his friends felt that C. M.
Griffing was much misunderstood and un¬
justly blamed. Bravely he set about to rebuild his shattered fortunes, and was


well on the way to another success when death claimed him.

To all of those who knew him inti¬
mately the death of Mr. Griffing came as a severe shock. His clean life, progressive spirit and determined character had great¬
ly endeared him to a wide circle of ac¬
quaintances. His association with the
Florida State Horticultural Society and service to it is a matter of record, which shows that he was faithful to all the trusts reposed in him by the organization.

EDWARD K. HARRIS

Edward K. Harris, son of James Har¬
ris, merchant and banker of Boston, was born in that city in 1835. He was edu¬
cated at the Norwich Military Academy in Vermont and later at the famous Uni¬
versity of Heidelburg in Germany. He spent the earlier part of his life in travel both in the United States and in Europe.
He lived for many years in Germany and in France, where he became thoroughly familiar with the life and language of both countries. During the war of 1870
he carried dispatches between London and
Paris, saw the entrance of the Prussian army into Paris, and witnessed many stir¬
ring scenes of the Commune there.

When Mr. Harris returned to settle definitely in his own country, he became keenly interested in agriculture, and he bought an island in Penobscot Bay on the
Maine coast and an orange grove on the
St. Johns river in Florida, where he ex¬
perimented in farming during the sum¬
mer and in orange growing during the winter. Observations made during his travels gave him many ideas on the sub¬
ject which he had an opportunity to put


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


150

into practice. He demonstrated the pos¬
sibilities of farming on the coast of Maine,
and introduced modern farm machinery into that part of the country. He de¬
veloped his island to a remarkable extent.
He superintended the draining of swampy lands, the leveling and cultivating of stony fields, the clearing out of woods, and the planting of hard wood trees to take the place of the short-leaved spruce which grow almost exclusively on the Maine islands. He was the pioneer farmer among the summer residents of that region, and those who followed him in this work profited by his experiences.

During the last twenty years of his life he took an active interest in orange cul¬
ture. His grove, which was known as
“Una Grove,” produced besides oranges,
grapefruit, lemons, and tangerines of ex¬
cellent quality. He was an enthusiastic admirer of Florida, and believed firmly in its possibilities. When he died in Wash¬
ington in 1913, he was on his way to
Florida.

MRS. FLORENCE E. INMAN

Mrs. Florence E. Inman of Florence
Villa, Fla., one of the faithful members and friends of the Florida State Horti¬
cultural Society, died September 10, 1916,
at her summer home in Chautauqua, after a short illness.

Mrs. Inman was closely associated al¬
ways in interest and work with all the activities of her husband, Dr. F. W. In¬
man, and in every way that a devoted wife can, she furthered his work in de¬
veloping the section of Polk County, in which they lived. Dr. Inman’s appre¬
ciation of her work is shown to some ex¬


tent by the fact that he named the hotel which grew out of their home, “The
Florence Villa,” in her honor, and the region itself bears the same name. The sub-exchange in that section is called “The
Florence Citrus Growers Association,”
and her name is also used to distinguish the best brand of citrus fruit, the “Flor¬
ence” brand.

Mrs. Inman was universally beloved by all who knew her, and her loss is deeply mourned by a large inner circle of friends,
and by the whole region which she stood ready to help and befriend.

She was always interested as was Dr.
Inman, in the work of the State Horti¬
cultural Society, and made a point of at¬
tending its meetings whenever it was pos¬
sible for her to do so. Her name is honored by all who knew her personally,
and should be honored by all who know of her noble life and work.

WILLIAM CHASE TEMPLE
By His Friend, Edgar A. Wright

Was there a man or woman in Florida who had ever known him who but realized that when William Chase Temple died, a great man had passed away, one whose place can never quite be filled, a man of intelligence and heart and big brain.
Many with me bowed their heads in sor¬
row when the news came and regretted that it was so.

It was my good fortune to be somewhat closely associated with Mr. Temple for over two years and those two years were an inspiration for me, for I believe that every man with whom he came in contact could not fail to be inspired by his sharp intellect, keen judgment and ready wit.


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


Mr. Temple was born in this state at
Starke in 1862 so that he was a compar¬
atively young man of 55 when he died.
His early youth was spent largely in grove or lumber camp and before he was 21 he was in full charge of a grove for a promi¬
nent grower of that time. However, the call of the world was loud, and to a man of his vision, appealing, and so in 1884 we see him going north to seek his fortune.
We are all inclined to look at Mr. Temple as a very wealthy man but this was not always true as he has told me that there were times when the scratching was very hard and that he hardly knew where the next meal was coming from. I thing it needless to recite his biography, to tell how he finally succeeded and became a great factor in the steel business, and as¬
sociate of Carnegie and Mr. Frick and a trusted advisor. It is my understanding that when the great steel trust was formed
Mr. Temple sold out his holdings for a substantial sum and came back to his be¬
loved Florida, not, however, without try¬
ing California and other places but never finding one as dear to him as his own native state. We all know more or less of his connection with the citrus industry and the formation of the Florida Citrus
Exchange, of which he was manager from
June, 1910, to May, 1912. We can re¬
member his strenuous work for the affili¬
ated growers, of his strong fight against the shipment of green fruit and how he made bitter enemies by his vigorous work. Whether or not Mr. Temple’s policy was right we all concede that he was fighting for what he believed to be right and doing his best for the industry as a whole as he saw the light.


151

Mr. Temple was almost a life-long member of this society, believing in its work and being a consistent attendant,
and it is fitting that we, assembled here,
should pay tribute to him and his memory and I am glad indeed that the constructing of this testimonial should have fallen to me, the one who appreciated his goodness and loved him well. He was the best friend I ever had outside of my own family and to his wisdom and forethought do I owe not a little of the worldly gain
I am possessed of today.

Were a star quenched on high,

For ages would its light

Still downward through the sky
Shine on our mortal sight;

So when a great man dies
And fades beyond our ken,

The light he leaves behind him lies
Upon the paths of men.

I could tell many a tale of Mr. Temple’s kindness and generosity, to others and to myself, but he was not one to brag of such deeds, and I shall not for him, but
I am sure that the recording angel has a shining page made up for him to counter¬
balance any lack of piety, for Mr. Temple was not a religious man.

It was my melancholy duty to attend the funeral of my old friend, and as I
looked upon that strong face for the last time the thought came to me of one of his sayings, "that every successful business is a monument to some one man,” and I
realized that here had been a master of men indeed, one that had made a splendid success in every line he had ever under¬
taken, and then I looked over the sorrow-


152


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


ing family, realizing how they would miss his kindly banter and words of wisdom.
His friends and neighbors were all there,
and many were the kindly words I heard spoken of his lovable character and his kindly charity.

I am told that he realized that he could not live long and that he was fully recon¬
ciled but the end came very suddenly and without warning, and his wonderful brain,
worth far more than any millions he may leave behind him, was stilled forever.

The world needs the man who says: “I
can”—

Not the man who says “I might.”

There are things to do, and it’s up to you
To do ’em and do ’em right.

The big prize goes to the man who knows
And really knows he knows—

It’s a long hard run
But when all is done,

It’s the record of deeds that shows.

There is another verse that I like to couple with the name of William Chase
Temple:

i

Somebody said that it couldn’t be done
But he with a smile replied
That maybe it couldn’t but as for him,
He’d never be sure till he’d tried.

His last trial is over. May he rest in peace is the wish of one friend who loved him.

DR. GEORGE KERR

Doctor George Kerr, who passed away at his summer residence, Lavallette, New
Jersey, Aug. 12, 1915, was born near Mc-


Connellsburg, Bedford County, Penna.,
Jan. 9, 1841.

Dr. Kerr attended for a time Elk Ridge public school in East Nottingham. Took a three-years course at New London
Academy, graduating as valedictorian of his class in i860.

In 1862 he graduated from Eastman’s
State and National Business College lo¬
cated in Poughkeepsie, New York. In
1864 graduated in medicine from the
University of Pennsylvania. Received his Ph.D. in 1872 from the same uni¬
versity.

Soon after Dr. Kerr’s graduation in
1864 he was appointed assistant surgeon in the U. S. army. After the war he practiced his profession in Newburg, N.
Y., Omaha, Nebraska, and Philadelphia,
Pa.

Dr. Kerr was the founder of Lavallette,
a seaside resort on the New Jersey coast.
It was fitting that he should end his days in the place over which he had spent so much thought and energy. However,
wherever he was located the profession of healing was his main thought.

On February 1, 1893, Dr. Kerr married
Miss Caroline L. Trout of Philadelphia,
who survives him.

For the past twenty-two years Doctor and Mrs. Kerr have spent the winters in
Florida occupying their Lavallette cottage in the summer. I do not know what year he joined the State Horticultural Society and what year he became vice-president.

His parents, John A. Kerr, born in
Gettysburg, Pa., and Eliza Jane Hutch¬
inson Kerr, daughter of James Hutchin¬
son, Esq., East Nottingham Township,
Chester County, Pa.



Annual Reports


REPORT OF AUDITING COMMITTEE

West Palm Beach, Fla., April 19, 1917. and the Treasurer and find them accurate
The Auditing Committee, as appointed, and correct in all particulars,
has examined the books of the Secretary B. C. Skinner,

W. L. Floyd.


REPORT OF SECRETARY


Credit

Receipts from April 29, 1916, to April 13, 1917.
April 27—

Monies taken after auditing last report—$222.00
June 1—

E. 0. Painter Estate, gift-100.00

Back reports sold- 16.00

Seven Life Memberships_ 70.00

1917 Memberships - 372.00

1916 Memberships- 78.00

Postage- .10

June 12—

Received from Treas. Hart for Stenographer 79.00


Total _$937.10


Dr.

No good checks_$ 1.00

Postage- 64.71

Printing- 98.83

Stationery - 2.94

Secretary’s Salary - 100.00

Stenographer- 79.00

To Treasurer Hart_ 590.62


Total _$937.10

Membership Roll at Beginning of Meeting_ 372

Members Enrolled During Meeting_ 123

Honorary Members_ 4

Life Members_ 118

Total Membership Enrolled_ 617

Members in Attendance_ 255


REPORT OF TREASURER


1916—

April 30—To Balance on hand_$450.91

May 14—To Secretary Williams- 295.00

May 14—To Contributed- .43

June 30—To Interest from Savings Bank__ 3.83
Sept. 30—To Interest from Savings Bank— 6.50

1917—

April 2—To T. D. Drake’s Membership- 1.00

April 2—To Interest from 1915-16- 6.33

April 18—To Secretary Williams- 295.62


Cr.

1916—

Jline 10—By Stenographer’s Bill_$ 79.00

Oct. 9—By E. O. Painter Printing Co._ 401.24

1917—

April 18—By Balance in Treasury_ 579.38


$1,059.62


$1059.62





































>54


FLORIDA STATE HORTICULTURAL SOCIETY


REPORT OF EXECUTIVE COMM ITTEE


At a meeting of the Executive Com¬
mittee held immediately following the close of our 1916 meeting the Secretary was instructed to have 1,000 reports printed.

At a meeting of this same committee


held February 21 the date of our 1917
meeting was set for April 17 to 20, in¬
clusive. The preparation of the program was left in the hands of Chairman Rolfs and President Hume.


ELECTION OF OFFICERS


On Thursday evening, April 19, 1917,
the following officers were elected for the year January 1, 1918, to December 31,
1918:

President—H. Harold Hume.


Vice-Presidents—L. B. Skinner, W. J.
Krome and S. F. Poole.

Secretary—Bayard F. Floyd.

Treasurer—W. S. Hart.

Executive Committee—Prof. P. H.
Rolfs, E. S. Hubbard and Lloyd S. Tenny.


SELECTION OF PLACE OF NEXT MEETING

Invitations for the next meeting were 50 it was decided to hold our next meet-
received from Fort Myers and Orlando, ing, of 1918, in Fort Myers.

Ballots were cast and by a vote of 83 to




Resolutions


Resolved, That the Committee on Reso¬
lutions heartily commend the President’s address as being timely and of unusual importance. We recommend that every member of the Florida State Horticul¬
tural Society make his utmost endeavor to plant every acre of land to feed or forage crops, so far as it is in his power to do so.


We further urge that every member of the Horticultural Society use his fullest endeavor to influence as many people as possible to plant food and forage crops as a patriotic duty.

Resolved, That the Horticultural So¬
ciety urge that as much publicity as pos¬
sible be given to the President’s patriotic and timely address.



Final Resolutions


We, your Committee on Final Reso¬
lutions, do hereby recommend the follow¬
ing resolutions for the consideration of the Thirtieth Annual Meeting of the
Florida State Horticultural Society:

That the Society express its sincere ap¬
preciation of the generous hospitality which has been extended to its members by the citizens of West Palm Beach. We desire to mention especially the Board of
Trade and Woman’s Club who planned the delightful outing with its opportuni¬
ties to see the beauties of this semi-tropi¬
cal region, and the enjoyable reception in
Palm Park.

We desire further to thank Mr. Big-
gers, the genial and energetic Secretary of the Board of Trade, for his earnest and successful efforts in providing ample and satisfactory entertainment for the So¬
ciety during its visit here.

We desire to express appreciation to the members of the Musical Club, the high school girls and their instructor,
Miss Rowe; Messrs. Furgeson and Baker,
Mrs. Gable, Miss Palmer, Miss Kubn,


Mrs. Stearns and Miss Farrow for the delightful music contributed to our pro¬
gram.

We wish to thank Mr. T. L. Mead for the beautiful flowers used in decorating the assembly hall, and Mrs. Cragin for throwing open for our inspection her estate, which we found to be truly a
“Garden of Eden/’

To the railroads of Florida for special rates extended and for their co-operation we desire to express our thanks.

For the able papers and addresses con¬
tributed by various members of the So¬
ciety and those presented by others inter¬
ested in the advancement of horticulture we are indebted.

Lastly the Society wishes to express recognition of the efficient services of its
Executive Committee and officers, es¬
pecially the President who for the past nine years has so ably guided its destinies.

W. L. Floyd,

P. R. Robinson,

R. L. Goodwin.



Topical Index


A Page

A Brief Review of War’s Effect on Fertil¬
izers _ 71

Address by B. L. Hamner_ 18

Addresses of Welcome and Responses—

On Behalf of the City of West Palm Beach 3

Response-_- 4

On Behalf of the West Palm Beach Board

of Trade _ 5

Response- 9

Annual Reports—

Auditing Committee _ 153

Executive Committee_ 154

Secretary - 153

Treasurer - 153

Avocado Varieties for Florida_ 102

Avocados, Marketing by Parcel Post_ 107

B

By-Laws_ iii

C

Citrus Canker Committee, Report of_ 51

Citrus Canker Condition_ 48

Citrus Diseases, Spraying for_ 61

Citrus Groves, Methods of Handling_ 20

Citrus Marmalades _ 93

Citrus Scab _ 38

Constitution _ iii

Control of Root Knot by Calcium Cyanamide 27

Co-operation _ 14

Cotton Seed Meal _ 75

Crystallized Grapefruit Peel_ 94

E

Election of Officers_ 154

F

Fertilization _ 70

Final Resolutions_ 156

Follow-up Crops on Vegetable Lands- 113

Frosted Groves, Treatment of_ 24

G

Growing More Vegetables at Less Cost- 114

Guava Jelly _ 91

Guavas_ 91

I

Irrigation _ 66

K

Kumquat Products - 95


L Page

Linseed Oil Bordeaux_ 44

M

Marketing Avocados by Parcel Post_ 107

Melanose_ 39

Members _ vii

Methods of Handling Citrus Groves_ 20

N

Necrology—

Adams, Mrs. Geo. W._ 147

Arnold, Thos. E. _ 146

Conibear, Dr. W. H._ 146

Cunliff, Lemuel Harris_ 147

Gore, Mahlon _ 148

Griffing, C. M._ 149

Harris, Edward K._ 149

Inman, Mrs. Florence E._ 150

Temple, William Chase- 150

Kerr, Dr. George- 152

O

Officers _ v

Orange Juice_ 94

Orange Pectin - 93

Orange Vinegar- 94

Orchard Heating - 83

Ornamentals _ 124

P

Packing House Products- 75

Peaches and Other Deciduous Fruits- 99

Potash - 72

President’s Annual Address- n

R

Report of Citrus Canker Committee- 51

Resolutions - 1 55, 156

Root Knot, Control of by Calcium Cyanamide 27

S

Selection of Market Varieties- no

Selection of Place of Next Meeting- 154

Some Disease Problems of the Season- 37

Spraying for Citrus Diseases- 61

Standing Committees - vi

Sulphate of Ammonia-- 74

Sulphuric Acid --— 73

Sugar Cane - 119

Summer Crops - 113


157







































































158


TOPICAL INDEX


T Page

The Federal Land Bank and the Florida
Citrus Growers_ 131

The Green Soldier Bug or Pumpkin Bug in
Citrus Groves _ 34

The Kitchen Garden_ 115

Treatment of Frosted Groves_ 24

Tropical Fruits__ 97


U Page

Utilization of Citrus Culls and Other Pro¬
ducts by the Florida Home_ 89

V

Vegetables - 113

W

What the Women of the Federation Are

Doing - 125

Withertip _ 42
























New York Botanical Garden Library


3 51


85 00269 0095
